For advanced pull-up progressions, there's a few options. Muscle-ups should only be pursued if you've achieved a good deep ring dip, and one-arm pullups are a huge step beyond pullovers. I would suggest progressing to weighted pullups, or archer pullups if you don't want to buy a dipping belt.

Box HeSPU are definitely more of a shoulder exercise, but PPPUs should hit your chest. Dips with a forward lean are a good bodyweight exercise for your chest.

Hmmm, your L-sit does seem to be lagging a bit - are you very tall by any chance? L-sits are much harder for people who are significantly over 6 feet. You might want to post a form check video on Friday and see if people can spot any problems with your L-sit.

Hope this helps!WutAnd increase the difficulty further by doing these:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=208gsUy9S-cI know, my son. I know.I might have to start keeping a food diary or something.Are these biscuits made of protein? If so, maybe.Take it to /r/bwfcomplaints dickwad.

ps: learn2readAlso depends on your goals. There are people who take nutrient tracking to the next level. These people weigh and track everything to the gram. Or you can be more casual, tracking cals for a bit to get a handle on ballpark numbers and proceed with living life. 

I like to eat. If I'm hungry, I will eat delicious food. Sometimes it's that biscuit with gravy. You just have to practice some self control so that you don't eat 5 biscuits. I never said anything about your doctor. I'm sure he's seen plenty of injuries. Also, I'm not giving you advice; I'm disputing your statement "a bad exercises in long term."

[Third comment of this thread](http://www.reddit.com/r/Fitness/comments/2t47s0/my_doctor_told_me_that_squatting_is_the_stupidest/)comment of this threadYou are right, but honestly the only time I clip while on hanging from one hand is when I'm doing a route I know very well, and just feel like showing off.  also the rice 150g, two toast and some veggie and fruit..but yeah aint muchThis is awesome, I think I might forego the Pavel fighter pullup routine for this one. I especially liked the pushup routine at the start, as well. Sounds like a very classic manly thing to do; bang out 3 sets of max pushups between your various morning activities and finish with a shower.This is a relief.
More biscuits is always the answer.Maybe.  Depends what sort of diet you're eating.  It could just be a natural effect of burning more calories than you're taking in.As many as possible / till failure.Going to failure.Not always. If you can get a good heel/toe hook, it'll help keep you in close to the overhang while taking pressure off of your arms. That way you only have to support a fraction of your body weight.You do realize there is a difference in stress on the knees between powerlifting squats and bodyweight fitness squats right?   Generally "stress on knees" in concern with squats is degradation of the cartilage due to weight amplifying the friction.  Things like pistol squats don't stress the knee joint in the same manner as loading 4 plates on a bar and powerlifting.We have the real Macus Bondi here on reddit? Been following your stuff for years now, you rock, that's all. :DAnd of course, triceps extensions are the same idea. Fuck yeah bwf.#####&amp;#009;

######&amp;#009;

######&amp;#009;

####&amp;#009;

**Yes4All Olympic Exercise Fitness Crossfit Gymnastic Rings with Flexibl...** 

    Current $22.59 
       High $40.00 
        Low $19.00 

[Price History Chart](http://i.imgur.com/Mwg5wVg.png) | [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/PriceZombie/wiki/index) 
I ordered [these](http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B009RGMC4A/ref=oh_aui_detailpage_o01_s00?ie=UTF8&amp;psc=1) from the same company as they were cheaper compared to the other options they had on amazon. They are pretty sturdy but it took me a while to set them up as threading the band the right way is difficult. 
oh boy...I deload when I stall out hard. Deloads become more frequent as you leave the realm of novice, unfortunately. I probably deload every ~2 months using a step-back so I can bust through plateaus. take it slow dude...As someone who grew up with doctor parents [hell, my father is an orthopedic surgeon] and knows a lot of doctors, you don't seem to understand how doctors think when they give people advice. 'Should I do x?' 'No, it's bad for you'. You wanna know something really funny? Doctors automatically assume you're stupid and reckless. And because people are usually both stupid and reckless, it's honestly a smart way of doing things. 

What's the best way to avoid a car accident? Don't ever leave your house dude, 100% success rate. Also, unless they specialise in it, they have very limited knowledge of exercise science.

Can x be bad for you? Most definitely, if :

a. you don't do it right or

b. you have a pre-existing injury

You don't have to squat but you don't need to explain yourself, either. 'I don't like squatting, fuck that' will suffice. If you're a healthy male and you don't fuck it up really bad then you won't get hurt. 

And the funny part is I don't squat or deadlift. Because when I was 15 I fell off a balcony and fractured my L4 by landing ass first. I gave them a good try, but I couldn't even get to a 1.5xbw squat and 2xbw dead without my injury flaring up/ Because if you're not progressing, one way or another, you're basically masturbating. I can do heavy rows, shrugs, standing press, you name it, but squats and deads fuck me up.

I don't really care what you do. And I also have no personal investment in promoting squats, either. But don't fucking tell me 'lol my doctor said squats r bad'. You don't need to do squats, just like you don't need to do ANY exercise. If you even read the post, he says you don't NEED to squat. Why do you need someone to tell you don't 'need' an exercise? It's common sense. 

His post assumes you're not smart enough to work on mobility, flexibility, proper progression, or even eating enough. If you do these things and choose a very moderate stance width, parallel depth etc you're not going to get hurt, period. But he assumes you don't care enough to do any of that. And, no offense, but looking at your post, you're EXACTLY the kind of person his post talks about. Your routine is random and has numerous obvious flaws and not only did you not put any thought into it, you also refuse to follow proven routines. If someone puts a bar on your back and tells you to start adding weight on the bar, you probably are going to get hurt. You're getting your information from a reddit post that's trying to tell people that he shouldn't be 'shamed' into doing squats.

Again, I don't care if you squat or not, but having people spreading 'something my doctor told me' kind of half-truths is part of the reason the fitness industry ended up this deep in the gutter. The squat is a great exercise, not because reddit told me so, but because it's a uniquely amazing leg and core builder. But you can do a million other leg exercises and get really great results. 

The fact that you're trying to convince me that I'm 'brainwashed' while using someone else's opinion is pretty ironic. I'd just suggest that you read the relevant FAQs, the information there is very reliable. Compare that to something like t-nation, which is 50% garbage, and you get a great starting point.

what is a "maximum effort" set..?The weight could be from water your fat cells are storaging, if you are sure you are not eating above maintenance the water will go away at some point (you will piss some pounds overnight). My advice is: make sure your diet is on check and be patient, maybe reduce your sodium intake and skip cheat day for a couple weeks. My arm position was somewhat to the side but tucking them in does have the same effect. I do believe that some conditioning is needed before attempting them in the future. I really do not want to injure my elbow. "What? Your doctor is obviously a quack, you should be squatting. Here's a bunch of unsolicited medical advice."  

... Your comment is exactly this. Broscience.. it worth nothing. I prefer to take advice from people who studied in medicine over random guy on internetCan i do this in addition to the recommended routine? I'm at 8/7/5 dead hang pull upsIn a proper squat most of the weight is carried by the hip joint, not the knee. Doing them bodyweight shouldn't cause any issues if you've never been injured before.They're probably fine. People recommend the MDUSA ones because we know they're solid because a bunch of people bought them when they were on sale, not that they are necessarily better than anything on the market. I've also heard good things about the rogue rings as well.It depends what dish you're making exactly, rice is great, especially brown rice! As long as there is variety in a diet it's fineIt's usually on overhangs where I can do a dead hang...better than overexerting my core and legs to keep myself horizontal.I like this guy comment:

Here's the standard Fittit response to any question regarding medical advice:

   &gt;Person: "I get a weird pain in my shoulder when I do overhead press, what does it mean?"

   &gt; Fittit: "Go see a doctor. We don't give out medical advice here."

But when it's about squats...

    &gt;Person: "I have bad knees, and my doctor has advised me not to do squats. Any sort of alternative I could do?"

    &gt;Fittit: "What? Your doctor is obviously a quack, you should be squatting. Here's a bunch of unsolicited medical advice."
[First comment of this thread](http://www.reddit.com/r/Fitness/comments/2t47s0/my_doctor_told_me_that_squatting_is_the_stupidest/)

Also my doctor told me squat was the worst exercises possible because of the pressure you put on your knee..  but yea Doctor don't know shit, squat is a godly exercise because r/fitness and r/bodyweightfitness tell you so.[First comment of this thread](http://www.reddit.com/r/Fitness/comments/2t47s0/my_doctor_told_me_that_squatting_is_the_stupidest/)

Also my doctor told me squat was the worst exercises possible because of the pressure you put on your knee..  but yea Doctor don't know shit, squat is a godly exercise because r/fitness and r/bodyweightfitness tell you so.What questions specifically?Thank you for this! Will definetly include in routine. You should update the FAQ more often. There are some questions that pop up frequently enough that warrant a post on the FAQ.Do them on your knees or the wall to condition yourself. How is your form? Make sure your elbows don't splay out, and they're tucked into your side.Strict form summersault.As long as you eat rice aswell... otherwise your aminos aren't complete.Casein is inferior to whey protein though when it comes to bulking.I think that going to L Sit pullups next would probably be better than jumping all the way to assisted one arms.It a great program - I did it for 4 weeks (not nearly long enough but I got bored and went back to just doing PPL 6 days a week) and it was great.

I went from a max of 8 to a max of 15.

My week totals were: 155, 189, 222, 210 - week 4 was tough and I was getting bored so decided to know it on the head but I can still do 15 if I need to.I'm currently following the beginner routine quite strictly for 3 weeks or so. I've noticed progress but since the pull-up is the most challenging exercise for me, I might focus on this program for a month or so, keeping some stuff from the beginner routine such as the planks/skill work for rest days.15-20.

You want to develop the tendons to deal with the massively increased strain found in one arm pull up related movements. 

What exercises are you using to target your lower abs?Awesome, thanks!&gt; Not packing the shoulder hurts like a motherfucker.

If it hurts like a motherfucker, you're not ready for it and you shouldn't be doing it.It's not perfect, but I can hold it.oh boy...If you can't get upwards to the high teens (17, 18, 20+) on a consistent basis I would definitely stay away from training for it as you probably wouldn't have the strength for it.

Once your there, give weighted a shot first then proceed to weighted and negatives.Is that all the food you're eating every day? 6 eggs and 600g of chicken, etc? Doesn't seem like much. Try increasing your protein and fat intake a little, and add one interval sprinting workout a week. Nothing fancy, something like 30s hills with a couple minutes rest.Ross Enamait is great. He's like the fairy godfather of inexpensive, diy training equipment.Plus, if you can have 3 points of contact, you're unnecessarily pumping out that arm. Until that one time where your hand blows off and you take a 25' whipper with the 4 extra feet of slack you pulled out hahaCheck this out

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Q59ZvPhpySMYes, they suggested pull-ups and push ups. I think I can manage thoseWhy? Why?Yes, it came with the carry bag.  Very easy to put up and take down, and pretty light as its made of aluminium.  

One word of caution - I bought the Elite XL version and it was too tall for my ceiling, even though I thought it would fit.  You have to assemble it mostly lying down, then tip upright.  This adds a little to the clearance required.  Wasn't a major problem though, as I just took a hacksaw to it and made it a couple of inches shorter!Hanging from one hand while clipping a quickdraw can look pretty cool.  Really bugs some of my friends that I can do it and they can't :)ahh.. Well, I don't really like the beginner routine. For now I can't use a pull-up bar and I consider squat as a bad exercises in long term.I can vouch for this, I did it for 6 weeks and went from 3 pullups to 12.

The Mondays are magical.Thank you. Will look into it.Also curious about this...On mobile right now,but yesterday I saw a video for a better veriation of the lunge for the knee, the reverse lunge.
There is less pressure on the knee and more on the quads.In my case I can do close to 20 pull ups, and I can do a one-armed pull up. I'd say you should do something similar. Seeing as with much more than 15 you're training more endurance than strength. Those are fine. Here is a cool progression for you to try:
http://www.startbodyweight.com/p/pull-up-progression.html

Weights and negative are ideal, but this would work to.No, I mean follow the routine on the side bar, with a little imagination there is nothing to buy.yea.. I should buy oneHere you go (was on a mobile before): https://www.reddit.com/r/bodyweightfitness/comments/2s25pe/people_who_can_do_a_one_armed_chin_upspull_ups/What results did you see, if you don't mind me asking? Were they aesthetic or just functional?I browsed your post history and didn't find it. Care to link?What about archer pull ups? I don't have 150 lbs of weights just lying around. SeriouslyNice video of progressions for bodyweight curls
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=A-udHJtfdvYIt's been scientifically researched how much you put on in certain time periods you're either mistaken or an anomalyHave you tried looking at the beginner routine?i started weighted and negatives once i could do 30 pull ups in one goGet up to 3 sets of 8 before looking into training for one armed pull-ups. There are lots if ways I move towards it after that. One if the posts I submitted asked people how they got there as I am working on it at the moment. It would be worth a read.i would say just wear a bagpack and do pull ups and negative reps. do until you can't do anymore. and then remove the bagpack and do some pull ups and negatives.&gt;Well.. you know the guy who eat a lot but stay skinny? Thats me.

You've defied the laws of thermodynamics? It's not how many pull-ups its how heavy you do 'em. Once you can 3 sets of 8, start adding weight with a set-rep scheme of 5*5. Once you can do about 65% bodyweight pull up, do negatives.Use myfitnesspal to count the actual calories, see how much calories you intake every day. And as you lower down your BF, start changing those "cheat days" into one day in the week "cheat meal". My suggestion.All kidding aside, you are better off trying something closer to the sidebar than messing with weughts you need 80 reps for.It's because you're weak. 


edit: I feel I should point out, that while weak, you can still easily take up rock climbing. A lot of it is technique, and nothing will come close to the open hand grip conditioning that rock climbing provides.seconded. I vigourusly trained gymnastic movements, swimming, and athletics for a test at a sports university. I did way too much, way too fast and suffered from forearm splints/inflammation. 
I'm very experienced in different sports and fitness, but the tendons and small muscles involved in many bodyweight exercises weren't as developed as the larger ones i trained doing compound lifts.
Time for adaption is key.Like it, but I'd love to see someone do L-sit to planche.Assuming you kip into position, how about a strict muscle up (or a muscle up as I call it)?

As for flags, and so on, I'd already be training them anyway. Can you do front levers? If not, then start training flags and front levers. And back levers if you want.

Oh, and planche.Being tired is a good indicator as long as you aren't sick and get enough sleep.In the UK and protein is MILES cheaper than Quark in terms of protein /. Proof on requestONE ARM ZOMBIE HANDSTANDnah man just keep doing 3-5 sets of max reps 2-3 times a week for the next 4-6 weeks. After that do 6-8 weeks of Armstrong pullup program. so in 10-14 weeks you should be at +10 atleastNope, doesn't happen.

As you lose weight your BMR goes down, so you need to decrease your calorie intake to continue to lose weight at the same rate as before.

Your body cannot magic up more energy or suddenly become more efficient just because you're not eating enough.

If you starve someone of all food, they will continually lose weight as their body will metabolize everything to survive. Your energy needs to come from somewhere.I got the exercise from the GB foundation program, it's the bridge between dragon flags and starting to do actual front lever progressions. 
I dont have a computer and use reddit via phone app which doesn't show me sidebars or subreddit rules.  So I apologize if I broke any of them.You've probably got no clipping mode on. Type IDCLIP to turn it off again.drsgon flags   *can*   Be done with straight arms, but it's definitely way harder than putting your hands behind your head.

Even harder than that is trying to do them just by pressing off the floor.  Think reverse locust.  Good luck finding anyone who can do that, although I've seen a few.Human flag took much practice - and really hurt every part of my torso - but it is worth it - now I can do Human Flag 'horizontal push-ups' and Human Flag on a rope, check it:  

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=TQJw6-BXVB4 

Best advice - when you go for it and fail, DO NOT PUT YOUR FEET ON THE GROUND - just hang as long as you can, tucking your knees up. It will serve to speed up the way you acclimatise your arms/shoulder for the tensions it must soon endure. Supinated muscle-ups - palms facing you! The most 'powerful' muscle up!

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=eCWbVW4HqyY 

If you can, try to replicate hanging leg raises on a stall bar.

That is, do not let your arms and upper body help with the movement.

The best option is to do them against something such that you can't move, but having a friend holding your back in place also works.

[Like this](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RqhnbFkcNE4). They become much much harder.Your elbows flare because it makes the exercise easier.  Also it doesn't 'hit the chest more' like the bros think it does.  Admittedly the increased alignment of muscle fibres is sweet, but a diamond Pushup would activate more muscle fibres, so....

I digress.  Keep your elbows tucked in.Dan John has a great que for packing the shoulder!

You know those little labels sawn into the neck of basically all shirts?
Raise your arm and reach for it *boom* There you have it. Shoulder is packed.hmm you can try :) It hits my lower back pretty hard.what i meant was your metabolism will slow down, if you cut down on calories to fast. And its gets much harder to burn fatHow's your handstand?The first part in no way validates your retarded claim that spirulina contains pure AA's.

 Dried spirulina contains about 60% (5171%) protein. It is a complete proteincontaining all essential amino acids, though with reduced amounts ofmethionine, cysteine and lysine when compared to the proteins of meat, eggs and milk. It is, however, superior to typical plant protein, such as that fromlegumes.[2][9]The U.S. National Library of Medicine said that spirulina was no better than milk or meat as a protein source, and was approximately 30 times more expensive per gram.[10]

(2) Ciferri, O (December 1983)."Spirulina, the edible microorganism". Microbiol. Rev. 47

(9) Babadzhanov, A. S.; Abdusamatova, N.; Yusupova, F. M. et al. (2004). "Chemical Composition of Spirulina Platensis Cultivated in Uzbekistan".Chemistry of Natural Compounds 40(3): 276279. doi:10.1023/b:conc.0000039141.98247.e8.

(10) "Blue-green algae". MedlinePlus.U.S. National Library of Medicine. November 18, 2010. Retrieved April 15,2011. 
I'd like to add Power Clean after OP has learnt to do deadlift properly. 

I find it really fun and, my god, it has made my traps grow like never before even though I do it only once a week.

The only problem is finding a good resource to learn it. I found Starting Strength's method very effective.Thanks for pointing me to that, Didn't quite understand it all, so I may be back with some more questions soon, thanks for that though :)
Sounds fun. I'll try this but with Elsa!Read the FAQ. All the information you need is in there! :)Packing the shoulder is different to locking the arms at a slight bend, which I am vehemently opposed to.

What I meant was: scapula depression.  It's the difference between hanging off your last and hanging off your serrated anterior.  Not packing the shoulder hurts like a motherfucker. Presumably you can work up to it, but I'm not concerned much with one arm hangs at the moment.Starvation mode does not exist.

If you eat too little, your body has no choice but to metabolize fat and muscle. If you eat at a moderate deficit and work hard with sufficient protein, you will minimize muscle loss, while losing fat.Not sure if I am mistaken here, but all I found about the exercises you suggested where done with weights. I don't have a gym membership and exclusively train doing body weight exercises at home, but in case there was a misunderstanding on my part, pls tell me.

Thank you for your help anyways.

Surprisingly I was able to do one hand hangs before 15 pull ups. That being said just hang with both hands then alternate between slowly letting go of the other hand. Or decrease the number of gripping fingers on one side while doing your normal pull ups.Thank you for your informative reply!You are going to struggle to build muscle running 30 miles a week unless you are eating huge amounts.

Eat a fuckload, monitor your weight and work from there.My biggest issue is my hip flexor are really strong and my lower abdominal are super underdeveloped. 

Just found this out and now I'm trying to fix it. :-/Spirulina is a nuclear plant. Nuclear plants are those which are borderline between plants and animals. amino acids are basic building blocks of the body. Of the 22 amino acids that you require, only 14 can be manufactured by the body. The other essential amino acids must be derived daily from the foods you eat. They must also be available to the body simultaneously in the proper ration or they cannot be properly utilized. The cell walls of the most vegetables are composed of cellulose, not digestible by humans. Spirulina cellulose is composed of mucopolysaccharides which are complex sugars, easily digestible, thus freeing considerable energy. Digestibility tests have shown spirulina to be 83 to 95% digestible. The usable protein in spirulina, therefore, because of its digestibility and amino acid balance, is about 90% the highest of any protein other than casein, and that by the way, is the standard by which all protein assimilation is scientifically evaluated.
**For a comparison**:, an 8 ounce steak is about 1.8 ounces of protein, whereas only .27 ounces, or 7.6 grams, are actually usable protein. When we take niacin to get the flushing reaction, a lot of times we're releasing trapped antigens because the steak and the chicken that we eat today are so full of all kinds of different hormones used to make the animals grow faster and bigger.
Spirulina, on the other hand, is 70% protein, 90% digestible and provides 5 ounces, 140 grams of usable protein in each of 8 ounces. That is 18 times more protein than a steak, with a little, if any, waste. The body's easy assimilation of spirulina protein facilitates the assimilation of the entire vitamin formula. Also spirulina has chlorophyll in it, another essential that assists in the development of healthy red blood cells in the body. The carbohydrates found in spirulina provide energy in several different forms, including a rare sugar known as rhamnose. Rhamnose is more biologically active than other sugars because it combines more readily with other nutrients.Milk is still cheaper and contains free calories on top. Tastes nice and can be bought virtually everywhere. You have no fucking idea what you are talking about. Muscle doesn't grow by mitosis, spirulina doesn't contain free amino acids, you don't waste most of your protein intake and DNA doesn't only consist of amino acids.

I mean come on, get your ass off those stupid ass vegan websites and think about what you learned in high school. The reason muscle is rich in protein is because of the myofibrils: actin and myosin.If I'll post a picture would you be able to guess how much am I? I will order what you suggested. Just want to know where I stand at the moment You get used to it, I kinda build it up. Jusy like your lactase production slows down when you stop drinking milk, it will go up once you start drinking more of it.I can't see why Scheuerman's disease should prevent you from weight lifting once you're past puberty and your bones have ossified. I believe conservative treatment of the disease includes some resistance training?Climbing is all about your legs.  15 pull-ups is plenty for most any route.Listen to this guy! I started doing a bunch of one arm hangs because I saw it in a youtube video to increase shoulder flexibility (which I need to do). I worked up to it over a couple of weeks, but obviously not slowly enough as I then had to take 4 weeks off the bar to let my finger joints recover.hey man I use a Caliper, standard one from amazon for 5usd or so. I think its the best method, considering cost/effectiveness. Just measure once a week to have insights May be I'm too late and you now have another test coming up, but do you have the time to post it? *fingers crossed*A question. How do you know how much body fat are you? Did you check or just used the images that show each percentage and figured it out?
I'm with the same goal right now and I'm not 100% sure how much am I. Maybe you will be able to tell Just remember in calories counting not to over do it. 
Don't reduce more than 700 calories from your daily need or you will lose lots of muscle in the progress. L-sit to handstand. [example](http://youtu.be/0ZbmssIoKSw?t=6m24s)http://www.reddit.com/r/bodyweightfitness/wiki/faq#wiki_what_do_you_think_about_x_workout.3FRule 1: read the FAQ from the sidebar before posting.Yeah maybe youre right. Thought you would be getting complicated, like to little calories - body goes into starvation mode.

Maybe ill try my fitness pal :) Thanks for the help for sureForward roll, backward roll and pullover are next logical progressions on rings.Both might be. I will check them out.!! Sorry! I meant the exact opposite as I'm sure you figured out &gt;.&lt; I misread weight loss as weight gain!

Right so you should eat less :) but either way counting the actual calories would be the best next step imo. 

Edit: lots of people use myfitnesspal to track what they eat and count calories. You can give that a try if you want. You can input your targets and your particulars and it has a formula or whatever to help. It's one thing you could tryI can hang with one hand, but I did not get this way from doing bodyweight exercises. I did deadlifts. Deadlifting is a killer way to increase your overall strength. I found it is the only exercise that bodyweight fitness cannot properly duplicate.

I mainly do bodyweight fitness exercises, but in addition to that I do deadlifts, and (for fun) bicep curls.

Thanks man.
Eat more to loose weight you mean? sounds counterintuitive...If you're stalling you simply need to eat more I guess. One thing that could help is counting the actual calories instead of the specific foods you're eating and comparing that to your TDEE etc. OAPU and OACUHMMM :) 

Go for Tiger Bend Handstand Pushups - Thats Beast.I have done dragon flags, I don't know how many I can do though as (dumb as it sounds) I can't find anywhere in my house to do them. Those are a good idea though.Dragon flags, at least the core component, is easier than standing ab wheel IMO.I guess you could wear ankle weights on the hanging leg raises...?

Have you done dragon flags? I don't know if those are harder or easier than where you're atThe same [PVC-webbing pull-up handles Ross Enemait uses for pullups](http://rosstraining.com/blog/2011/08/25/doorway-pull-up-handles/) could be used as anchors for dragon flags. Just slip them under the door instead of over.Milo is a chocolate malt milk additive we get here in Aus, I thought it was everywhere.  It's good.

Metamucil is ground psyllium husks for some extra fibre, I also thought is was widely available...It looks like the only thing stopping you from doing these unassisted is balance, try just going down without holding the pole, steadying yourself with your hands on the ground and pushing back up. Believe it or not.
You'd normally not use your musculature like that in climbing. In fact, we rely heavily on the passive tension of our tendons and ligaments to hang on the wall.

When you're hanging from holds in climbing, you ought to have straight and locked arms. Your grip is the only muscle activation in play.Honestly if all this came about from squats and lunges (both exercises which should engage the hip abductors), it could be the onset of IT band syndrome (I described towards end of previous post). I've battled it a bit in my soccer career and it's normally associated with runners who don't activate their glutes and rely on other minor muscles to stabilize the knee... but I imagine large repetitions of any kind could aggravate it. Im by no means an expert so please still reach out to a professional. 

While you're resting it (avoiding squats and lunges), try using a lacrosse ball or tennis ball to loosen up the [gluteus medius](http://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/7/70/Posterior_Hip_Muscles_3.PNG) in the posterior hip. From the center of your but, this will be upper portion of the muscle and towards the side.  These muscles can get exceptionally tight from sitting long periods and even if they aren't causing this mystery sensation, it's good to be proactive since they are a very common issue. 

[Heres a good article talking about some of the dynamics](http://breakingmuscle.com/mobility-recovery/your-it-band-is-not-the-enemy-but-maybe-your-foam-roller-is)This is anecdotal from what I've experienced in a decade or more of climbing: 

For 95% of all climbers, the best training is more climbing. With proper rest, most people are not climbing as hard as they could. It's only a small number of climbers that really need to diversify their training in order to better their abilities. 

You should still cross train because it's good for you. Just don't thinking something like, "I can't go climbing because I can't do 40 pull-ups." 

I've been out-climbed by people that can't do 2.Yep, when I started rock climbing I couldn't hang by one hand. Just wasn't strong enough. Then one day on a boulder problem I hit the finish hold and in the process of bringing my second hand to the hold both my feet blew and for a split second I hung free by one hand. Then I realized I could actually do it. Not that it has many practical uses. Not like I need to stop to chalk on an overhang on a boulder problem, and most the sport climbing I do is not severely overhung.Here's a typical day for me. 

Breakfast: Cheese and ham omelette. 3 eggs. Half a tub (300g) of greek yoghurt with crushed granola. Fruit. 900 calories, 40g of protein.

Dinner: 2 Sandwiches on whole bread, meat filling (beef or chicken usually) + nuts, some type of sweet like cookies or chocolate.

Tea: Brown rice with salmon or chicken and some green vegetables. Or kidney beans, peas. etc. 40g of protein.

I snack on fruits and nuts throughout the day, and drink a glass of milk with breakfast and tea, which all together take me up to about 150 - 160grams. I should probably be getting more considering I'm 6'7 but I'm making very good progress as is. For caloric surpluses and deficits, think in terms of weekly averages. Day to day doesn't matter so much. Eating more on your training days might give you the energy to exercise more intensely, but it probably doesn't make that much of a difference.I don't know if there is carryover, but PPPU elbows are usually tucked and not flared out. PPPUs are one option after getting proficient diamonds. 

Another possible consideration is that the more your elbows flare out the more your shoulder internally rotates. Maybe fine for people without shoulder issues and maybe not great for people with issues. Good points.Yes, please do. And does the back lever relate to the planche that much? I keep hearing that but they don't feel similar to me at allMb front lever, side lever, planche, manna, leg strength, 90 degree pushup, rope climb, handstand and press to handstand. Or muscle up w out kipping, if you're kipping.Front leverAs a heads up, probably don't go for 7/30 if you haven't done much hanging before. That's a lot for your connective tissues to deal with suddenly.

That said, I went from never dead hanging to 3 or 4 sets of 1min every other day for a few months and saw Great results.Someone told me, "the only way to get better at rock climbing..is to rock climb".  So start there!I sincerely doubt that they're all that shitty. Probably more than good enough for what one would do for at least a couple of years, certainly for strength moves.R/griptraining I got downvoted. But peoples...do  some research I know its considered as a Godly exercise, but it is not. ..  [The first comment of this thread explain it well](http://www.reddit.com/r/Fitness/comments/2t47s0/my_doctor_told_me_that_squatting_is_the_stupidest/) I had the same problem. I ended up putting the pullup bar between the door on the ground and put weights on the back of it. It works pretty well.Not sure why this is happening. 15 pullups is a lot. Unless you're kipping a lot, there should be enough strength there. At any rate, Awareness is right, I'd do exactly what he suggested. Also, just go climbing now. My gym has tons of newbies who can't do a single pullup and are able to climb. I have friends who do V9s who can only do like 5 pullups. As a climber, do yourself a favor and go climb!One, check form and decrease weight and keep at it for low weight high reps. Also try front squats I noticed that personally I feel my upper quads and hammys firing more on front squats.  Also smith machines can help up the weight and restrict you movement if you are pushing off one leg more than the other. Romanian Dead lifts are a solid leg workout and it helps me to think pushing my feet through the floor. 

Def talk to a Dr see if there is scar tissue or ligament damage.  I have an old knee injury that will cause my knees to fill up with fluid if everything isn't perfect.  An ice pack on the knees immediately after legs day helps with that.HI Josh - agreed - nutrition is everything! 

I am mad into raw ginger for the last few years - eating a raw 10gram chunk every day 20 min before training - it ensures excellent bloodflow... and a really positive muscle energy for the duration of your training. probably thoracic kyphosis, chest caved in, head juts forward, rounded shoulders. lots of youtube vids on how to open up chest. but yea visiting a personal trainer or physical therapist would be a god ideaRock climbing will give you the strength to hang from one hand if you stick to it. Just work on climbing, it will do immense work on the muscles in your forearms and will lead to holding smaller holds too. No need to train to be able to start climbing.I think that's a poor viewing angle for analyzing how "tucked in" his elbows are. It looks like his might be a bit more flared out than you may think to me. 

I do mine with about a 20-30 degree angle (that is to say, my elbows stick out slightly) and that's comfortable for me. It's still working the intended muscle groups. 

It also has to to with hand placement. I.e., if your fingers point to the outside of your body while doing push-ups your elbows will tuck in and vice-versa of your fingers point more to the inside. Try wanking twice a day. Worked for me. Awesome. Looking forward to it.

Thanks for all of your hard work on these!I'm not OP but I'm guessing they meant keeping your shoulders pulled down and away from your ears and your scapula pulled back and away. Did you happen to see the beginner routine on the sub? It has lots of progressions, so it's likely you can find something at your level. If not, you can read some of the FAQ and the concept Wednesday posts and make an intermediate routine. As part of that you can look through the progressions lists on this subreddit or elsewhere on the Internet. 

To recap: do the beginner routine, and if you find everything is too easy for you, then do some research and create an intermediate routine.The same thing I thought when I found them. Not as cheap as using chairs, but better in my experience. They're sturdy, padded, and made specifically for dips.Knee doesn't really feel stiff and can be bend and extended without problems.

When I'm sitting at work all day I feel like it gets worse when I keep it bend at about 90%. It sometimes hurts a tiny bit when not under load but nothing compared to when I stand up, and the stinging is really only at the one certain angle. Apart from that its almost nothing.

The feeling on the outside is no pain, just a weird sensation that is similiar to warmth and beaming out a bit, the knee doesn't feel warm to the touch tho, i think.
you found the fucking answer.. it made me realise I was lifting my dumbell when I was on the balance.. I'm doneObviously, see a physician to discuss further and be sure to rest it well.  A lot of issues can come from eager beginners who jump straight from sedentary lifestyle into overuse injuries of particular motions due to extra enthusiasm about their new regiment.

For sake of side conversation/brainstorming, I'd be curious for a bit more description than just stinging.  

Does the joint itself feel stiff when this stinging occurs?  

Is the stinging only during load bearing moments?  Or while relaxed at 90 degrees too?

Does extension or flexion change the pain you feel (either flexion past 90 degrees or extension past)?

Is this stiffness feel like it's swollen inside the joint and can't bend any further than that 90 degree point (likely being meniscus related then)?

Does it feel similar in terms to tendonitis on the outside?  A rubbing or almost knifelike piercing pain on the outside of the knee can be associated with your illiotibial band (a tendon that basically runs from a glute muscle all the way down the side of the thigh and to the knee) which if your glutes are excessively tight, can rub against your femur's condyle (little outside knobby part of your thigh bone at the knee).
What do you mean 'packing down your shoulder'? Thanks. Its free!

3x this routine each day except sunday (Jesus Day) . I started with lower repetition and added ~10 reps when I felt it was too easy. I alway do a 10 min of stretching afterward. 

Also, I'm poor so I only have two 10 pounds dumbells.. that why I do 80 repetitions.. Sounds like a form of autoregulation, a very powerful method of periodization IMO. If you are keenly aware of how you feel and your limits, it can be a great way to manage fatigue and progress.

Next week will be all about it (hopefully) and ways to further optimise it.If no bench, floor press is decent alternative, and may be safer if no spotter.

idle thought: where am I, r/powerlifting?Squats are good exercise for athletes doing sports. For the average guy trying to get some muscle or loose some weight, they tend to be bad in long term .. Its just my opinion, but replace it for goodOr keep going and sell your miracle program : )get you to some physical therapy STAT!

I've never taken a planned deload.

I am constantly adjusting my sets/reps/intensity in some way to keep pushing progress without hitting a wall. Sometimes this means I sit at similar sets/reps for a couple weeks while tweaking form, or I may be pushing weight/intensity up more aggressively but dropping volume a bit. I mostly just play by ear, I guess. If I am feeling less than 100% or I know that I'm not sleeping/eating as well as I could be, I may reduce the number of workouts that week. Of course there will be times when life gets in the way, and I don't stress over that either.

I'm sure it's not optimal, but so far it seems to be working okay for me.yes.. Also for half-banana, I just didnt know the name of the exercise, so I found a similar on internet that was called [half-banana](http://media3.popsugar-assets.com/files/2014/05/06/948/n/1922729/46b78832a9d25aeb_half-banana.xxxlarge/i/Circuit-Three-Half-Banana.jpg)Well , I did take 20 pound in two month and when I look at the mirror, that clearly not fat that I gained. I don't count the calories, because my goal wasnt to loose weight.. but now I might need it to balance my gains because I might just found the recipe for unwanted swoleness. :PThe way to get stronger fingers for climbing is to climb more. Simple as that. I don't know your level, but just climb your ass off. It's the fastest and easily the funnest way to get better. Don't use the hang board, don't use the campus board, don't use the system board. Just climb climb climb. Ya, I take more than 7 minutes worth of rest during my routine. This isn't legit.Why is everyone downvoting this guy? Your back muscles and core are what is holding your body up off of the floor and is what this exercise is supposed to work. The grip seems pretty much irrelevant. I can't try one right now so I don't know how it's going to feel but lol at the downvotes. I've never heard of this or thought of doing them like this so I'm gonna try it tomorrow. Did you ever sit down and count calories before and after?  I mean really pin down the amounts?

Working out makes you hungry and if you aren't monitoring it closely you more than likely ate more.
 You are asking people to believe the likely didn't happen and you stumbled upon a recipe for swoleness...
Best thing to do with posture, exercise your core and BE MINDFUL! Are you slouching now? Sit up straight! When you're walking, are you standing up straight? No? DO IT! That is ALL it takes! I'm 2 inches taller than 2 years ago, because I'm now mindful. Not to mention the social benefits of good posture (making you look more confident and attractive)Get someone to hold you in a handstand on a trampoline (preferably not inclined) and tell him to bounce up and down ever so slightly, gently shaking the trampoline while holding you. 

Fully extended shoulders, start with 30 sec. Works wonders for my kids. Thank you very much for your help. Will google everything I don't know how to do."7 minute workout"

Nope.You mean my fapping isn't homoerotic?! 

In all seriousness, though, I don't think this was homoerotic, but I certainly wouldn't call if bodyweight fitness, either.It's likely that some of that is muscle, but considering it was gained in only two months, most of it is probably fat. My advice would be to cut down on your eating, slim down, and then try again, at a lower caloric surplus this time.Definitely see the physician/physio asap. It's misty likely 2 combined with 3, plus if you say you're overweight, suddenly doing exercise probably did you in. Perhaps it was also bad form, because that can put lots of pressure there. 

Unfortunately, nothing can really 'replace' squats or lunges. Continue with bodyline work e.g. pushups, planks, chin/pullups. Tricep dips, sit ups should also be fine. Maybe get a hoolahoop for cardio. 

For the legs specifically, do standing leg raises or hanging if possible. Standing to train balance (+ easier), hanging for core strength. This will work quads kinda, mostly core. 
Another front thighs is you can extend your leg to straight while sitting, and just tense as hard as you can. Do sets of up to 60 seconds. 
No idea of what to do for hamstrings, but maybe back leg swings can help. 
Do calf raises for calves. 

Can clarify if needed. 
Whoa! Seems like a lot but I guess at your size your caloric needs are decently high. And if it's working for you don't change it!You don't need to be able to hang with one hand to start rock climbing. Most of the time in climbing you are trying to keep most of your weight on your legs. If you want to climb, go climb. You will probably find that a one arm hang comes along naturally if you do.oh. well. I tried.

wait, do you have an outward facing corner somewhere? that could work, it wouldn't be ideal but it could work.I think the key question here is this-

Will deloading allow you to train significantly enough harder than training at a level that doesn't require deloading that it will more than make up for the fact that you aren't training for a while, in terms of progress and muscle gain?

I'm inclined to think "No." but I'd like to hear other opinions.I would say that a bigger issue is your extreme self-consciousness and depression. Maybe posture is a problem, but, there are people out there with bad posture and no serious adverse psychological effects. See a therapist if you could, they help.You need to train finger hangs in addition to hand hangs and pull ups. Your fingers won't get strong enough to crimp from just pull ups.Thanks for your interest.  Here's a typical day:

Breakfast:

2 bowls of cereal with whole milk

an orange

2 cups coffee with cream

2 eggs

1/2 cup oatmeal


Lunch

Spinach salad with shredded chicken breast and cannellini beans with sesame oil dressing

2 tbs peanut butter on whole wheat bread

2 pieces fruit


Snacks

2 scoops whey protein with 1 cup whole milk and 1/2 cup oats; add 1 tsp. creatine

1 serving walnuts or peanuts

1/2 c yogurt 

1/2 c full fat cottage cheese.  
Click bait? Confirmed. BWF? Not even once. Next time, mark this as NSFW before subjecting the community to ambush homoerotic imagery and (and music). The "problem" is that you're eating more fuel than you're using as energy. So you're gaining weight.

Try tracking your calorie intake for a week and then make an informed decision about what to do. Alright, thanks for your insight.I know you touched on this briefly, but how important is it to keep a full grip during the whole motion? Perhaps I have tight forearms, but I find it nearly impossible to keep more than two fingers touching the bar when it hits my butt.

I tried moving my grip wider. That actually makes it *more* difficult for me to keep my hands on the bar. Since this exercise primarily targets the shoulders, am I ok letting my fingers roll out of a full grip in order to get the best range of motion for my shoulders? What do you eat for breakfast lunch and snacks?Make a clamp or an alligator with your hand. You're right, probably fine. Yup, I'm trying to find a video to show you and right now [this](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=n4JwPmq745Q) is the best I can seem to find. Instead of using a smith machine you just use a pole and a door frame. You do dragon flags with a bar at shoulder height? Im talking about this exercise http://www.t-nation.com/training/dragon-flagI'm not sure what you mean about triangular grip but as long as it doesn't hurt, you're probably fine?At least OP is honest! Nope, I hold the bar out in front of me at shoulder height (think almost like a front lever) and pull it into the door frame.Those who don't want to get salmonella 

it doesnt move up?I cant fit my fingers under the doors in my house : /Make sure to give tendons the proper rest!I use a bit of conduit (really a broom or any kind of thin pole will work) and do straight arm dragon flags on the door frame.That settles it, I'm using the back from now on. Does the differing grip have any bearing on effectiveness? They're very different, circular vs triangular. Any difference in the wrist? I just do them with my hands under my bed, but anything heavy enough should be good. Unless it's too dirty down there, you could get away with using a good bookshelf if there's a gap on the bottom. I'm the least picky person about where I manage to do them though, so ymmv. &gt;An advice or tip would be more than appreciated.

Lots of good advice in this thread. Here's a quick 30-second video I made on [how to sit down with perfect posture](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KDoKPeZu-o8) so you don't immediately enter in a slouched position. (The original, longer video is [here.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=aSyw8yOyEnk))Use a door. edit- for clarity, close it and grasp under it.Being in one position for long periods of time causes hysteresis, or changes in tissue length. The muscles/ligaments that are being stretched will get longer, and the ones that are are being flexed will get shorter. Typically, with long hours of sitting the hip flexors get shorter. When you stand, they want to stay that length and since you don't have the core strength to oppose it, they will pull down on your pelvis. This causes a chain reaction up your spine, leading to increased lumbar lordosis, among other things. Most people feel low back pain as a result. You're very fortunate though, you're young and you're changing your habits now! 

To improve, I'd suggest core exercises like planks and glute exercises like the glute bridge. Add that to some psoas and other hip flexor stretches and you're headed in the right direction! Pair all this with the beginner's routine and you're gonna be looking and feeling fantastic. Like others said, it's still good idea to see a physical therapist or sports chiropractor to give you care and support as you work through this. Good luck! I drape some folded towels over the backs of the chairs for a more comfortable grip. Just gotta get creative. :)Work up to a 120s two handed hang before you go for one handed dead hang.Have you used chairs? I'm a couple weeks into support via the beginner routine and my hands hurt a lot as I use the curved metal arms. Edit: forgot the picture. http://imgur.com/RCOtQnG

I weigh them down with 4L water bottles and bags of sugar, so I can actually use the back of the chairs instead with a different grip, it hurts less. I don't really know what I'm doing, I wish it wasn't winter. There's a park nearby that has what I need. So, like if I fall asleep at 7:30PM after working out that day, is my intensity in the appropriate range?Don't be like that.  Sure, you may never do a back limber, but you can still achieve a press handstand.  You'll just have to planche it.

Don't let it stop you from getting strong as shit.Typically when I'm doing the routine, I'm doing 30 seconds at a time with 90 seconds rest, works out pretty well to have enough energy to get a strong hold for the entire time.  

Ultimate goal in my opinion is probably the ability to do freestanding handstands, at least that is my ultimate goal. :BTry the chest pec stretch with your arm internally rotated. You need to stretch out your biceps. Assuming you know the chest pec stretch where you rotate over the arm? If not I'll find a video.Sweet. I can pull off a back lever but it feels too strained. Can't wait!Sure. Just note that it'll take months to get to this point even w previous weight training. Thanks again.

I've been training legs with weights for awhile now so I will definitely try these next time I don't have access to weights.Hey, 

I too recently got really fed up with my posture. I've had back pain for years and have been to several Chiropractors to try to fix my back pain. I finally started to do some stretches for my hip flexors and psoas and found them helpful to a point. I finally started seeing a Physiotherapist who made a bigger difference in a few sessions than I had noticed (via side profile photos) in one month. I had to stop my sessions though because I broke my leg which makes doing some of the work in the sessions difficult/impossible. However, once I'm healed I will be back. Make sure you find someone experienced in posture correction or you will end up wasting your money for subpar results.  I have the same posture problems. Almost exactly but mines also because im tall and ive spent my entire life bending over so i can hear what people are saying aside from computer and all that.

To answer your question i dont feel like its helping ive been doing it for two months now. Today i discovered that a back bridge will help. Its sonething that i havnt been focusing on but i will now.

I will mention though thatdespite not feeling like its helping my posture my girlfriend commented several times last week how i look taller and broader than usual.Thanks guys, these are all very good ideas, I'll try them all :)Do weighted hangs with two arms and you will get strong to hold on one arm overtime.Yes, but the cost of falling goes up as you get older. Also trampolines are fun. You're not strong enough.

Try hanging with both hands, but one has X fingers still attached to the bar.

Work down to middle finger, then ring, then pinky, then hang by one arm.

Be careful, as the tendons in the fingers are fragile and need proper recovery.Given enough time (I'm talking months), you wouldn't need to do so anymore. This guy does them pretty well.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=70TLeRfK75o
Your grip strength isn't strong enough. Thanks for the link.

It seems pretty normal that people do a kind of half-knee push up to get off the ground. I was hoping maybe there was a better way to do it.You can train and do flips without the aid of a trampoline.So your goal is to lose weight?A back flip. Anecdotally, when I started the beginner program I had bad posture, pain in my lower back when I walked to much, and hunched shoulders.

The beginner routine, supplemented with some shoulder mobility and just reading about how to orient my hips (i.e. keep my glutes tight) made that pain virtually disappear. I haven't kept up with it as much as I like, but everytime I stop my back pain gets worse slowly over the course of a month or two as I just sit around, and then it starts getting better in the first week that I begin exercising again.

So yes, I think it does.I tried to fix my own posture. It landed me a shoulder injury I'm still recovering from. Go to the doctor, complain about back pain or something, and get a referral for a physiotherapist. Those people work magic.

You can't google your way out of this one. Self diagnosis of problems like this are nigh impossible. Get actual help.It doesn't hit the back much but thanks for the insight into the quality of your back. I have a crappy back and that looks like it would hurt my crappy backLevers and planche are strength work. Not skill work He does a lot of kicking while pulling himself up. I'm no expert, but that seems odd. Whatever he's doing is working for him though, so whatever.This is why I workout at home and not at the gym. Start estimating your body fat percentage. Weight is only one variable in your appearance. Lower BF% at the same weight will make you look very different. 

I use the ymca calculator. All methods are imperfect but all you need is something to track change over time.I think that SS method for finding first weights is quite good: start with a an empty bar, do five reps. And 5 kg, do five reps. Repeat this process until bar speed slows down. You then use that weight for your your first working sets.No worries. My advice is don't change a thing. Keep your diet in check and keep progressing with those exercises. Right now you are going through body recomposition (losing fat and gaining muscle). Enjoy it while it lasts.Would you say do front/back lever, planche work on skill days or strength days?  I agree with the hanging leg raises I do those after my skill work when I have the timeI don't see how it could do anything for you that hopping down the sidewalk couldn't.Yes, the beginner routine will help your posture in addition to general physique. Scale it back to comfortable reps/hold counts in the beginning. It should feel easy the first couple weeks.

Find someone to train with who knows the movements and is able to guide you into proper form, and go do it. From your description, you may want to medically rule out scoliosis, but I know plenty of very competitive athletes with it so even that shouldn't stop you.You're me two years ago, except I didn't know I had bad posture. I've seen physios for low back pain but none of them told me "hey dude, you gotta stand straight".

Only good posture will help your posture. Bodyweight fitness, notably planks and core work, will help you getting strong enough to keep a good posture. But it won't happen on its own, you have to consciously remind yourself to stand straight with good posture. I found good YouTube videos on how to correct  excessive anterior pelvic tilt (APT), look it up! At first, as you experience, it'll feel like shit: changing your lower back position will get your neck out of alignment. You'll then have to correct your neck posture, and so on... 

It took me 2-3 months to adopt a subconscious proper form, so worth it.If your goal is get more pull ups, you should be fine with doing them almost every day as long as you don't feel pain the next day.

If your primary goal is to increase reps or hit a certain amount then I would def. recommend doing it at least 5x days a week minimum.  Pull ups are generally slow to progress but it all depends on the individual.  How long did it take you to get to 3/3/3?Routine looks pretty good man, I'd say you could throw in some BW pull ups and dips in there too, maybe on Tues and Thurs?

Maybe include a few more ab exercises such as hanging leg raises or windshield wipers.  Can't hurt to have some sprints in your workout too.

Throw in some skill work (handstand progression, Planche progression variations, back lever progression, front lever progression) and you're all set.https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uXjeWYMfjTQYou do know this is one of those motivational / progression type videos right?  

Regardless of whether those are legit pull ups the guy is pretty strong.YesWhy didn't I think of that ha. So it seems I push-up about 70kg. Don't see myself pressing 70kg tho. Or maybe I should try first.And while you do this, watch for any sign of tendonitis.  If you can only do sets of 3, they may be high intensity for you.  If you get some elbow soreness, not a problem, but if it starts to persist or become a burning, back it off.The "planche" is in the default details template:

**Goal: Vague or specific (get bigger? Or master a planche by December?)**

I only do planche leans for like 5 min anywayWould you happen to know of a good video of this exercise?I found support holds to be super rough on my elbows, so I kinda skipped them.  I'm not worried, because I never plan on doing planche.

All that being said, start with ring pushups.  Learning to turn them out at the top of each rep wol give you a massive chest pump, as well as allow you to conquer the instability of the rings.

Ring dips have a very quick learning curve.  I went from 1-8 in a couple weeks, because I literally just needed to learn to handle the instability.  But you need a surplus of strength to begin with.  If you can't do multiple P bar dips you're not going to get your first ring dip.

To clarify: I find ring dips easier than p bar dips.  But when you first start doing them, they are much much harder.  I know you don't have the equipment available to build up your p bar dips before jumping on the rings, but ring Pushup progressions should do you just fine.Thank you for fixing that.**Just in case someone wants to read it :)**

I have been working out consistently for years but not just calisthenics. Most of 2014 I spent doing 5x5 stronglifts with weighted pullups/dips. A couple months back I decided to go back to body weight exercise to freshen things up and maybe help lean out. 

I've also been eating a mostly paleo diet while also doing intermittent fasting. While I've leaned out a decent amount my weight hasn't really changed much for some reason. I do however weight down lots of my movements so it's not pure bodyweight. My routine is essentially the beginner routine Mon/Wed/Fri. I do 3 push, 3 pull moves instead of 2 of each because I have the extra time and I seem to handle it well. Rest days I do the skill work. I'll swing kettlebell for 10 to 20 minutes after my routine everyday for cardio endurance.

Right now this is what I'm doing Mon/Wed/Fri: 

* weighed pull ups 3 of 5 to 8 reps depending on how heavy I'm weighing. 

* Weighted dips 3x5 to reps. 

* Weighted pistols 3x5 to 8 reps. 

* L sit holds (very beginning progression I suck at these). 

* Bodyweight tuck rows 3x8

* one arm push ups 3x5 to 8 reps (gradually elevating legs for more resistance). 

The extra moves are assisted one arm pull up which I use a towel with. I can do 3x 8 reps with a towel but without it I can barely do one. Thinking about weighting these as well but sure if it will help. And my last movement is handstand pushup up to 3x8 reps. I like to weigh the movement s because it builds more strength but I suspect it's keeping my weight from going down. 

I guess it isn't really and issue because I'm not really fat at all, just figured due to my diet my actual weight number would have dropped much more by now (I'm 5ft8 174ilb). Should I be doing this much weighted stuff or should I do other things to make these exercises harder? Anything else wrong with this routine?

TL;DR: I'm dieting and doing weighted calisthenics in hopes of having better control of my body weight without the weights.not really losing much weight despite diet. Need to know whether I should stop weighing my stuff or change anything else in my routine.It's true I find a greater level of ROM if I stretch after I'm warm.  But if I stretch at the end of a workout I'm all tight from residual muscle tension, so I can't access the same ROM I can at the start of my workout.  At this point, I'm trying to get as deep into my stretches as I can.  After I hit my flexibility goals, I'll work on doing the same thing under more difficult conditions.If you've leaned out and your weight hasn't changed you're literally building muscle and losing fat at the same time.

You're living the dream bro.  Keep it up!Sorry about the wall of text. I typed this on a phone.&gt;What weight should I use for bench press, to equal a pushup?

Do a push up on your scale.I have no idea what degree of power is lost if you start with static stretching. I would guess it's a marginal amount. However, I prefer static stretching with warmed up muscles. If there's one thing I've learned, it's to not force a planned workout when there's a fuck about session in progress.

Fuck about sessions are amazing, and one of the best bonding experienced you can have with your bros.  you get to see how you all measure up to eachother strength wise and try out new exercises you might not have done otherwise.

Treat it like a one off special occasion and go ham.  Have fun with it. yoy can always go back to your structured training later, and missing one day isn't going to hurt in the long run.Can also confirm, my hammies are huge and I still have plenty of room to progress natural leg curls without adding any weight.I cant do either deadlift or squats because i have problems with my back, i was strongly advised not to to them. However, i can do anything else. And believe me when i tell you ive made super good gains, aesthethics, and strength wise.Dude Rock climbing is going to do so much more for you than trampolining.As far as aesthetics, it's ~90% diet. Get really lean, then bulk a bit, and doing just the beginner routine from this sub will be plenty. You can look like a fitness model if you eat perfectly.* I plan deloads every 4-6 weeks when its convenient.
* I find myself MUCH stronger after a deload
* I generally still run and some skill work if i'm not deloading because i'm too busy
* I usually just do some short work on easy progressions or i don't workout at all if i'm deloading because life is getting in the way (vacation, something comes up, etc.) Just looked that shit up.  It could cause you a lot of trouble with advanced calisthenics.  Depending on the severity of your condition you may not be able to achieve the perfect body line during handstands, so that will limit you somewhat.What do you do for your leg work?Human flags are an excellent spinal erector exercise.  Combine those with Glute ham raises and you should be able to do a pretty awesome pull from the floor on your first try.

Don't worry bro, bodyweight lends itself to a more athletic look than weights anyway.  You won't miss out on anything.Do your bodyweight workout at the gym. Simple.I would bro but frankly they wouldn't be impressive.  At the end of the day, I'm only one year into this.  I went from really skinny-fat to slightly fit but you won't see any shocking progress.  I however can tell a big difference.  Also, since with me it isn't all about the beach body I am still a pasty-white hairy dude in my 30s.  I figure in 4 years I might hit that "wow" type of progress.Oh. This is actually the video that inspired me to get started about 2 months agoI basically did chinups until I got to 3x8 and then transferred to 3x5 pullups. I am now at 3x6 pullups as progress is alot slower after the noob gains haha.
shit, how have I never seen these before?Why do you care? U mirin some kid's gains?I'm also pretty sure that cheaper than iron and able to use similar plans would be to replace PVC with wood, and just create anchor holes for the supports into the base so that tear down is still a possibility.  A few anchor pins can hold things securely in place, but putting it together may be a pain if humidity fluctuates too much and causes expansion.  Properly built with supports, though, a wooden rigging system wouldn't add too prohibitively to the cost, and would still allow sturdy support and easy teardown. 

Then again, I've been working out on SCH 80 PVC for quite a while, so long as the pipe doesn't become brittle, and body weight isn't too high, the danger isn't high.  If you are willing to accept the risks like I am, my advice is to always start every workout by load testing the pipe.  Just put a bit of body pressure on it bit by bit, if you hear crackling from the pressure, its getting brittle, don't work out on it, and replace it.  Know your risks and accept them on your own.Personal anecdote for you: I'm female (in case that matters) and had decent posture, I thought. I had back surgery for some ruptured lumbar disks 5 years ago and after recovery, got busy losing weight and exercising to hopefully help prevent any future problems (my back is kind of a mess). I did bodyweight for my strength training, mostly because I was so afraid of reinjuring my back with weights. So, I can't compare weight training because I've never done it but bodyweight fitness has improved my posture and balance and improved the severe strength imbalances I had in my legs (one has a lot of nerve damage from the disk issue). My whole adult life I have measured 5',6" but after about 2 years of bodyweight exercises, I measured 5',7" at my last two doctors appointments. I questioned this and measured at home too. Yep, I stand a whole inch taller now. My posture was clearly not as good as I thought it was.I have some slight anterior pelvic tilt however, when I started the beginners routine, It has been getting progressively better over the months, just my experience though.Awesome, thanks for the thorough answer.Thanks. Sometimes I forget that people have other goals.I'm not super concerned with a 1-3% decrease in power generation.  I'm hardly training near my 1RM anyway.I'm pretty sure that stuff still screws into eachother in the same way.  The main problem using galvanised pipe is that it's really expensive.It certainly helped me! Others have commented here with advice so I'm just going to leave an anecdote: last year I had the opportunity to meet with a bunch of friends who I hadn't seen in about a year and a half. I had been doing the startbodyweight.com routine for a couple of months, and pretty much everyone asked me if I was taller. I did not grow a single centimeter, it was just better posture (and I think having broader shoulders make you look taller).

I've also eliminated my back pain and shoulder pain from using a computer all day.Working out in general has improved my posture tremendously. You force yourself to use good form while lifting or performing other exercises, and in time it helps you keep that form throughout the day. Currently in the process of a Back Lever article :)Also, the little rental stand right there sells chalk which comes in real handy. Can confirm, have been doing natural hamstring curls for the better part of a year, people tell me my legs look like tree trunks.That is not true.  It is not water weight like what they say, but you do need to consume enough water to not get dehydrated.  I also would not recommend creatine in pill form, as I've heard bad things from it.  And I have never lost much, if any, weight after stopping creatine intake.  And to clarify - take it post-workout.  Pre-workout won't have the strength/size effects that you want, as it is used for endurance (kind of confusing, but taking it before working out is supposed to help you workout longer, along with the stimulants in it).That sounds tight! I may be there in a few weeks time. Next week, I may be at an ANW event in San Antonio, but the following week I'll probably be free.Check out [Strength Unbound](http://www.strengthunbound.com). This guy doesn't use weights except for dumbbells when doing pistols I believe. He also hangs out on this subreddit sometimes as /u/waldo56.
Check out his comment on this very subject [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/bodyweightfitness/comments/28mwy9/a_general_comparison_of_pistols_to_barbell_squats/cicgpts)yes, thank you :)yes, thank you :)I do presses and HS balancing pretty much everyday as a work capacity kind of thing. Probably should have mentioned that I already have the straddle planche for 2 seconds, I'm just looking to improve it, and 5 seconds seemed like a solid benchmark for 4 months.   

Edit: Also I just saw your post, you're strong as fuck man. When did you start training for OAHS?Hooray for cholesterol!

I supplement with eggs, tuna, and peanutbutter. I like this idea a lot. Will try implementing thisI mix and match, I do pullups to failure and then finish my set to 8 with negatives. It's been working well to get me close to 3x8 real pullups quite fast, I've gone from all negatives to 3 pullups per set in just over a week. 

Mind you, my lats and traps have felt like a forest fire. Do handstand pushup progression (pike pushups, box pike pushups and so forth) as well as ring support hold. This should get you triceps to the point that you can do ding rips.

You can also do normal dips between 2 chairs.If you mean by 0:56 then no those arent proper pull ups.I mean at the start, when he mostly just moves up a few cm with his body not with his back and arms. 
I skimmed and didn't see many pullups. Saw some kipping muscle ups and some archer pull ups. But not really any pull ups. He did this thing where he moves his feet around while he's doing a pullup like he's walking. That was controlled. What do you mean by this?Thanks, but you should be telling him, not me. ;-)

I'm into calisthenics and gymnastics, not weightlifting.damn this looks sweet but no android version :(That mostly depends on diet, you got your back checked by a doc or? If you do heavy compounds with proper form you should not have any pain unless its first time you touched the barbell but then its soreness.See a physiotherapist.

It's unlikely anyone here can help you properly, a physio will find things you would never have guessed about, imbalances and such you would never have considered.If you add in natural hamstring curls you'll be fine for a long time from an aesthetics perspectiveDo pyramid method for pull ups and yea do negatives too, when you get to 15-20 consecutive pull ups then you can start adding weight unless endurance is your goal.Make sure you go easy playing tramp dodgeball. I threw my shoulder out years ago throwing those damn gator balls as hard as I could. It is satisfying nailing a bratty, Bieber hair cut teenager in the face, but the months it took to get my shoulder back to 100% probably wasn't worth it.

On topic: jumping, flipping, and twisting are good for your core strength and agility. Do 100 back flips in a tramp session and you're core will be sore for sure, possibly your legs too, depending.&gt;mostly just an excuse to play dodgeball 10 feet above the ground

That one.dope,  I'm down south.  Wednesday there's a group of parkour/gymnasts/acroyogis/acrobats who get together at Platinum Gymnstics up north.  $10 open gym from 8-10.  I won't be there tonight, but maybe in the future we can meetup.  How? Increase volume. More negatives? Great. More pull ups? Awesome. Added another set? Good for you! Squeezed a 5 lb weight between your knees? You're a champion! 

Just every week or two add a little bit more and you'll get better. Saying you want a plance and a tuck front lever is kind of like wanting a 405 pound squat and a 95 pound bench press. A tuck front lever should only take a few weeks to months, a plance is many many months to years...
But I do agree with everyone who said there's no reason not to start working on the appropriate progressions now. also try pushups on rings, you need a lot more tension in your whole body, specially shoulder. could help for ring dips.this.  food primarily.  Thanks for the feedback.  I think we probably will end up going on a Saturday to play some dodgeball - don't think I want to actually work through one of their structured fitness classes though.  An hour is a pretty long hike to do something on a semi-regular basis, especially when we have a pretty awesome rock climbing gym about 15 minutes away.  I made a post a few days ago somewhat chronicling my experience with posture issues. Maybe it will help you

https://www.reddit.com/r/Fitness/comments/2v9ewf/a_n00bz_collected_knowledge_on_squats/Cool down for what?I prefer having a couple inches from the wall when doing stomach to wall and even back to wall. I find that I'm able to open my shoulders a bit more and I have a little more play room in finding that sweet spot for sticking the FSHS. Mr. /u/AmazingEmmet recommends for endurance -- 60 second holds stomach to wall for 4 rounds. This topic has come up quite a bit these past couple weeks. Do a search for "journal" or "log" and they'll pop up.I saw my GP today. He says it's tendonitis and put me on steroids for the next 2 weeks (I'm allergic to NSAIDs). I'm going to rest my shoulder for another week or two, but once this injury is resolved, what are some good alternatives to dips? 

I'm assuming dips caused the problem but I'm also wondering if it could be diamond pushups. I recently added them to my workout and can quite easily do 3x10&gt;Do trampoline gyms provide an effective bodyweight workout?

Nope. It's fun cardio though. Most people don't find cardio fun so...

If you're weak then it will probably strengthen some of stuff like jiro jiro is saying, but there's not much that will make you significantly stronger or bigger.From what I've observed in my life and from my friends - an hour away means you won't go.

Great write up. I usually deload every 4 weeks. I don't worry about "losing strength" during a deload, cause that's literally not going to happen just cause I took a week off. If anything, I come back super strong.  I just focus on doing yoga and walking and swimming or riding my bicycle during the deload.Food.

Greek yogurt. Cottage cheese. Other cheese. Whole milk. Meat. Nuts. I should eat more beans.

I try to make sure that every time I snack on something, other than just a straight up fruit or vegetable, it has protein.I like doing the [Landmine Press](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=jCfcGei-NqM).  You can do it kneeling as well.  I also like [Anti-Rotation Barbell Rainbows aka landmine ab exercise](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=nk7RksvqGQs).  I would also consider doing [Romanian Deadlift](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=JCXUYuzwNrM) for additional leg work.  Finally, instead of doing just back squats, try doing [front squats](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vzVCqLyGVd0)

I would consider these exercises all supplemental work and not direct replacements as others have mentioned the main lifts for thoseAnyone follow a deload regime for the beginners' workout?
I've endured only two weeks and feel like I might already be ready.The only real way to get shredded. You thought it was a coincidence that it's called *trampolean*?  
  
On the real though, you won't get stronger by much. Good cardio, though.Meat and fish.I replied to parent but I'll say it to you too. In your case the problem is most definitely shoulder strength and that's okay - it'll come with time. But for now you should try and do them on your knuckles or fingers and try to keep your legs up, straight and toes pointed. 

The butt is now behind your shoulders but you'll naturally bring it forward/straighten your back as you get better at the position.

I really don't recommend using books or anything like that because it allows you to cheat with height/shoulders.

Btw about the hostile community - that's just Phi - he's "Mean Mod" for a reason - helpful but too honest sometimes. It's all with good intentions though... I hope.If anyone's interested, here's my workout log from Saturday:

    At gym:
    
    3x5 @ 75 lb             High bar back squat, ATG.
    1x5 @ 150 lb            Deadlift.

    20+25                   RTO support.
    Ad lib                  German hang practice - feet on floor.

    6+6+6                   Horizontal rows, pull-up grip. Feet on upright box, high bar.
                              Chest to bar. (Last rep doesn't count method) :)
    6+6+6                   Rings pushups, straps stay behind shoulders. :)

    20+20+20+20             Tucked l-sit. (2min set-to-set)

    3/1+3/1+2/4             Chinups/negative chinups. Deadhang, chest to bar.
    4/0+4/0+3/3             Dips/negative dips.

    At home: 
    Ad lib                  Lying straddle leg raises (MN/PE2 prep). No jefferson curls.
    Ad lib                  Compression - straight leg and straddle.

    60s starting stretching + Shoulder dislocates (10 over 10 under).

    Notes:

    * Putting down the bar for deadlift didn't feel good. Investigate form.
    * Squat/deadlift much more draining this time.
    * Holy shit L-sit still hard as fuck.
    * My body felt lighter than it ever has when doing dips :)
    * Straddle compression is fucking tough.
I'm just going to cover the lack of muscle since I have recent experience with it. I was purely sedentary for years, so much of my muscle atrophied, combined with malnutrition it left me at 5' 9" and 98 ibs. I was stick like. 

I can assure you that if you put forth the effort and EAT PROPERLY your initial gains will astound you. It's something we call noob gains. I started a 5k training program and a month later my calves are 3x larger. 3 weeks of bodyweight exercises(beginner routine) and I'm firming up all over. This doesn't mean my muscles are good, just means they're increasing in mass. They'll slow down and then become better at lifting weight while not increasing mass as much if I just keep at it. 

I agree that you should definitely consult a physician before taking on a new routine, especially in your current condition. 

Lastly and most importantly:  
Nobody that belongs in this subreddit is going to react with disgust. You obviously have issues, but you didn't give up and have the capacity to improve. All fitness and anxiety levels are welcome here. great tip regarding 4th &amp; Bay. also, if you get down there early enough, the meters are free and the rings are unused for the most part.I've been trying to deload about one week out of each month. Usually these correspond with "life deloads" - when I'm visiting my girlfriend, etc.

I can definitely feel when my body is ready for a deload - when I'm sticking to my schedule and hitting all of my workouts, by the 3rd or 4th week of this I'll feel some systemic fatigue accumulating: usually I'll notice it as:

1. Stalling or regressing on one or two of my exercises.
2. Markedly decreased performance on endurance holds.
3. A little bit of twingeyness in my elbows at the very end of my workout.

Luckily, after a deload week all of these symptoms go away. I don't know if I'm stronger per se, but I'm able to continue where I left off with improved energy and momentum.

As for what to do during a deload, ideally I try to follow my normal schedule, but doing everything at a much reduced volume. Unfortunately, because my deloads are scheduled to coincide with life events, I often will only get one such workout in during the week, so it's mostly a rest week.Yeah.. 174 reach at 179 height here and his arms are definitely not too short(my arms are ~5cm above butt/chair line) as I can hold a flat hand L-sit just fine. 

But if I get on my fingers my back is straighter and I find it more comfortable, so I wouldn't just flat out say "your arms are not too short". 
If I find someone with shorter than average arms I would make them do L-sits on fingers/knuckles as opposed to flat hand just to be sure that length is never the limiting factor.

That being said it made me try V-sit faster so I can do V/L-sit -&gt; handstand transition (I have to hunch a bit to squeeze my legs cause handstand on my fingers is scary and I do them flat hand).Neat, you one of the regulars?You could do the same design but way sturdier if you find the right lengths of galvanized pipe.

edit: couldn't be taken down easily though. nevermind.you should see a physiotherapist, they'll be able to diagnose which muscles are tight and weak and will give you exercises to help correct posture. 

sitting infront of a computer for long hours typically gives a 'poking chin' posture which usually means sternocleidamastoid (amongst other muscles) is tight. [here](http://www.dynamicchiropractic.com/mpacms/dc/article.php?id=15253) is a fairly food introduction on it.

the article mentions deep neck flexor strengthening. but it doesnt seem to be a particularly good way. doing an exercise using a pressure biofeedback device is more beneficial. and [this](http://www.physio-pedia.com/Deep_Neck_Flexor_Stabilisation_Protocol) website is extremely informativeUsually I just let the "deloads" happen when I skip a workout for weekend travel about every 4th week. Most often this means I do Monday, Wednesday, then skip Friday and come back Monday. Is 5 days from Wed. to Mon. enough of a break to function as a deload?

go see a physio.

I don't think I've got anything as bad as the pictures when I googled "lumbar lordosis" but I have got bad posture.  Stuff on here helps but only in a fairly general way.  Going to a professional who can specifically identify what is wrong and give you some daily exercises is the best option.  I wish I'd done it years ago!

It's incredibly complex as pretty much every posture issue is not local to where you see the problem.  i.e. you see curved lower spine, but it's probably your hips, ribs and spine that are the problem.  Then the reason your hips are out of whack can be because of anything from the bottom of your foot and up, and so on.  It's a whole body issue

as for the self-consciousness... no-one looks at you in the same detail you do.Good tip, I always park in the lots and walk down which takes about the same amount of time.My posture improved with some of the exercises in "Foundation" by Eric Goodman, though admittedly I did not stick to it and I am no expert.  BW exercises like the L-sit and planks also helped me with my posture (L-sits helped me body-sense how I could lengthen my spine, and planks will strengthen what I think is the core).[This](http://muscleevo.net/calorie-deficit/) balanced write-up of a study shows that it's possible, especially if overweight or a noob.  

Also, you're the one making ridiculous overarching claims.  The burden of proof is on you, you jamoke.I had an arch in the lower back and the back of my neck and both of 'em got fixed after I started working out(not the beginner routine, but I believe any good workout would fix your posture).

The best part of my posture fixing has been my shoulders, they're so fkin awesome naturally and I don't even try to "square" them, people keep asking if I go to gym.This is a terrible argument from a logic standpoint. If the price value proposition of a gb seminar isn't high enough for you to consider it valuable then cool, don't attend. Why take it personally?Go 5x5 with bench, OHP, Squat and Row. Only deadlifts are 1x5, when you cant lift the same weight after deloading and 3 workout sessions then you drop it to 3x5 (all lifts) check here for more info:

http://stronglifts.com/5x5/6'4", 205 lbs here.

I run into the same problems, even if I use .8 grams/lb of body weight it is HARD to hit my protein macro without powders.Yet you dont have any studies proof about it, its broscience...Think of it this way: You get stronger, and your muscles grow (if your diet is up to it) when you are in *recovery*. If it takes 24-48 hours for your muscles to fully recover, and you re-stress them after 23 or whatever, you really don't achieve any benefit whatsoever. Except maybe mentally from the good feeling you get from working out. 

If you work out too soon you basically restart the recovery cycle and negate the first workout. But if you actually allow yourself to recover you reap the benefits of the first workout, second workout, and all subsequent workouts. 

Allow yourself to recover, even if you're pumped and want to be strong all the time.

[This](http://i.imgur.com/evJGKEN.jpg) was included in today's Concept Wednesday post. 

[This](http://www.mariliacoutinho.com/wp-content/uploads/2014/10/idealcurve.gif) is theoretically what should happen with a properly structured routine that allows adequate recovery. The [opposite](http://assets.sbnation.com/assets/193031/overtraining.gif) is (again, theorhetically) what would happen if you train the same movements/muscles too often; you don't recover fully and you get a negative feedback loop. That's "overtraining." 

And waiting [too long](http://assets.sbnation.com/assets/193023/supercompensation.gif) basically means you never progress.

The recovery times are highly dependent on the individual and the training stimulus. 24 hour or 48 hours isn't a hard rule, just a rule of thumb. Every other day for the same movement/muscle group, maybe every two days, and from what I've read it seems that every 5 days is the *most* time you want to leave.

You'll see some people who suggest training hard every day, even this sub, but they seem to be the exception rather than the rule.Do you have the carry bag for it as well? Is it easy to take down and set up again? I live in an apartment and this seems like a perfect thing to slide under the bed when not using, take on vacation, or take outside on nice days.1. Yes, when you can one handed hang from the 5cm handles will be a perfect time. Also, if you stall out for a while, you can use that as an excuse to switch things up.  
2. Thickbar training is a bit different, kinda similar to deadlifts in how a body responds to it. Doing high intensity for low reps, you just get fried after a while... it creeps up on you. You get an intense pump if you do low intensity for many reps. Takes long to heal too.  
3. If you feel like your grip is healed on friday, you can climb. Healing time will decrease next time, since your body is used to it.  
4. Great question. Thickbar and ADM holds would take the longest to heal, so I would recommend one of those. If you climb every week, that should come first or should replace one of the exercises.  
5. The PVC itself will roll so the bar's rolling doesn't matter much.Sweet.Being thin has nothing to do with your posture, and having thin wrists is fine, nothing you could be concerned about.

My approach to diet and exercise, which I believe that would be beneficial to you, is that it's just another part of your life, like work, pooping or sleeping. Whenever I eat, I estimate roughly how much I should eat and what kinds of foods; for example, I figure a slice of pepperoni pizza has about 350kcal, so if I'm trying to lose fat, I limit myself to two slices. If I want to gain muscle, I'd eat three, and it has plenty of protein due to cheese. I exercise a few minutes after I wake up as part of my daily routine. I do have goals that I wish I could nail right now, but everything is fine as long as there's continuous progress.

The point is, just make diet and exercise an enjoyable part of your normal life, and as long as there's constant progress you'll get to where you want to be, so it's definitely not hopeless.

You should go check yourself with a doctor though, since you said your right and left side look different on the mirror.
ATX! Let's start a group here sometime, I live on the east side and have a friend or two over for gymnastics and grip every thursday.Go to the santa monica rings (the original muscle beach) in Santa Monica, just south of the Santa Monica pier. (Not the venice muscle beach.)

If you don't wanna pay meters ($2/hr) or the lots ($8/day), and don't mind a 10-15 minute walk, park on 4th and bay street (on 4th, anywhere east of pico) in the residential area there and walk to the rings.Wait until my breathing is less heavy. Smoke a bowl. Shower.Yeah, it's pretty strong.  I am 6'4" and 210lb and have no issues at all.  Very light as well.  Solid for pullups and hanging rings from.  I have it indoors, so I have never attempted a muscle up.These are the basics, as far as makes sense to me:

- Handstand push up &gt; overhead press
- Push up &gt; bench press
- Bodyweight rows &gt; barbell rows
- Bodyweight squats/pistols &gt; barbell squats

Pull ups don't have a barbell equivalent. Dips don't have an equivalent. But you can add weight to either. I typically deload every 5th week. I keep my number of training sessions the same, but I only do 1-2 sets of each exercise. I have found that continuing to move with just less volume makes the transition back to the regular volume much smoother.You've taken the first step, so good job on that! There's some good advice here. Start with whatever seems manageable - a daily walk, a short routine of some exercises. Just start! Also, please consider finding a Feldenkrais class, in addition to whatever you decide to do to build muscle. The classes can be done by anyone and will allow you to reform your movement habits. You'll learn that your brain/nervous system is actually your best ally, improve your posture, and develop a habit of improvement that will serve you in all sorts of cool ways. Best of luck!From his description, I don't think so.I use pen and paper on a ruled notebook. I divided the page into days, like a calendar (good for weekly scheduling and calling yourself out on any missed days) and record workouts using my own shorthand code that no one else would ever understand. Not that I don't want them to, I'm just saving time and paper space. One regular school notebook lasts me several months up to a year and is great for reviewing progress. Though I need to get more disciplined about setting rep goals and progression goals.I'm logging on paper in the gym as I go, then keeping track long-term with a free app called FitNotes (Android).  Works for me!To add on to this, foam roll. You'll correct a lot of posture problems by loosening up all your tissues. You can just foam roll your entire torso, and that should help with the issues, but I agree with /u/abdada below, check with a doctor. You don't want to injure yourself rolling out a genetic disorder.A lot of what you're saying seems focused on the body (and it looks like people are offering some very good advice from that angle), but I also just wanted to chip in and remind you not to forget your mind.

Issues like self-image, confidence, self-love are psychological, and while getting your body in better shape can certainly help you there, it's very hard to fix the mind with the body alone.

As you work to achieve your physical goals, remember to set some time and energy aside to work on your thoughts and mindset as well.  

Best of luck!I can second this, if you hang from a bar every day for 7 minutes total across sets it does wonders.
I'm going to start again next week once I finish this training cycle.Rings Turned Out: http://antranik.org/support-hold/I live in the area. Swift Cantrell also has workout stations, pullup bars, dip bars etc. It's set up for the general person, and as such is a little tightly packed, but definitely more than enough. Going before 3 o clock on the weekdays is the best for not having to many people nearby. 


You will also be near stone summit the indoor rock climbing gym, and if you have a car there is a specific ninja warrior gym about 45 minutes north. http://lilburnflexfitgym.com/

Have fun!Seems like a pricey alternative to two chairs. I like rings better for a doorway pullup bar accessory as they're way more versatile.&gt;lumbar lordosis

Have you had any scans to confirm whether this is an actual bone issue?

Pilates might be a good option to consider if you're having trouble with other exercise forms...&gt;For example, you get more protein from an egg than from a powder-  
This is not true. An egg has 6 grams of protein. 1 scoop (roughly 1/8 of a cup, IIRC) of most protein powders has 18-24g of protein. I would suggest yoga - start with 5 sun salutation A's every morning.

This will not immediately address your concerns, but I think you'll find over time that it will begin to correct them.Cool. Is it sturdy enough? Seems like it might be a tad flimsy for heavy stuff like muscle ups.I use a door frame-mount pull-up bar, and attach one of these for dips:  http://amzn.to/16S2ub1I let deloads happen. When I have tried to plan them I invariable either have to deload early or arrive when I should deload and feel I can push for another week or two. I don't know my body intuitively enough to predict deloads before I feel beat up. 

My workouts look a bit different at the moment as I am on a push/pull split for the first time ever and using weights more than in the past. My approach to deloading on the new workout is going to be to drop volume and maintain intensity for a week or week and a half. 

I think that when my pull-ups hit 15kg for 5 x 5 mid next week I will do three workouts of 1 x 5 to give my body chance to recover while not dropping strength. This will be a partial deload as I will only be significantly dropping the volume on that exercise. It is the only part of my workout where I am really pushed up against my limits to recover at the moment. OHP (10kg with a DB at the moment) is hard to get through but I recover from this fine. 

I am also trying to improve my sleep, eat more (getting back into the habit of breakfasting) above all protein, and I just bought some vitamin d and fish oil as I think they will both have good health benefits for me. Basically I am upping my general recovery game too. 

In the past, when I was doing purely bodyweight stuff, typically I would gradually build up the volume, feel beat up and then take a week off and go do something else (hiking, etc). This worked really well for a year or so and I saw solid progress when my training was consistent.I was obviously over estimating the number (although big guys 200lbs+ would need it), but the point still remains that it's hard to eat so much and easier/cheaper with powder. :)Hanging from a bar has done a lot for me. Nothing fancy or complicated, just loosening tight shoulders.Yeah... that doesn't prove your statement ("you cant lose fat and gain muscle at the same time").  You can, it's called a recomp.  You're not converting fat into muscle, but you burn fat while also building muscle. I use a Google spreadsheet. Basic form...



Exercise | Progression | Rep Goal | Reps Performed | Notes
---|---|----|----|----
Handstand Pushup | Wall Bent Waist Handstand Push Ups | 4/4/4 | 4/4/4 | 

It makes for a rather long-form log that I archive about once a month, and I could condense it, but personally I do find the rep goal being there helpful.
[This](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PExMvVPSfeo) video really helped meI think it is largely cheaper because it is a mixture of different proteins and soy is cheap. Apparently it doesn't dissolve as well, that won't be an issue for me as it'll go in my daily "pancake" but if you're drinking it then it may not be so nice. 

Honestly, this is the first time I have seen protein powder that is a sensible price. Even on Amazon.it most of it cost about 20-30/kg. I can buy steak for that kind of money!!Trampolines are great for handstands/handstand shrugs.
Glad to be of assistance. &gt; Eat everything for your goal weight, not your current weight. 

Thanks for clearing that up!&gt; Let me add that creatine and glutamine are very good in gaining strength/size.

I thought that size increases partly because creatine lets your muscle cells hold more water and that size goes down somewhat (but not all the way) during the off-cycle? I'm not trying to say it's bad, just find out what the truth is (the internet seems pretty scarce on treating creatine neutrally... it's either a miracle or the devil to most people). I've been to the trampoline park near me and I thought it was a great place for a workout.  You aren't really going to get much upper body, although I usually find my lats/delts/traps tired from swinging my arms and it's great cardio.  The place near me has a huge foam pit next to some of the trampolines which is great for learning your first flips too.

I don't really play dodgeball or use their basketball hoops.  I just like to throw flips on the trampoline floor and try out new skills over the foam pit.  It's definitely worth a go if you want to see what it's like.Posture is complicated. Luckily for you there is an entire sub /r/posture. It's a combination of weakness and tight muscles  from your neck down through your thighs. 

Look up anterior pelvic tilt and cross syndrome. It will take time to correct. 

Edit: just read your edit and watched the vid. Pre existing shoulder injury complicates the picture. The problem with rehab could be that the PT wasn't very good or you were not a good patient. Most of the rehab happens on your time, not in the PT's office. 

If you stand, flex your ass and squeeze abs, you may notice the arch in your back/belly pooch disappear. It looks like anterior pelvic tilt. While you may need professional help with sorting out your upper back related postural issues(limitations of shoulder), you might be able to work on strengthening/limbering the appropriate pelvic/thigh muscles. Since you withheld the shoulder history, you might not be telling us about other problems that might complicate lower body work. Swift-Cantrell park has a big skate park and playground. You could probably get it done there if you are creative.Thanks! I'd been wondering if all my fiddling was contributing to my stagnation or not... I had been following CC, but the rep ranges are too damn high. I need a better progression plan.

PS, maybe posting some before and after pics will keep the haters at bay?There's another thread about this on our front page right now, check it out:

http://www.reddit.com/r/bodyweightfitness/comments/2vfav8/journaling/Its recommended that you start with dynamic stretches and finish with statics. Getting too loose can decrease power generation. That's what I've read at least. &gt; Is that your routine only 2 days a week cause if it is then its bad

No it's the same exercise every other day. Part of my question is, if that's too much. Especially training legs 3.5x a weekI'm trying to avoid for mounted pull up bars because, as far as I know, I won't be able to do muscle ups. I also would like something portable so I can set it up outside when the weather is nice. Wow that's awesome! Thanks for the links. Once I'm done with my current tub I'll give the second one a go, it seems very good.You might want to see a physician, personal trainer, or physical therapist. They can help accurately diagnose your weaknesses and provide you with specific bodyweight or weighted exercises to help address those weaknesses. Perhaps most importantly, they can help you avoid injury.

The bodyline drills in the sidebar program are great for core strength. You can search google and youtube for more progressions on those exercises if you want to make them their own routine. You probably want to add some stretching to that as well to keep your spine limber.... Yes. I had a coworker suggest textbooks under my hands. I've got plenty of those lying around!It depends on how hard you are training. In general i agree with /u/xatim that you are probably not training hard enough and would benefit from upping weight, reps per set, or reps per workout but everyone is different you have to figure it out for yourself and take care of yourself. 

However this weekend when i was resting for half marathon i did bar muscle-ups 3 days in a row, but the whole workout i did like 15-20 total reps of muscle-ups and nothing else so it was more along the lines of skill work, and when i woke up the fourth day my rear delts and lats were a little sore which normally never happens (even training close to failure). 

As a side note i think this is how olympic gymnasts can train 5 days a week on the rings. They are so strong that doing 2 second iron cross holds and other strength static positions 5-10 times a day is not anywhere near failure in each set or in total volume (failure for them would probably be more like 20s holds or 2 minutes of total hold time a session). I just put everything on a spreadsheet organized thusly:

    Date       Date
    Exercise   Exercise
    Rep/Set    Rep/Set
    Exercise   Exercise
    Rep/Set    Rep/Set

I use my phone or a piece of paper to remind myself of what I am aiming for for that workout and also to write down what I actually did.Thanks, I guess I'll just have to work on that.Bent-over rows are not painful for your back if done properly. Google it and YouTube it to see how it's done.

For bench press, use the plates you have and do 3x8. Too easy? Add more plates.

Check out /r/weightlifting.Nothing, it's additional.Amazon.de has Vanilla powder for 8.36/kg. It isn't pure whey but I don't think that overly matters. That is as low as it gets. 

Edit: http://www.amazon.de/BodyWorldGroup-Protein-Master-Muscle-Vanille/dp/B00GYFUYIS/ref=sr_1_12?s=drugstore&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1423660614&amp;sr=1-12&amp;keywords=proteinpulver

Edit2: Apparently it tastes pretty bad, this one is also quite cheap compared to the others and is probably less vile: http://www.amazon.de/Mammut-Protein-Vanille-Eiwei%C3%9Fshake-Wheyprotein/dp/B000KTM2IY/ref=sr_1_1?s=drugstore&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1423660801&amp;sr=1-1&amp;keywords=proteinpulverYou should also post in /r/atlanta probably?Check this video for posture problem: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ERjDEfO70P0

Start doing beginner routine and do this stretches after every workout and on rest days: http://phraktured.net/starting-stretching.htmlThere's no disgust in what you wrote.  It is very much the new normal.

I was never skinny-fat myself.  First I was skinny, then just fat.  Now I'm fit again.

The beginner progressions will help you get strong -- but you need to eat clean as well.  The posture should get better with strength, but it never hurts to see a doctor to make sure you don't have any birth or genetic issues to manage.

There are so many great progress photos here by regular folks who made amazing physical changes in a matter of months.  Motivation is tough to get, tho.

Remember that your brain is your worst enemy -- start a calendar for scheduling, stick to it for 6 weeks and you should also help reset your brain.Great advice, great post.Not a budget option - but I have one of these and they are fantastic:

http://trapezerigging.com/collections/free-standing-portable-pullup-barsIn the US eggs are prewashed and require refrigeration because of it.

In the rest of the world, eggs are not prewashed and are not refrigerated.  So you need to wash them first.My diet has been pretty flawless, and that's made a huge difference.  I eat the same breakfast lunch and snacks each and every day, with dinner being the only variance.  I don't track calories each day because there is so much consistency, but I know exactly what those snacks and meals generate in terms of calories.  

I also make sure I get a tight 8 hours of sleep every night. Every single night.  If I miss out on sleep, I can't hit my dietary goals.  I just lose the motivation.  You might take a look at your sleep and see if it helps your diet.  Remember that willpower is a finite resource, and lack of sleep uses up much willpower.It definitely isn't big, but I wouldn't say I look super skinny.  Now when I weighed 160, that WAS really skinny.I'm actually not sure where I'm weak in the pull because I only started deadlifting two weeks ago. Nevertheless, I will still think about it.That's great news, online classes for UK peeps like myself are great value for money not to mention invaluable information resources :)What does deadlift replace then, squats?No bench...yet. Bent-over rows look painfull for my back?  
What weight should I use for bench press, to equal a pushup?How about diet? I literally just started the beginner routine yesterday, as the bodyweight model appeals to me. I'm pretty overweight and not terribly strong, but diet is my weakness.

What sort of dietary stuff did you have going alongside the exercise?6'6'' with 190 lbs ? That's really skinny isn't it? 

I mean I'm 6'7'' and 220 lbs which amounts to around 12% bf. 

Just checking, no judgement or anything.Hi Eguanlao, the reason I do 4 sets is simply because I have the time and I feel I can - not because its too easy at my current progression, for example for HESPU (wall assisted) its 6 reps first set, 5 reps second set, 4 3rd, 3 reps 4th.... I plan on going up to HSPU's once I can do 8,8,8 on the first 3 sets.... the 4th set is really just to push my self the extra mile :-)

I am 6 weeks in and plan to put up my before and after pictures at the 14 week mark... seeing some great progress so far and loving BWF! Wow, awesome. Thanks. :)Journaling at the begening is good .but later on you will find out that working out  and enjoying it without carring for progress will mentally release you from stressFirst post! I've been doing my own BWF stuff for about 9 months but started the Beginner Routine a couple of weeks ago because I wasn't getting good results.

**(Male, 24, 1.82m, 79kg)**

**Goal:** Good shape, solid set of handstand pushups, 6-pack

**Routine:** Beginner routine. For the pushups slot, I'm having trouble finding a good progression. I've started doing wide push ups while wearing a 9.5kg backpack. 

**Diet:** I need to up my protein intake. Read something from a mod in another thread about quark, so I'm going to the store to check that out soon.. It might be cheap in Germany. If that doesn't work I'm going to foot the bill for some supplements. 

**Energy:** My DOMS seem to be subsiding much faster now. I used to have two off days between workouts but now, for the first time, I'm going to do a workout after only one off day. I still feel like my body is kind of tired, though.

**Questions:** As mentioned, I've been doing 9.5kg backpack-weighted wide pushups for my pushup slot in the Beginner Routine. My chest has always been small so I'm trying to focus on it some more. I considered diamond pushups, but they were too easy, and I thought they probably don't hit the chest as much. Thought about chest dips also, but I already do normal dips, so would that be too much? If anyone has any suggested exercises I could do that wouldn't require added weight, they are welcome. 

Edit: Also, for legs I've been doing pistol squats, but since I can't manage to go all the way down on my left leg and still stretch my right leg way out front, I've been doing them raised on a chair, but still full range-of-motion I guess.. Is that okay?Yeah, beginner routine.  Very consistently, 3 times a week for the last year.  You get bored doing handstands?  I practice them until I have to stop for some reason...Again: I think before the deadlifts would probably be fine.  But it really depends on where you are weak during the pull.  If it's grip or glute/ham complex or even thoracic extension, doing L sits won't hold you back.

If it's core, as long as you do the L sits under the right parameters, they should actually improve your bracing as well.If by max you mean that to failure. I would only train each exercise to failure maybe once every 2 or 3 weeks.To dirextly answer your question: if you aren't doing heavy weights, i don't think you are at any great risk here although technically you are going to overtrain.

Let's flip this around.

What is your goal? Add muscle? Lose weight? Stress relief?IIRC the difference is simply that the bar gets returned to the floor after every rep.It's just a method to get more volume into a workout, particularly useful if your goal is hypertrophy.
Yep, I've been thinking about this. I might add them in after deadlifts but before the other exercises. Thanks for the input.Cheers.It's more like the other way around.  Advanced (professional) gymnasts will train like 8 times a week.  I've heard of professional handbalancers doing 10+ shows a week, and training a whole bunch of times on top of that.

Best in mind that these people don't train at their absolute limit.  It's more about repeating a skill that they can perform quite well already, or learning a new skill, or shoring up weaknesses/imbalances.  If they were training with the definite goal of increasing strength, I'm sure their training would be structured differently.  So it's more like their monstrous strength is a  *byproduct*  of their extreme work capacity.Thanks for the tips! Did you do the beginner routine? If so, for how long?Pendlay rows are much better then bent-over.What about shoulders? Is that your routine only 2 days a week cause if it is then its bad. Key to get bigger is on diet, eat 500 calories above your TDEE and you should gain 0.5kg per week. I would suggest you to start doing beginner routine from this subreddit.* HSPU progression &gt; Overhead press
* Push-up progression &gt; Bench press (got a bench?)
* Row progression &gt; Bent-over rowsThe class was more of a free for all with mainly 16-20 year old lads practicing free running. You could use what ever equipment you wanted and the people there were friendly. I'd recommend going to try it out. I enjoyed it. I wondered that also. If you are able to do 4 sets, shouldn't you progress to something more difficult?Rings Turned Out Support. It's a lot harder than a normal Ring Support and you want to be in this position at the end of every rep you do. To all those who downvote me, read this cause you guys are funny:

http://examine.com/faq/will-lifting-weights-convert-my-fat-into-muscle.html
http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/21558571The only tip I can give you is that there is tremendous progress to be made at each progression step.  If you can focus on having willful determination but not being as concerned about results, you'll find you make progress most when you aren't paying attention!  Constantly tweaking things, changing things up too much etc. always leads to stagnation for me.  And just remember, you're a big guy too so don't think the progression standards you read are gospel.From what I have heard, cardio / mobility work / extra skill work is fine to do on off-days, but not more strength work.You don't have to start at the lowest progression for anything. I believe you are supposed to find the hardest progression you can do any reps of, and then back down one step and work on that till you are comfortable with 3x8.

While working on a progression, it is ok to go for 4 or 5 smaller sets to increase volume (i.e. working up to 5x5 then 3x8).

But the important thing is that you need your rest days so your body can recover properly in between workouts.I have no idea what those second two things are...un-flavoured whey + milo + metamucil + milk FTWI use Day One. http://dayoneapp.com/cool thanks alot allwhat is rto?Thanks!nah.. quark and cottage cheese are different thingsHe oversells the program for sure. It's insane to assume that a single program will work for every adult in the world.

However, it helps for me that I don't really care if I obtain any of the fancy skills by the end. It's about the journey not the destination for me. I'm becoming stronger and more mobile and that's what I wanted. If it slows down at some point to the point where I'm not happy, I'll probably change it up.wow, thats pretty sick for 1 month progress. i envy you, dude. say, mind you reveal your secret? :)No. Quark and cottage cheese are two different things.Yeah, but then you get to go spend money on eggs or egg whites.

But more than anything when you're bulking it's easier to drink a quick glass of protein than have to make eggs and force yourself to eat them. The CC program is not that intense and definitely leaves room to learn some skill work or do another sport on the side. You do progress though. 

I used to do CC in addition to BJJ twice a week and that was a very reasonable total workload. Lately, I've had to quit BJJ and that leaves me with enough extra time and energy to try to learn some of those cool moves you can see on the bar on the top of the page. 

However, if you feel that CC is not enough for you, perhaps you should consider the reddit beginner program to the right of this page.Interesting. I thought my muscle soreness *might* come from not cooling down, but apparently I'm just very out of shape.

I wonder if instead of cooling down, you could also just put your legs up in the air on a wall for a few minutes? Generally after working out, I'm too exhausted (and lazy) to do cool down.I'm doing the beginner program, only in my second week. I can easily do some of the base moves, so starting to progress already (eg squats and push-ups), is that ok? Is the beginner routine supposed to be for people whom are starting at zero? I can only do 5 clean strict pullups/chins, so that will take a while to get to 8. Sometimes I feel like in the same day I could do another set of these moves though... Surely that is ok, so long as I'm logging this and then giving myself a rest the following day? Yah you will have to scale some of them back a fair bit, but it's definitely doable.  I recommend including some bent arm work as well tho, just for the sake of balance.Will do! Dude, you need more than a teaspoon of anything for your gainz...Do you have fists you can do your L sits on?  Worked for me before I leaned out.  I mean, it hurts, but it's easier than trying to depress your scapula....Damn, seriously? That's a lot of milk... Not sure I'd be able to stomach that every dayWell that's great - congrats. But that still doesn't mean it's going to work for every adult out there the way Sommer insists it will. There is just way too much variation, physically, among them.Alternatively, you could try for archer pullups, one hand (so grab your wrist) pullups, or muscle ups.If you do find a good place to order from, let me know! I kinda gave up trying, since they all had pretty similar, ie expensive, prices. Training fasted used to work fine for me until doing intense stuff. One session of weighted pull-ups fasted I nearly fainted. More fun than handstand push-ups?Deadlift.  There's no clear bodyweight alternative for it, so yeah, deadlift is a must.

Good mornings are sweet for mobility training, but don't go heavy on them.

learn to power clean?  Really depends how much you love your floor...

There's not much  *point* doing barbell exercises for most things, but they are fun from time to time.That's entirely possible.  Also being as tall as I am makes it difficult to measure using the mirror.  I now own calipers but I didn't at the beginning and I mean, I'm not a pro or anything.Thanks! I often get stuff from Amazon.de as it has a much better selection. Will do some homework later. In the shops protein powder here is insanely expensive. I'd end up spending about 30 a month for a daily serving, or something around that. Well, I went from no pullups to sets of 6 dead hang pullups.  

Kneeling pushups to sets of 10 ring pushups.

zero dips to being able to do ring dips and wall-supported handstand pushups.

falling on my neck to doing a handstand.

10s foot supported L-sit to 20s tuck l-sit.

other stuff like 1 arm hangs and such, but I mean for me I was impressed.Maybe.  I mean I didn't get it professionally measured, but I had to buy a whole new wardrobe.  This is designed for Sommer's to get more money off of a monthly subscription. It's the next step from the one time products sales.Try doing a [wrist warmup](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mSZWSQSSEjE) beforehand.

Also, you can alternate between doing them on your hands to doing them on a closed fist or barbells/paralettes, which changes the wrist position. If doing it on a fist, be sure to do them on a padded mat or it'll hurt a lot.I used to make a kind of pancake thing using a banana, two eggs and a handful of oats. I would flavour it with cinnamon but I guess a couple scoops of flavoured protein powder would turn out pretty tasty too. Yeah, also check the .es, .de or .fr since they list prices in euro, so you don't get screwed over with the exchange rates from the . They somehow all list different brands, so shop around. I recently found iHerb, which has lots of choice, and just placed an order, but I'm worried I will get taxed at the post office. If there's no tax it'll be much cheaper than anywhere else I could find (that ships to the EU anyway). Have you used it for cooking savory stuff? I'm wondering if I can use it for pasta as a substitute for ricotta, or even make some sort of burrito with a bunch of it inside.To be honest, when I accidentally ordered plain, I ended up using chocolate nesquik to make it palatable.

I alternate monthly between "natural banana" and "chocolate smooth" flavours from MyProtein. On their own, they can leave a nasty mouth feel from the flavouring, but when you add oats, it leaves a nice malty taste, which is much nicer.I use myfitnesspal for tracking food - the app and the site have different views, so a combination of both is handy (app is quicker for adding food with barcodes/automatic recognition of previous items and the app lets you see daily and weekly nutrition much easier).

For tracking exercise I have monthly plain text files on my dropbox; I set them up in advance on the PC and plug in the numbers while i work out - e.g. tonight's workout is planned as:


11th

handstand 

pull 

lsit (feet) 

tuck lever 

stretches

ring dips 

rows 

statics - plank, hollow, glute, super, reverse plank

planche 

legs

push Amazon.it sucks balls but I will have a look. If not I may be able to get it from the UK. There are no additional taxes between the UK and Italy. Viva la EU!

I am looking at ways to get 50g of protein for breakfast (makes getting another 100g through the day easy). Eating that many eggs makes me want to jump off my balcony. Once you start training harder progressions and leveraging your body in new ways, you'll find more stress on your tendons/ligaments is a limiting factor. You don't want to over work these or you will get injured, so take is slow.

Also, the other guys are right; if you feel OK to work out again the next day, you are not training hard enough.Did you have any luck masking the flavour in something nice? Like banging it in pancakes or something.Amazon has them, at least the .co.uk one. Also iHerb, but you may get extra taxes since it's from outside the EU.Unflavoured tastes fucking vile btw, especially mixed with water.Yes, I know what the slash means.One quick question. Is that 0.82g/lb of lean body mass or total body mass? Yes, I know what it means. I was wondering why you choose to do an extra set when the recommended number is only three. Just curious. No big deal. :-)I will have to have a closer look at the packet when I get home. Not sure if I even like it! If I do and it is reasonably priced in Italy (isn't really a big thing here) then it looks like a pretty solid breakfast option with a banana or something. If I can eat my way through half a kilo of cream cheese.

I seriously need to up my breakfast game if I am going to gain weight. This morning I had a big glass of cocoa and a coffee with cream. That is a big step up from nothing mind. Eating a lot consistently is hard :/Can we not recommend people train on pvc pipe please?  That shit explodes under pressure and fucks people up.  Worse case scenario we're talking about severed tendons and arteries.  It's not the sort of thing it's easy to come back from...Can you use a doorframe Pullup bar and a set of rings?  That shit never lets me down, as long as I can find a fucking door the bar fits in.Didn't realise unflavoured powder was a thing. Will try and see if I can get some for a reasonable price in Italy.&gt;  I think they're mainly designed as a 'Foundation trial' so to speak. If a beginner to GST wants to get into GB, but doesn't want to lay out 80 bucks for F1 plus a potential hundred more for H1, they can pay for a month or two of classes for much less.

That's exactly what it is. They said as much on their forum announcement thread.11% in weight is normal. 500 grams of quark, 45 grams of protein. Look at the macros.&gt; For what it's worth, I also know a guy who has attended 2 seminars and has been following F1/H1 religiously for almost 2 years. He still hasn't 'mastered' F1 and cannot hold a handstand for more than 4-5 seconds. This is despite his alignment being quite good - point is, there is more to learning a handstand than endless reps of mobility work.

For what it's worth, I bought F1 and H1 last September. I've mastered 4 out of 7 of the F1 elements (with approval from the GB forums) and can hold a 30s freestanding handstand even though I have yet to move off the wall in my H1 training.The Quark in my fridge is only 11% protein. I guess that isn't normal?Sorry, I was trying to be funny.

I do a fair amount of mobility work, but not at the end of my workout.  Generally I just step down the intensity of whatever exercises I'm doing, until im done.  So I might finish off with a few sets of pushups or whatever.  I do the important stuff first, so that I can pretty much skip out on the later end of my workouts if I feel like it.

I've never considered cooling down to be important.  It might have a very slight mitigating effect on DOMS or flexibility, but I doubt it.Yes lol, sorry this is what I meant.Someone would need to be over 250 lbs, lean. Not a whole lot of people.See I do all that at the start of my workout, so I can get into high flexibility strength positions better.Cottage cheese is different from quark. It has similar macros, but it is a different food.Talk to your doctor about this.This isn't bullshit at all. I'm currently 185 at ~15%, and OP's got 6" on me. I'm not big at all, so OP being a tall motherfucker, would've had virtually no muscle.Deadlift, obviously.

Overhead press is fun.He means 3 or 4 sets of 8 reps. 4L whole milk daily.Probably. If I want flavour I add it myself though.http://www.crossfitignitesydney.com.au/wp-content/uploads/2012/04/Guy-L-Sit-2.jpgOne from ON Gold, and then two local powders. I don't like them because they're so goddamn sweet, and they don't fill very well either (only time I really need extra protein is when I'm eating low-cal).I eat 500 grams of quark in a sitting, but it's often within a single meal, so I might also have other things.It's in the sidebar.jumping jacks? 

if you go hard enough I imagine you'll tire yourself out
Thanks for the update. 

I am considering doing the same for programming advice and access to the thick mats to get back tucks again.Should I be?Door mounted pull up bar and hang rings on it for dips and rowsIMO - if you feel you are capable of performing an exercise for a second day in succession - you need to re-analyze your intensity or volume or both. Esp for strength exercises like weighted dips. Work hard enough and **you will want that next day of rest**.

For beginners more rest is better. You are attempting to work opposite of reason. You are either going to burn out or get injured.Thanks for the link I'll check that out.Are you accusing me of stretching?[You don't do anything like this?](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OTmZdU93ejY)[Cool Down?](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OTmZdU93ejY)Thanks for the suggestion, but my bedroom or apartment is not that big :) - I was looking for an exercise I can do in my bedroom, right after getting up. I need this as the trigger/action routine in the morning.Perhaps I'm not using the correct term. I consider static stretching after my workout as cool down. What about something like [this](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OTmZdU93ejY)Congratulations. I don't think you're on roids, but the measurements seem off.

Maybe increased muscle mass improved your definition and "decreased" your lack of definition more than the dramatic fat loss you described?I actually found this very helpful myself. Stumbled upon it a while back. http://youtu.be/FTV6UCh-yhsOver a pound of muscle per day?  I doubt that is physically possible, even if you are juiced up to the eyeballs.Food. Any and all of itNice! You look a wee bit like superman, good jobSo - how much stronger did you get?I do all free standing work in straddle. I stack much better when closed but straddle is easier to balance. Last week was the first time my trailing arm has left the ground. Ever. Only 2-3 seconds but under control rather than a slow fall out of handstand. A very exciting time. 

Also wall runs have made the biggest improvement in my handstand strength and scapular elevation. Get on them as soon as possible.The other high intensity cardio exercise that's big around here is of course sprints. You can do those on your alternate days. You're lactose intolerant. Get lactose free stuff.It would have to fit in my living room, I live in a small one bedroom apartment. I have enough room to workout but not enough for anything that I can't put away. That looks awesome, I was looking for something like that but with a pull up bar. I think I can modify that design to fit my needs. Thanks for the link!

Alexander Technique 

1. Let go of the muscles in the back of your neck.
Your head will slightly rotate forward, and the crown of your head goes up.
Feel your sit bones go down into the chair, while the rest of you moves up. Better posture ensues.
 
2. Better Posture-Out of a slump.
To come out of a slump, release any neck tension. Head rotated slightly forward, let the crown of your head go up. Let your head lead your spine up.
In opposition to your head moving up, let your sit bones release down into the chair.
 
3. Posture, Breathing.
Slowly let your jaw open like a yawn, and make a whispered ah sound, breathing out. Think of something that will make you smile.
Then, with your lips together and teeth apart, breathe in through your nose with no sound.
Your torso expands fully.
 
4. Lessen your Tension
Let go of any extra tension in your neck and jaw.
Free your neck, slowly lower your nose. Your crown moves up.
Notice, and release tension in your neck, jaw, shoulders, and legs.
Re-release neck tension. Whisper ah.
 
5. Alexander Technique Rest Position
Take 5 or 10 minutes out of your day to lie on the floor, on your back, with your head resting on a few inches of paperback books.
Knees bent, and your feet on the floor. Release neck tension, breathe slowly and fully from the top of your chest to the bottom of your torso; front, back, and sidesI just practice until I get bored of it honestly My understanding is that Tim Ferris's gains are only possible when you are regaining muscle you have previously lost. Something he doesn't mention.Ouch. And wow. Canada is freaking huge.Chicken, beef, fish, greek yogurt, milk, cheese, turkey, shrimp, and sometimes porkI'm only doing 4 upper body exercises and sprints for legs at the moment. It's not like im doing a bunch of exercises. I don't do the sprints the same days as the routine.

Now that I think about it more, what I'm really wondering is if you can train again if you FEEL like you can, if you feel good. What if I don't feel I have to recover from yesterday's session and I feel like I can do it again today? What if I feel fresh and energized?

There are times of course where I feel I have to rest and that I shouldn't exercise. I am of course not asking if you should exercise when you feel tired and fatigued.TBH I don't see too much use for these courses for most people. I think they're mainly designed as a 'Foundation trial' so to speak. If a beginner to GST wants to get into GB, but doesn't want to lay out 80 bucks for F1 plus a potential hundred more for H1, they can pay for a month or two of classes for much less.

That said, at the promotional price of (I think, based on reading it) $5/month, there may be some useful exercises in there that are worth the five bucks. I'm as yet unsure if I'll sign up.This is correct. The post I found explaining this is 18 months old. 

Reportedly, R2+ has not been released because people haven't reached the point where they can actually use these courses yet, Movement has undergone a large amount of revision, and Stretch was not part of the series detailed in the post.

Source: https://www.gymnasticbodies.com/forum/topic/12862-the-gymnasticbodies-roadmap-and-curriculum/Have you seen the ido Portal 30 day squat challenge?  I have the same problem as you and I found my "3rd world squat" is terrible. I can't sit in it for more than a few minutes.  I cool down with Phrakture's Starting Stretching: http://phraktured.net/starting-stretching.html#####&amp;#009;

######&amp;#009;

######&amp;#009;

####&amp;#009;

**MLO Super High Protein, Plain, 16 Ounce** 

    Current  $6.00 Amazon (3rd Party New)
       High $24.01 Amazon (3rd Party New)
        Low  $6.00 Amazon (3rd Party New)

[Price History Chart](http://i.imgur.com/7cQjE6e.png) | [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/PriceZombie/wiki/index) 
[This is the protein powder I buy](http://www.amazon.com/MLO-Super-Protein-Plain-Ounce/dp/B0011DMV0M/ref=sr_1_1?s=hpc&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1423629038&amp;sr=1-1&amp;keywords=super+high+protein+powder).  It's $11 at the store while a dozen eggs are $2.  

That means the powder is 35g protein per dollar while the eggs are 36g protein per dollar.  Very little difference, and the powder has a mix of egg, milk, and soy protein (I'm not on the anti-soy brigade, YMMV) and is easier to eat.

I still eat a lot of eggs though.Prices are increasing across the board recently and are projected to continue to adjust through spring. Once they're cooked, if you stuff them in a thermos, they'll last for many hours. I used to eat eggs as lunch every day and they were packed at dawn ~6am. And I still love the smell and taste of omelettes. I commend you OP for dialing in your own personal training idiosyncrasies. I'm jealous! I still feel like a blind man in the dark sometimes, especially when facing a plateau. Any tips for developing this skill?

Edit: I'm not quite as big as you, 6'1" 175lb.As you sustain exercise for longer continuous periods, you start to go into  other energy systems. The efficiency of which can be improved through training, largely due to the rate at which you can turn secondary "waste products" back into viable energy substrates. "Waste" probably being a bit inaccurate by me.

Good starting info on [Energy Systems](http://www.brianmac.co.uk/energy.htm)I'd let that muscle group recover for a few days and work another group. I don't know the exact science, but I fail to see the point of not switching muscle groups. Instead of A A B B C C do A B C or A B C D E REST REST. check out /r/posture for suggestionsI, too, am working on my L-sit.  I'm stuck on just regular pull-ups for now, pretty much just perfecting them, until I get my L-sit looking great.  Then, I'll move onto the L-sit pull-up.

I found the core exercises in the "exercise wiki", which I found in the right panel.  http://i.imgur.com/bI6e3rh.png

You will find more core exercises at http://antranik.org/bodyweight-training/, which is by one of our redditors here, /u/Antranik.

Also, to improve my L-sit, I've been doing the compression work (also in the exercise wiki) after every workout.

Edit:  Added compression work.You have planche as one of your goals however all I see is one day of planche leans. And for 10 minutes?- covenience: I work over 50 hours per week and lead a busy life. I don't have time to cook most of my meals.

- health: I try not to eat meat produced in a commercial feed house. Mostly for health, but I feel better ethically about it as well. I get my meat and eggs from a farm. It's more expensive and I ration it.

- low calorie density per serving

- personal preference: I can't eat that much eggs and/or chicken in a day. My body functions best on ~165g of protein per day, and 50g comes from shakes. While protein powder may not be the best option, it's better than nothing at all. 

You give setxreps for everything but handstand.Where did you get "3/4 sets of 8"?  I have always done just three sets.  I re-read the beginner routine and I couldn't find "3/4 sets".  Just curious.You will need more planche work if you plan on reaching your goal by summer - even then you will be hard pressed to reach your goal by fall esp if your adding weight to your legs.

No handstand work?60sec RTO Support first, then negative ring dips.Go to failure, and 'fast' squats--this is helpful.  Thanks!Who the fuck cleans an egg. Eggs also have more cholesterol. As someone with a small appetite, it's hard to get enough protein keep other things like fat and cholesterol in check in my diet and still get enough fruits and vegetables. Protein shakes don't fill me up, so it's easier to satisfy all these constraints by supplementing.Exactly how much room do you have total?  You could likely do the setup in the link, or modify it to fit your area...
http://bit.ly/16PNFpm[*This*](http://i.imgur.com/zW9TidE.jpg) is pretty much a years worth of haphazard planning.Egg whites are virtually pure protein.Oops, so you guys don't recommend to do burpees every day? I would be glad to hear some suggestions how I can alternate my morning routine.

I started a couple of months ago with doing burpees every morning right after getting up from bed. I got inspired by Mike Rowe's introduction to burpees I stumbled upon on the Internet (http://www.discovery.com/tv-shows/dirty-jobs/videos/burpees.htm) and decided to give it try.

He suggests to start with 10 reps, 60 secs pause then 9 reps and so on down to 1 rep. That makes 55 in total and for me it's the best rep/set range possible to just do it every morning.

My primary goal is not to gain muscles or lose weight, it's about having it as a part of my morning routine. So far, it's really great because I get some boost for the entire day.

But now I'm a little concerned based on the comments in this thread. Do you know some similar exercises I can do, which also require no equipment, take around 10 - 15 minutes and can be done right after getting up from bed?

Thanks in advance.Also- use some weight when you squat - hold a dumb bell/kettlebell/bag of sand.

And try to replicate your 'skiing speed' - i.e. - fast squats - alternating emphasis from leg to leg. Some deep, some high, some jumps too! And go to failure - not just full reps - it will enhance your stamina and endurance.Am I missing something?  I am not huge and by that calculation should be eating 162g of protein.  Plenty of people should be eating well over 200g if this calculation is accurate.No one ever thinks they got a bad tattoo.My No1 top tip for strong front-lever pull-ups is to grip the bar like CRAZY! Wrap your thumbs right around &amp; place your 'thumb-pads' on top of your index finger-nails. If you are chalked, it will work like a clamp. 

The harder you squeeze the bar, the more muscles you will activate throughout your forearms and shoulders - crucial for maintaining a strong FL/FL pull ups.

See this front lever with 20kg kettle bell around waist: 

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Y1lrumLZYzU 

Train totally - cheers!First of all, work on holding your posture right. IMHO bad posture is mental as often, if not more often, that it is physical. Straighten your back and square your shoulders against a wall to get an idea of what it should feel like, then practice holding that posture during your day to day life. This is key. 

Now as for the physical stuff, a few different things can cause bad posture. Among the more common are 1. a weak core and 2. strength imbalances in favor of your pushing muscles. So in your workouts, make sure to focus on exercises that are demanding of your core [luckily for you, most bodyweight exercises fit into this category] and doing plenty of pullups and rows. The beginner routine in the sidebar is solid on both accounts, so doing it would likely do your posture a lot of good.Hey guys - add a small weight belt - 2/3kgs to your waist to really strengthen your FL strength e.g.: Check out these FL pull ups please:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Uh3YF_lleSo Mine are:

1. Don't get injured
2. Have fun
3. Consistently improve6'4", 215lbs checking in. Not saying I'm the norm, but I don't think I'm that uncommon. 

200g is not impossible to eat without powders. I just try and eat 20+ ounces of chicken a day. The Walmart around here has family packs of chicken breasts for ~$2/lb. If your only source of protein is chicken then you'll have to eat ~2lbs of chicken, which isn't that hard (it does get a little boring). You can try and get your protein through red meat, which tastes better, but it is going to be a ton of calories (same with eggs). Canned tuna/salmon is also good, although I rarely eat it.

Getting 200g gets hard, if not impossible, when you are not cooking for yourself. There is almost no way to get it eating at restaurants without lots of fat and carbs.

tldr: 1) lots of chicken, 2) you will need to cook for yourselfEven just get ups. Weighted or not.Well strengthening your core will improve your posture, but I don't know if only doing core exercises is advisable Sommer said he'd finished filming every product in the series except parts of H3 and R4 when they released F1 (2 years ago?). It's pretty well documented in his book,he also does a case study of a body builder  that gains 60+ in 39 days.

He's a bit of a freak for body experiments, and he doses on supplements brutally but even if it's a little exaggerated I still think it helps bring credibility to OPs post and his gains over a full year.I hope so too! 

If it makes you feel any better, it would take me about as long to drive from where I live to Squamish as it would take to drive there from Texas :) 

I also don't have benefits at work, so although my doc visits, hospital visits and such are free I still have to pay for prescription medication. My meds are about $300 a month right now. Congrats on your progress, and on finding out what kind of training works best for you. I think what you're saying is definitely true - once you know enough to listen to your body and make the adjustments it needs, it's good to not get stuck on any particular dogma.

As for all of the accusations people are making, let's not jump to conclusions about someone we know nothing about - 32 lbs of lean mass in a year strains credulity, but it seems a lot more likely that OP misestimated his % bodyfat, which is after all extremely difficult to measure or estimate. For example, if we assume that he was actually 20% when he started and 15% when he finished, then that's only 20 lbs of lean mass, which is well within the range of what a beginner natty can accomplish in a year - especially since OP is 6'6".AMA request: Al Kavadlo! Sorry if it's been suggested or even been done already. (Link?)I need to be Canadian. Here in the US I have to pay ~$400 a month on meds as it is. And you have Squamish in BC for climbing! No fair!

I'm really still not okay with having asthma. But I've gotten significantly better at controlling the symptoms. Hopefully some day soon I'll have everything in check.

Thanks, I really appreciate the reply!

I'll try to incorporate this into my HS work even though I don't really do much back to wall and see how it goes.Being Hispanic I eat alot of black beans and rice. Eggs, milk, yogurt, and peanut butter I usually intake everyday too. And you can't go wrong with meat, I try to eat that as much as I can.You're very welcome! I've dealt with this a long time, I know how frustrating it can be. 

I'm familiar with BT. At this point I have my asthma under good control most of the time with medication. Occasionally I get flare ups during allergy season as I mentioned, but I've learned how to manage it quite well. I've also stopped beating myself up about having it, I used to get really frustrated and angry that I couldn't do certain things. 

BT from what I recall is a one time thing, and isn't a permanent treatment and they don't recommend repeating it once your five years of effectiveness is up. I think at this point I'd want to reserve it for if my lung function decreases further as I get older. I'm also Canadian, so although it would be free I don't think I could elect to do it unless my doc thinks that my asthma is really poorly controlled and sends the referral. It is but you can put in custom exercises. I also use the weight function to indicate what progression level I used. Wow! Thank you! That's terrific information!

My clients have had great results with the nose only breathing. I think expiration through the mouth makes it too easy to dump all the air at once quite quickly. The exhale in my experience is actually the more important part because CO2 sucks. 

Get it? Sucks? But seriously. The exhale is more important. Most people have probably seen it but don't realize how good a drill it is. [The head-in handstand (first pic).](https://www.facebook.com/yuvalonhands/photos/pb.265157370252730.-2207520000.1423617856./316361545132312/?type=3&amp;src=https%3A%2F%2Ffbcdn-sphotos-f-a.akamaihd.net%2Fhphotos-ak-xfa1%2Fv%2Ft1.0-9%2F150635_316361545132312_968783765_n.jpg%3Foh%3D0a7c47a3c604a88cd006dc2fc0561033%26oe%3D555E0610%26__gda__%3D1432349358_79a642a3759d13866beb6c7931aabaee&amp;size=800%2C600&amp;fbid=316361545132312) Do a regular back to wall handstand, then look at your feet. Activate your 'hollow' position using whatever cues you normally use (ribs in, push out lower back, engage glutes etc.) and peel your feet off the wall. The act of tucking your head in will shift your balance forward and you'll tend towards overbalancing - your aim is to basically try to counter that overbalance by 'pulling' back into a tighter hollow.

The other usual cues apply - keep the hips open, feet pointed, shoulders somewhat protracted and elevate the shoulders.

It's much easier to hold a well aligned handstand with your head in because it gives you a bit of leeway with shoulder mobility. It will help you get an idea for what a properly aligned handstand feels like. Once you can hold this freestanding (it's okay if you use the wall to help get into said freestanding position), you can start trying to hold and maintain that same form, while slowly rotating your head further and further out.

It's a bit hard to explain over words, but play around it and see if you get the idea. PM me otherwise. You'll need a decent amount of shoulder mobility to begin with, for which I recommend [this drill](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OhhaK3nDbbA). 

Edit: And yes, I can hold a freestanding handstand.If you're interested in knowing how this works, when asthmatics experience bronchospasm the burning sensation can be caused by the inability to completely exhale due to constriction of the airways. Airway inflammation also makes it more difficult for oxygen in the inhaled air to reach the alveoli where it can be used, and a buildup of mucus in the airways further blocks the passage of oxygen. 

Asthma attacks are often identifiable by a telltale expiratory wheeze, so the person is wheezing when they breathe out. The wheeze gets worse, and can become a wheeze with inhale and exhale. If they panic (which is understandable), they start breathing in those little gasps which keeps filling up their lungs with air, even when the lungs are close to capacity already. This additional lung expansion causes more burning, causing more panic. 

Breathing in through the nose helps prevent those heavy gasps which can push the lungs over capacity. It can also help filter allergens, and warm air before it hits the lower airways. Breathing out through the mouth can actually be a bit better, since a larger volume of air can be breathed out through the mouth compared to through the nose. Ideally you want your exhale to be twice as long as your inhale during an attack, to blow off that extra air in the lungs. Diaphragmatic breathing is commonly recommended as a strategy to assist in breathing control during asthma exacerbations. Cardio should help your asthma. I grew up with it as well and still have it today. I did long distance throughout high school and it ready helped keep my long health up.You can always lower the rings so that you can assume dipping position whilst having your feet on the floor to give you an extra assist in the movement which is nice because you can easily control how much help you receive from your legs.Unless he's a god damned wizard and cast some super gains spell on himself the dudes lying to sell some snake oil. Or those numbers aren't accurate.34 lbs in 365 days.

Mark Rippetoe puts that much and more on to noobs in their first 6 months. i was previously told to put deadlifts in front to help lift more, so I'm a bit confused on that. What are your thoughts on that? 

And I enjoy the barbell rows,  I would try body weight rows but the space I have around my bench is actually limited so I'm unable to do it.  Weird right ?


And for barbell squats I'll definitely look into getting that attended to now. Everyone seems to be on edge that I said I couldn't do the squats so I'm guessing it's extremely important.

Also should I do deadlifts one workout day and squats the next? Like Monday I do squats and Wednesday I do deadlifts and Friday squats again? I'm not sure what else you mean by that 


Edit: I also planned to turn deadlifts to 1x5 , so if I did that would I still need to reevaulate the deadlift and squat conundrum ?34lbs in 30 days? Sorry bud, I'm not buying it unless the juice is involved. 

Even then...over a pound each day...unlikely. No problem! Good luck and hang in there! Cool! Thanks! I would say you have ample time for handstand skill work -- always work on this first before strength, because it can be neurally draining. planche and front tuck lever would go well together too, and flags you can do at the end of the workout. 

I would also highly recommend that you do some strength training for the lowerbody, especially given that you were injured before from running. You don't want to finish the marathon with injuries this time around. THe best thing you could do while training for the marathon, is to include at least 2 times a week of leg training a week. I would do split squats (make sure your knees go forward and down, so they should go past the toes),  paired with some leg curls, and then some posterior chain work. Is that it? I'll change the order on that then. Thanks!&gt; Also realize that very few people who have spent 500 on such a thing, will have it in them to kill their ego and admit it was a waste of money. Most people will tell you it's the greatest thing ever, regardless of the experience because well, they paid a shit ton for it.

**[Disclaimer: I am not saying GB seminar is a scam. I am just talking about people's possible reaction to having fallen for scam]**

This cannot be said often enough. In fact, it is even worse, people will actually believe the lies themselves rather than just pretending, because of the flaws of human mind. 

I wish more people read up on **"cognitive dissonance"** (and other biases). 

You totally can but not reliably and only if your an absolute beginner who's diet is on point. Otherwise yes you would have to be on roids.Still not possible, you cant lose fat and gain muscle at the same time.Lol, guess I missed that part. My keen detective skills at work, see.Thanks man, really appreciate it :)  I'll check the sidebar.Why? In TimFerris' four hour body he outlines, with pictures, how he gained 34 lbs of muscle in 30 days? Why is 32 lbs of muscle over a full year hard to believe. 

EDIT: So I'm getting a bunch of downvotes, but no one has actually answered my question. Why is 32 lbs over an entire year, on a 6' 6" frame unrealistic.Yep you can easily use two chairs of the same height, put your hands on the top of the chair and do dips that way. Work on 10 second negatives if you dont have the dip yet. So this would mean lowering down in 10 seconds. I'm genuinely curious. What would you say is the most effective drill? I'm not trying to pick a fight or anything (I don't even own H1), I just wanna improve my HS line, and am open to all kinds of ideas.

Also, can you do freestanding HS?How did you find an adult gymnastics course? I'm not a gymnast either but like a lot of others on here I use the rings a lot and I would love to have access to a gymnasium...Totally. Sometimes I run with only my nose breathing and... Well, it can be a little snotty-flingy but it forces me to keep my breathing slow and mellow. It's literally impossible for me to gasp or suck wind. Then you realize "Holy shit! I really don't need all that air I'm gasping (inefficiently into the top, more useless part of my lungs)!"

Remember to imagine you are breathing down and back toward your kidneys. That's where your lungs have a surprising amount of space for expansion. Just keep your mouth closed and I think you'll be pleasantly surprised. Better suggestion? I got some fantastic advice from /u/circumspecktor. 

But I'm all about getting more advice. I see. Yeah, stress alone can cause asthma issues. Keeping a level head is key in any excersise I do. 

So deep, controlled breathes rather than mouth breathing. You are correct, gasping only worsens an attack.Thank you for going in to so much detail. You completely described my symptoms to a tee. I guess I'll need to figure out some other forms of asthma control. My doctor assured me that I was on the strongest stuff he could give, but looks like I need to dig deeper. Have you investigated brochio thermoplasty? Seems like a viable option. Although it is NOT a cheap option. &gt; I'm over 30

-
&gt;this diesnt seem like it was written by a teenager.

Really, what set you off?Not sure why you'd ask this on a sub about what are mostly non-cardio exercises.

We are not medical professionals, and you should ask one of those instead.I returned H1 once I saw what it consisted of. Hundreds of different shoulder mobility and pelvic tilt drills plus a dozen or so ways of doing wall handstands all arranged into arbitrary sets and reps. Completely superfluous. You only need about 2-3 other drills in addition to the run of the mill wall work to develop a good handstand. But you can't really sell that for $100 can you. Quality &gt; quantity. What I'd say is probably the most effective handstand alignment drill isn't even in H1.

Lots of fish (usually cod, halibut, salmon, or tuna fillets) and steak. I only eat chicken once or twice a week at most. Thats about it for home cooked meals but will also snack on cheese and nuts throughout the day.one thing I forgot to mention - adding in a long warm up did wonders for my symptoms. I started doing a slow jog for at least ten to fifteen minutes prior to really revving up and it  improved the pace and length of my run, as well as making HIIT style sprints easier. tea spoon of Spirulina with tomato juice everyday is all the protein you need.. most of protein doesnt get digested and wasted. For cell devision to happen, chromosomes gotta split. Chromosomes are made of dna and dna consists of amino acids so if you dont have enough of one type of amino acid the whole production stops and you are soar for days. Protein breaks down in to amino acids. So skip the the step and go for aminos conveniently, I'm also a rockclimber. I don't have issues with climbing either. I also don't have issues with weightlifting. My asthma flares with anything that gets my heart rate up to over 180bpm. Running, fast swimming, fast cycling, running stairs, jumping rope. Climbing is difficult, but it just doesn't shoot my heart rate up as high as cardio does.

to judge how well your asthma is controlled, doctors look at how often you are experiencing symptoms and using your rescue inhaler in the context of your lifestyle. If exercise is a part of your life and your asthma symptoms are interfering with that on a regular basis, then your asthma isn't well controlled. With the exception of using your rescue inhaler as a preventative, if you have symptoms that require you to use your ventolin 2 times per week or more (or in your case based on your other posts, symptoms that require you to stop the activity entirely - I assume that if you didn't stop the activity you would end up needing to take your ventolin) then that is an indicator that you need a change in your regular med regime. The goal of medication is to control symptoms, and that is entirely inclusive of symptoms during exercise. 

As for the lung burning, when I first started running I was with a group of total beginners. there were a number of folks who had barely ever exercised in their lives and were severely overweight, but they could run much longer than I could despite me being at a healthy weight and a regular exerciser. Their lungs may burn but they can usually push through it without it getting worse, or maybe just need to slow down a little bit. For me, my lungs crapped out well before my legs did. For them, their legs crapped out well before their lungs. If you were to keep running and try to push through it, I'm guessing you would need your ventolin. 

When I have an attack out of nowhere (not exercise induced) it does feel different than an attack from exercising. An exercise induced asthma attack feels more like a burning constriction, some burning in the lower part of my throat, and that I can't empty my lungs entirely. A random attack from something environmental is more coughing and weight on my chest feeling.

Regardless of what is inducing your symptoms, if you want to run but can't due to asthma that means its affecting your life. During allergy season I add in serevent to my usual med regime, it takes about two weeks to really kick in but works wonders. During the winter when I'm running indoors I do fine without it, I just take flovent twice a day and a preventative ventolin dose prior to cardio.No I'm not saying breathe shallowly. It's just that you can't gasp through your nose. So it has to be slow or it won't work. Only so much air can travel at a time so your lungs stay relaxed. My schedule in the same mon-fri so it goes like this; Eggs in the morning. Deepening on how hungry I am 2-4. Greek whole fat yogurt and granola when I get to work. Greek whole fat yogurt and granola until lunch time. At lunch I visit the same places each week, either Chipotle or this taco stand next to my house. If I go to the taco stand I get like 6 chicken tacos. Then it's Greek yogurt for the rest of the work day. Then when I get home I have a real meal; chicken, hamburgers, whatever other common dinner time meal. Also usually have a salad and some veggies. I hate the fake sugar in all the protein powders I have found. I would definitely be using it if I could find a good one without any of the fake sugar and no flavoring. Any recommendations? 

Edit; Also I work in a warehouse that sells food and chocolate so I often times eat cliff bars and other protein bars and shit. Usually take a bag of nacho cheese doritos with my lunch too ;) You can start working on your support hold on rings. 30-60 seconds is a good prereq for ring dips anyway I'd sayHe could be young and made mad puberty gainz, but this diesnt seem like it was written by a teenager.Do you have H1 yourself? It is more than just endless mobility work. The balancing comes after there is adequate strength and flexibility for proper muscle activation which will all play a role in your end balancing position. With opened shoulders your balance point will be different than if they were really tight.


 You can't blame H1 for your friend for not being able to do a handstand when he's doing mobility work. That is like boxing and expecting somebody to throw a really strong punch just because they can bench a lot or something. There is technique that has to be worked on when throwing a punch just like there is balancing work that has to be done for a handstand. Beans and chicken tenders!!My math, based on your numbers, says you gained 32lbs of muscle.

Bull. Shit. Some people are more immune to that. I drink a good bit of milk like a couple gallons a week almost and it doesn't make me shit. I'm lucky enough to digest it fairly well. If I drink way too much it will get to me but I can drink a half gallon in 10 minutes with no issues. Elli quark. check them out. you can order online or find them in storesOhh really? I usually get Greek Yogurt and don't remember the last time I had cottage cheese. So will try, thanks a bunch!&gt; I fucking hate the taste of protein shakes

what brand did you hate? i have some french vanilla and i love it. Eggs need to be bought, conserved, opened, cleaned, cooked 

Powder just need to be put in a cup or shaker also much easier to mix with milk chocolate etc 

I have nothing against eggs but seriously you get tired of them and you need a shitload No protein shakes here. I usually drink a glass of freshly mixed milk with cocoapowder when I get home from the gym. And then eat pretty varied, lots of vegetables, beans-paste/daal, boiled/fried eggs and regularly fish or meat every other day.That's a really great point for the most part but...

&gt; going from 185 lbs with 23% bodyfat to 198 at 12%

Unless you are on roids, there's no way you did this in a year.

Edit: For the downvoters, this would be a starting lean weight of 142.45 lbs. and a final lean weight of 174.24. An increase of lean weight of almost 32 lbs. while losing fat... in a year. That's not happening without steroids.Like [so](http://antranik.org/wp-content/uploads/2014/09/advanced-l-sit-andrea-alborghetti-300x173.jpg?9873a6). Also [this](http://www.calistenia.net/wp-content/uploads/2014/09/L-sit.jpg).I will approach this with caution. Sounds a lot like the idea of shallow breathing excersises. Those have been effective for me before.One of those links was my question. I received great feedback (thanks xatim) which is helping me move closer to the press. I can say for myself, the mobility is where I am failing miserably, for now anyway, but I'm working on that now with a formal stretching routine. The other thing was I was not strong enough in my shoulders/traps. I had jumped to the BTWHS as it was closer to the "Real Thing". 

Man was I wrong. I'm back to FTWHS for time and getting my hands withing an inch of the wall. It is humbling. I'm also doing negatives HSPU and Planche work to try to build up the required strength. That along walks and wall runs. In just a few weeks I am getting much stronger, but still have months to go which is cool with me.

If you can't pancake in real tight you have to be beastly strong to get those hips up over your hands from that far away. I'm not beastly strong yet or flexible enough, but I know I can get there with time.

The good news is all that work and advice is giving me a nice 15-20 sec freestanding HS. I almost never go over the top anymore and can muscle into a HS if I'm shy at the top. Thanks _mess_ . I can feel one of those 30sec+ "out of character" ones coming soon.I teach fitness classes. (I AM NOT A DOCTOR OR MEDICAL PROFESSIONAL OF ANY KIND)

I tell my asthmatic clients to breathe exclusively through their noses. Breathing through your mouth triggers several "fight or flight"-like responses. And it makes the alveoli/capillaries dialate and expand which as I understand it is very unhelpful for asthmatics.

It seems to work for them. This was the kind of response I was looking for. If I don't have asthma issues while climbing, why would you say that my asthma is not well controlled?  It's only when trying to do something my body is not at all used to doing.

 I know that non asthmatics sometimes experience a burning lung sensation when they begin a run. This is what it feels like. It doesn't feel like a normal asthma attack. 

My asthma is primarily allergy induced. When I go to higher elevations I have no issue with asthma because I am not allergic to the plants growing at that altitude, less polution, etc. Maybe this info helps?Sorry for weighing too much for your taste.

1g/lb is probably slightly over-cautious but certainly not unreasonable.There are some people that have exercise induced asthma that get it because they breath out of their mouth instead of their noses.  If that's your problem, be conscious of your breathing.  Also, if youhave asthma you need to see your doctor and get an inhaler. I use my inhaler prior to every workout session and I get a lot more out of it!Naterman was a huge contributor to GB for years, has paid for many seminars himself, and knows Sommer personally (more than anyone else on here anyway). Of course he's going to be biased.

For what it's worth, I also know a guy who has attended 2 seminars and has been following F1/H1 religiously for almost 2 years. He still hasn't 'mastered' F1 and cannot hold a handstand for more than 4-5 seconds. This is despite his alignment being quite good - point is, there is more to learning a handstand than endless reps of mobility work.

He's finally decided they're not worth it and that if he wants to make real progress, he's going to have to be smarter about his training rather than rely on a magic cookie cutter program that apparently works regardless of age, height, weight, limb proportions, joint sizes and previous strength levels.

The seminars would be useful if you were completely lost with the movements, I suppose, and had no idea which muscles to activate, what mental cues to use etc. Even then, you could probably find personal, hands-on instruction at a local gymnastics gym for a tiny fraction of 500.

Another thing to consider is that seminar attendees are divided into groups according to their 'proven' level on foundation. So if you've never officially tested beyond Level 0.5 (and paid for it), you will be placed in the absolute beginner group regardless of your ability, and will have limited, if any exposure to advanced material. This is what I read on the forums anyway (some of the mods were encouraging other members to go through official testing).

So yeah, keep all that in mind before spending such a huge amount of money. These are just the things that have put me off the idea of ever attending. Also realize that very few people who have spent 500 on such a thing, will have it in them to kill their ego and admit it was a waste of money. Most people will tell you it's the greatest thing ever, regardless of the experience because well, they paid a shit ton for it.I drank 3 glasses once and sat on the toilet with liquid shit pouring out of my arse for an hour. How are you not dead from over-pooping?Kwark is so much cheaper than shakes here in the Netherlands. 

I went from shakes to kwark and I'm never going backBro, is just low fat cottage cheese. They just have a different name for it. And they usually get it whipped.  Where as ours is in little chunks. However is not uncommon to find it shipped here also. In Canada it comes locally and it's still about that much. We get raped in food pricing. My "doctor"  also told me vaccinations cause autism and gluten causes cancer.  


Also 9/11.I have provided helpful advice given the details you provided, but I will stop posting.  Even this bit is concerning:
&gt;when I begin a strenuous cardiovascular excersise I can feel my lungs begin to constrict.

You must have a different definition of "well controlled" than I do.  This is why internet medical advice can be dangerous.  No one gains 20kg fast and if they do it certainly won't be mostly muscle. It takes about 1.5 to 2 years to gain 20 kg of muscle if you're doing everything right.Likely an overstatement. Restated to Internet safe vernacular would be "when I begin a strenuous cardiovascular excersise I can feel my lungs begin to constrict." I can stop excersising, and the symptoms subside. I don't need a rescue inhaler to control the issue. 

In any case, if you aren't going to even attempt to be helpful. Please stop posting. As you said before, you don't know enough about me to offer up advice. I know enough about my physical ability to know that I can safely participate in any form excersise  I put my mind to. All I'm doing here is looking for the first few steps. If you don't want to help, then get out of my way. I tried it, but it looks suited to weighted exercises. It was difficult to find some of the bodyweight exercises in the beginner routine.Can I ask how many grams you eat in a sitting? 45?I have severe asthma, so I can speak to this. If you are being hit hard with asthma symptoms when you start doing cardio, that means your asthma is NOT under control. You need to speak to your health care provider about it. Personally I've noticed that my asthma has become worse through the years, and has also become permanently worsened every time I have any sort of lung infection such as pneumonia. Just because you could do strenuous cardio previously doesn't mean your lungs are in the same condition.

After you see your provider, discuss your meds and symptoms in the context of your goals and get the go ahead to start back, I have some suggestions for you. For running, I did a prolonged C25K program where I did each stage of the program twice. It took me twice as long to get to the end result, but it worked for me. I also take one dose of ventolin about 20 minutes before cardio as a preventative. 

When doing cardio, the moment you start experiencing symptoms just dial down the intensity until things feel under control, and then slowly scale up again. So if you're running and get symptomatic, slow down to a walk, get things under control, then jog, then run if feeling good again. Once you start trying to push through the symptoms and your lungs get inflamed, your workout will be done until that inflammation gets under control again. For me, it can take a full day or two for my lungs to feel back to normal if I push it too hard. Give yourself the rest that you need. 

Asthma doesn't mean your weak or out of shape, it means you have a medical condition that needs to be respected. It wasn't that long ago that an asthma diagnosis was deadly. In a supermarket close to my house you can now buy it per Kilo, so happyMEAT!!!!Can you get flavoured quarks in your country? I love me them Icelaneic Skyrs!Exercise-induced asthma here as well... totally anecdotal, but for what it's worth I found that using a (good) rowing machine was my sweet spot for providing a good cardio challenge without immediately closing up/shutting down.  &gt; But when I try and just go for a run or swim, I am immediately hit hard with asthma issues.

If this statement from your OP is true, then your asthma is not under control.  When you make statements like the above, it's impossible to give safe advice.  People may not understand how severe asthma can be.  That being said, it is absolutely true that asthmatics can be world class athletes, but their asthma is under good control.  

If the quoted statement is not correct AND you meant to say that you are deconditioned AND you have discussed this with your doctor AND your asthma is well controlled, then by all means go ham.  If you have acne protein powder is bad news. Not to sure why but the first thing the dermatologist said to my boyfriend was "no protein shakes". I got a load of butthurt and rustled Jimmies from that post.Uh, well I guess I'd be curious as to your success rate at 1 inch from wall with none of those engaged --- I guess for some anatomical structures it is possible (not mine though). But yes.Hi there! As you can see, on the PT I've posted above you'll do 300 repetitions of one or more ab exercises.
To hit the core I mainly mix 4count flutter kicks (the quintessential Navy SEAL ab exercise, it is fundamental because it simulates the movements you do when you're swimming), some sit-ups (not too many, I've red that they can be extremely dangerous for your back if done in large repetitions), good morning darlings, knee raises from the pull up barChicken(or any other meat) and eggs should give you enough protein for the whole day. Pasta has some protein in it, beans, bread, milk, nuts, cheese, all contain protein and help bring the total over the top.Let me ask you a simple question. Are you willing to risk about $1200 for the **extremely slim** possibility of learning some inapplicable skills you'll never use in your life? How sure are you that you'll learn a manna, planche, front and back lever and human flag? Are those skills worth that exorbitant amount of money? Ask friends and family. 

The reason why you haven't heard any negative reviews about the seminar is because the people who feel ripped off are too embarrassed to talk about it.Hadn't thought of jump rope. That could be good. I just need to do things that really get my heart rate up.It's true that no one can know exactly where I'm coming from. I'm looking for insight from those who have had a similar struggle or have first hand experience on the subject. If you don't have either of those things then that is okay. I just want some advice. Every doctor I have spoken with just says "start slowly and build in intensity as you progress". That is helpful, but I dont know how to start slowly. I'm looking for excersises to begin with, or even some sort of workout plan that has been effective for others.
rektNo one here has examined you.  Asking for advice on Reddit makes no sense.  Maybe you will be fine, but no one here can give you any safe advice without knowing more about you.  Jefit app is the way to goBurpess are a good exercise, but doing solely burpees would be a very, very suboptimal way to build muscle or lose fat. To build muscle, do a balanced routine, at a high intensity, consistently over time. To lose fat, find your TDEE and eat at a caloric deficit.I think he said something similar in his AMA, but I'm still not holding my breath hahaAccording to a recent forum post, he is finished with all of the filming and editing, and is preparing the final package for the online publication.Dude seems like he's got a problem with GB for some reason. I think most people go to a coach to get some hands on instruction, the better the coach the better the results.

I still think the seminar might be too expensive for me but I don't think the price is unjustified. Yeah, when I wrote this I was trying to think of actual exercises I could recommend, and I was having a hard time coming up with anything.

You could maybe try a stationary bike or something, it's easier to change intensity and it is for sure lower cardio than running (running is IMO some of the most intense cardio you can do). You could also try light stairs, or maybe jump rope, those are both more HIIT than endurance but it might help to start with.You just linked yourself getting ethered by Naterman....Could I get a picture of a straight backed l-sit? I can hold one for a few seconds, but always with rounded back. I've been able to do very strenuous cardio in the past with no issue. Why would it be different now? I haven't been hospitalized for more than 6 years. It's pretty well under control with the meds I'm on. I'm the same, actually. I can only drink plain milk with something or if I'm in the right mood. Aside from that it's chocolate milk and I go through at least a half gallon a day. &gt;Stretch 1,2,3 and the three introductory Movement courses will still be coming out very soon

I'll believe that when I see they have been released. Exactly how much protein do you think you need, for powder to be even vaguely necessary?Its not cheating if you do the whole rom, keep doing sumo squats and   progress to make stance shorter and shorter.IMO, get your asthma in check before you push yourself.  Having asthma is not just an external load.  Exercise induced asthma is a thing.  Yes it's hard to breath, but it can be more than deconditioning.  Bronchospasm can go from bad to worse to dead.  protein bread and meat make up the bulk of my protein needsYou should never flex your spine during a loaded movement such as the back squat, since the amount of shear compressive spinal force will eventually end up with injury, such as a disc bulge or herniation. 

For unloaded or bodyweight movements like the single leg squat, it's ok to flex the spine as long as you don't have any back injuries. It's actually hard to complete a full depth SLS with a neutral spine. But I wouldn't advise loading it up unless you have superior mobility and have slowly worked up with perfect form bodyweight reps first. Even so, you would only load them up slightly and progressively. Cardio with a weight vest indeed. That is a very apt description for how it feels. 

I don't really know a good way to ease back in to running. Obviously walking is so easy it's retarded. I hike a lot for climbing, but that doesn't even feel like cardio. It's almost like the shear intensity of running is what throws my lungs into an attack. Maybe using an eliptical so it's not so high impact?I can down a whole glass of chocolate milk in seconds, but the same glass of regular milk takes me at least 3 drinks to finish. And since i'm underweight, don't really have to worry about the added caloriesI can do it with a wider stance, and with my feet a little more turned out, but isn't that cheating? One more thing that you can try is to have a wider stance when doing squats so its more like sumo squats, that could solve the problem of rom.Go with a resistance band for now, and move to an unweighted stick once you can maintain your thumb and index finger. 

It doesn't sound like it's your forearm or wrist that's causing it, but a combination of things. 

You could follow a wrist stretching routine, such as the Gold Medal Bodies one for the mean time if you find that your wrists and forearms are specifically immobile. Yeah, I will be doing plenty of assisted squats, as well as trying to progress to goblet squats.  I am going to stay away from barbell for awhile because I just hurt myself every time I try, and it is extremely frustrating.  
I just hate that I have to wait 6 months for flexibility to be able to do all this stuff I want to do.  Oh well!  It's my fault.I have a lot of asthmatic friends, many of whom do significant amounts of cardio, and I have a little bit of insight.

Basically, think of having asthma as doing your cardio with a weight vest, you can certainly get to a fitness level where you can run/swim etc without trouble, but at any given point it is going to be harder for you than for someone without a respiratory condition.
 
If you find that you cannot jump straight in to running for example, start with something lighter to build up to it; without asthma you could just jump in to running and develop your base cardiovascular fitness that way, but you'll need to build a solid base beforehand because its just that much harder for you.

I'd suggest trying something which is very easy to adjust the intensity of so you can adjust to where you are at.I'll add bulgarian split squats. Thanks.From what I've seen, there are *NOT* too many folks &gt; 200lb on this sub. Also as /u/Bojangles010 mentioned, that rule is outdated and silly.

edit: whoops, left out a crucial word. I'm fine with big boys/girls.You mean from here? http://www.reddit.com/r/bodyweightfitness/wiki/kb/recommended_routine

Also you could add few more warmup excercises for legs.Thanks for the reply.
Was that just  passive holds or holds with the shoulders to the ears, elbows turned out, stomach tight, butt tight, legs locked out, toes pointed oh and pelvis posteriorly tilted?Okay, and would a good warmup essentially being the starting bodyweight program warmup?  Like the dislocations and what not?One egg has 6g of protein so I'll need 4-5 eggs to substitute for one protein shake. It's a lot quicker and easier to drink the shake.That stretching routine should be done after workout, warmup before workout and stretch after it.Are all of these okay to do before a workout session?  Or should I do them separate as to avoid injury.&gt;Burpees are excellent for conditioning. Unfortunately, great cardio and strength aren't the same thing. Mind you, they are awesome, and I love them.
I recommend you do 100 for time. It's rough. If you're under 10 minutes, you're in great shape. It's pretty much that simple.

Excellent advice.  Also a great movement for high intensity interval training.Why do you train fasted?  On the off days I hit the gym without a meal first (I am a weightlifter, plan to switch to BWF over the summer once I am impressed with my lifts) I am miserable every minute of the workout.  I have never tried fasting with aminos though, I typically load myself up with greek yogurt to hit the + nitrogen balance.Then you need to stretch hips and the back too, here is the best routine for to begin with http://phraktured.net/starting-stretching.htmlI imagine you would plateau pretty quick in terms of strength gains.  They are pretty good cardio though.  They're kicking my ass right now, but for example there's a couple guys at my gym who could do burpees until their limbs fall off  just because they're already at the top of what burpees can do for them.

It all depends on exactly where you are right now, what destination you have in mind, and how fast you want to get there.

Another exercise worth doing, occasionally because there's serious possibility of injuring yourself, is breakfalls and getups.  Who would have thought that lying down and standing back up could be so exhausting?  Seriously though, if you do attempt it go easy on the breakfalls and keep your arms at a low angle or you'll blow out your shoulders.  I just got over this angry purple bruise on my ass from doing some the other week, and then I tore it open doing some more two days later because I'm a glutton for punishment.  Don't be like that, you don't want open wounds on your ass.Are you saying you can start at an L hang and do the pullover at that height setting?

If so, that sounds perfect.Thanks for linking that, I couldn't remember where to find it.I've done that, I bought olympic lifting shoes.  Nothing works.  Can barely go down a couple inches.  It's horrible APT, hips, and ankles.Try chia seeds and hemp seedsThanks. A few follow-up questions:

Do you use barbell or kettlebell (or two dumbells)?

Is it supposed to be difficult? Like, did you select a weight and then work up the sets and reps gradually?  I'm just not clear on what a plateau would feel like when it's an exercise to condition your spine and progress very Gradually, as opposed to upping it 5lbs every week.

It'd probably make more sense to me when I actually try it out. Will start tomorrow.I'm allergic to eggs, is there a good alternative for me?Well I used to eat a whole lot of greek yogurt, but that was costing me around $5 a day, just for that one item.  Nowadays I'm mostly replacing that with some delicious cheese sandwiches, and still drinking a lot of milk as well as eggs, ham, chicken.


My diet is the opposite of balanced though, I pretty much eat whatever I want whenever I feel like it.  On Sunday I woke up at 8, had a hot chocolate and some cinnamon buns for breakfast at about 1, had a cheeseburger and milkshake at about 7, went home and made some stew for the week and had a bowl of that at about 10pm.

During the this week it's usually bowl of granola and milk, snack of cheese sandwiches, lunch of stew, snack of apples and almonds, dinner of whatever catches my fancy.  I'll switch out things when I get bored.

I don't count calories or macros or anything, and I'll never use supplements if I have a choice.  I know I'll never have the perfect body, but life is for living, not for just repeating a routine.  I'm in better shape than I was last month, and that's the important part.It's a massive waste of money. [Here](http://www.reddit.com/r/bodyweightfitness/comments/2d04gk/experiences_overcoming_gravity_vs_gymnasticsbodies/cjx9xr2) is why. 

TL; DR: This is what my friend had to say about it: 

*Think of it like an ido portal seminar but with an old  wrinkly man who no longer practices what he preaches.*

Any other questions, let me know.Yes.Where I live it's pretty expensive too. Generally it's imported.Why does everyone seem to do curls before rows?  I though compound before isolation was a standard concept?Someone who weighs in at 200lbs?Burpees are excellent for conditioning.  Unfortunately, great cardio and strength aren't the same thing.  Mind you, they are awesome, and I love them.

I recommend you do 100 for time.  It's rough.  If you're under 10 minutes, you're in great shape.  It's pretty much that simple.

Don't do burpees every day tho!  They are awful for overuse injuries.  Because each rep is broken up between arms and legs, you can easily wreck tendons and joints in both because the muscles don't get pumped out as fast.  It's the same reason I don't recommend a bunch of low rep sets.  You want to overload muscles, not connective tissue.

Also, you need to include other things in your workout.  Do some pullups as well.  Great for abs and a wider back will make your waist look smaller.If you don't mind spending a few bucks you could get GMB's rings one routine or buy Overcoming Gravity and make yourself a custom routine.Daily total protein: ~202g of protein

Breakfast (~21g of protein)

* 300ml full-cream milk *with*
* Uncle Toby's Plus protein cereal mixed with a cheap version of Kellogg's All-bran

Morning tea, lunch and afternoon tea (~147g of protein)

* 2 boiled eggs
* 100g tin of salmon
* 150g roasted and salted peanuts
* 600ml lite milk
* 200g brown rice *with*
* 150-200g of chicken.

Dinner

* Not set. Varies each day.

Dessert (~34g of protein)

* 150g of low fat cottage cheese *with*
* 150g of 2% fat greek yoghurt *and* 
* 150g of frozen mixed berries 
* Topped with honey.

Other

* Whatever I feel like. Maybe a glass of milk or something.

This is my bulking diet template. Even without dinner I'm getting at least 200g of protein. If dinner has at least a bit of protein I will get at least 220-230g.

Hope this helps.Its ankle flebility, do it like [this](https://zigsports.files.wordpress.com/2013/01/arnold-squatting-2.jpg) and you should be doing full rom then And wrists and elbows as well.  At least if you do them every day.I always prefer real food, but

1) Convenience. Just scoop and mix. You can take a shake on the go, etc..

2) For anyone who is bulking, it's an easy way to add more protein and calories to a meal without adding more food, because you were probably going to drink water anyway.My recommendation would just be to do your L sits at the start of your workout.  As long as you keep good form on the deadlifts it shouldn't do you any harm.Eh, honestly as long as I have it in something even vaguely insulated I'll let it go for a really long time. Plus I go by smell a lot. If its questionable I'll toss it.Wow lol where do you live? Do they fly it in by plane or why is it so expensive?I'm not going to post my full (current) routine, because if my ADD has taught me anything it's that my workout will have changed by this time next week.  Instead, here are a couple observations.

Partial ROM headstand pushups are a totally valid exercise.  They might not have as much pushing benefit as a full ROM anything, but there's a lot of core activation involved which is just as necessary to build as raw pushing strength.

Headstand leg lifts are severely underrated.  I've been attempting to work up to a solid 30 reps, before I add ankle weights and do it all again.  I feel like forcing myself to maintain good form under exhaustion is doing more for both skill and strength than if I only practiced my balances fresh.

Question time!  If I really want to get serious about my balancing, should I scrap most of my workout and have total focus on balancing?  I made a list last night of like, 20+ exercises that would improve my balancing, and while it's lacking in traditional push and pull work I feel like it would still build a lot of stength.  What do you guys think?Meat--see /r/keto.  And sometimes bugs--see /r/entomophagy.The goal is wrists 1-3 inches from wall (3-8cm) or 1-3 finger-widths.

As for time that's up to you and your training goals.

I have practiced some places where the warm-up was six 1-minute belly-to-wall HS with 2 min rest between for stretching.

At other places, the session will start and then end with 60sec, or 90sec, or 2min belly-to-wall HS.Low fat cottage cheese costs ~$5 for 300g in my country.

The struggle is real, especially for a student on a budget, like me..I write in a daily journal (pen and paper), and after starting BWF there is a section I devote to just recording any exercise done on one particular day. Right now doing beginner routine so there aren't that many exciting things to write.

Calorie counting is done on app on the phone, making sure I document everything that is eaten. I use the default exercise list to track my net calories for each day.I use powders because often I find it difficult to eat enough in a day where I work out a lot. I found drinking the extra calories and protein was easier then eating it. When it comes to drinking something I would rather drink milk, chocolate protein powder and peanutbutter then I would eggs. I already eat 5-6 eggs for breakfast. Additionally prep is easier. I love scrambled eggs, but I really hate hard boiled eggs which brings down the portability of eggs.If you're getting sick of pushups, I've heard of people getting good results with a 100 pullup, 100 dip workout.  All you have to do is hit both those numbers.

Personally, I would add core work as well, but just a suggestion if you feel like pushups aren't building enough strength for you.You should definitely do more than 2-4 squats total in your workout.  It's just not conductive towards making any progress at all, and if you're doing it without warmups it could even be dangerous.

Try adding some Cossack squats or rear foot elevated split squats to your routine.  Pretty much this.  It would take twice as long to do everything if you did each exercise before moving onto the next one.

The added conditioning doesn't hurt either.Anyone know if any chain grocery stores or similar sell quark in the US? I tried it when I was in Germany and like the taste more than Greek yogurt. I have only seen them once at a farmers market in America...Not to mention they're hell on your knees. Or at least my knees. They're a pretty great warm up IMO though.What is your time limit on hard boiled eggs being out at room temp? FDA says 2 hours, which is up there in BS-level with having steaks cooked to 145F and calling it medium-rare...I like quark but after two weeks eating it for breakfast i am a bit tired and looking for options. Besides the obvious meat / fish / chicken I usually down something like this when pressed for time:

Milk + Eggs + vanilla + banana + oatsUnless you're doing burpees for several hours at a time, you probably wont lose weight.

Unless they're at your upper level of strength, you're probably not gonna put on muscle doing them.

You probably cant have both of these things at the same time.I mean as far as eggs go yeah, but lets be real if I pack them at 8am and go to work and go to eat them at 1pm during my lunch I am less inclined to eat them than I would a protein shakeSimilarly, I vomited cottage cheese as a child and haven't eaten it since.That was a great read and I think it hit exactly on the issues I've been having.  Thanks for sharing.well...i'm still on knee pushups really, and am still having trouble making it to thirty.who the hell needs 200g??He really is a [hero](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/281hw7/z/ci6mtyx).

Edit: spellingGrass fed and pasture raised beef, pork, chicken, eggs, organs, lard, and tallow, plus green vegetables and plenty of salt and butter are the majority of my diet. My only supplements are vitamins D3, K2, C, iodine, and magnesium.

I'm sort of anal about where my food comes from and who knows what's in those powder and shake supplements.Hardboiled are pretty portable Use fruit. I also like a walnut/honey combination.

Also just suck it up, quark is great.Yeah.As a kid I drank milk, and then threw up for some reason (probably mildly sick anyway).  My dad thought it would be funny to say "look, that's cottage cheese".  I've never been able to eat it since.Why are you trying to get 200+ grams of protein in a day though? The study posted throughout many of the fitness based subs concluded that there isn't a benefit past .82 grams/lb of bodyweight. Why not take some of that protein and use it to restore some glycogen through carbs or toward hormonal production through fats instead?If you set it on the highest dip setting, it's very steady even when on top. Depending on your height, you may be able to start from an L hang. I'm 6'5" (but with slightly shorter arms than normal) and in my starting position I have to sit my ass, raise my legs, and only slightly bend my arms. It's still fun and covers the significant portion of the movement.It is sort of the similar but not quite. I like the taste and texture of quark better than cottage cheese. http://www.functionallymad.com/journal-your-training-dont-log-it.html

It's a decent starting point and gives lots of ideas. How do you keep your quark tasting interesting? Any tips to not get tired?The name is low fat cottage cheese.  So doing some assisted/weighted chins after having done the negatives?My go-to mix is greek yogurt, oats and berries, with a drizzle of honey. It is delicious.Not to my knowledge. Are you thinking of lactic acid? 

Lactose is hard for some people to digest. I do alright with it and milk has pretty solid macros, provides really easy calories, and I enjoy it. It's the only thing that got me through my recent bulk. I though lactose was bad for recovery?Sure you can, just scale it back. There are plenty of detailed progressions on the internet so I won't go there but you can always start with frogstands, chest to wall handstands and negative pistol squats.Don't forget Gaston...I haven't supplemented w/ powder* in a year maybe? 

I grill/broil: 

* chicken breast
* steak tips 

I slow-cook: 

* pork shoulder
* chicken thighs 

and I'll throw a fried egg or two on top of anything. I can pretty easily get ~150g of protein per day on two meals like this, w/ varying fat. For example, I'll skip breakfast (training fasted), eat an 8oz chicken breast for lunch (~50g of protein) w/ a sweet potato (another 10), then throw ~10-12oz of steak/shoulder/thighs (~100g protein) into brown rice for dinner. Easy and delicious. 

I buy my meat at Costco where I pay between $2-$5 a pound (pork cheapest, steak most expensive). It's also much more satiating than powders and doesn't spike my blood sugar so I can keep better control of my appetite. Every Sunday I spend an hour or so grilling everything and then just store it in tupperware for the week. Economical, easy, nutritious. 

*I do take BCAAs if I am training fasted. (Gender, Age, Height, Weight [kg/lbs please]) Male, 25, 60 or 183cm, 174lbs or 78.9kgs

**Goal**: Vague or specific (get bigger? Or master a planche by December?) Decent HS, OAC Negative, Cleaner MUs, more consistent BLs, all by end of Feb. 2015

**Routine**: Include what progress you've made this week. Extra reps? Longer hold? New progression?

**M**  HeSPU (5 sets to get to 30 reps), Pike Pushups 2 x 10, Pullups (x amount of sets to get to 60 reps), Dragon Flags (3 sets of negatives, 2 sets of candlesticks), Hanging Leg Raises 4 x 7, Korean Dips 3 x 6, End workout with HS or Grip training for 10  15 min

**T**  Front Squats 4 x 5, Deadlifts 2 x 3, High Pulls (pullup + chinup variation) 4 x 3, Slow controlled (pullups + chin-ups) 3 x 8, Windshield Wipers 3 x 8, Planche Leans for 10 mins, 15 min jog @ end

**W**  Volleyball

**Th**  Back Squats 3 x 5, Weighted Pullups (x amount of sets to get to 25/30reps), Weighted Dips (x amount of sets to get to 30 reps), Towel Chinups and OAC Negatives 3 x 3, Hanging Leg Raises, 4 x 6, HS or Grip practice for 10  15 min

**Fri**  Circuit/Endurance (8 sets of 10x pullups, 10x dips, 10x Goblet Squats + 45lbs, 10x pushups, 10x Ab Exercise), all followed by a 15 min jog + 10 min of HS or Grip practice

**Sat**  High Pull / MU practice 4 x 3, Dragon Flag Negatives 4 x 5, Back Lever / Front Lever Training, (sometimes on Sat. Ill just do random stuff for fun or to mess around)

Diet/Mood/Energy/Anything else relevant to your training:

Plan on cutting @ 2000 cal or less for at least 4-5x days of the week to get my diet in check.

HS is getting much better, I feel like within a few weeks I should be able to hold a consistent handstand for at least 10-20 seconds. 

Pull up endurance feels like it's decreasing, can only hit 20+ on certain days but I'd rather work on higher pulls ala chest to bar pulls to better my MUs.  I was able to get a few dead-hang false grip MUs on the bar so that's cool.

Dragon Flag progression is actually getting somewhere, candle sticks are much easier now and I can lower fully (w/ both legs) with almost full control, can almost get back up.

Weighted Pullup PR currently @ BW+90lbs x 2

Weighted Dip PR currently @ BW+135lbs x 2

Weighted Chin up PR currently @ BW+90lbs x 1

BW Pullup PR @ 23 reps

BW Chinup PR (havent tested)

BW Dips (havent tested, know I can get 30+ though)

Longest holding HS is about 12 sec

Questions: Request any feedback you'd like on your routine. 
http://www.reddit.com/r/bodyweightfitness/wiki/faq#wiki_i_usually_train_with_barbells.2Fdumbbells.2C_how_do_i_integrate_that_with_bodyweight_training.3FMeat (where I live, sardines are the cheapest kind); eggs; milk derivates like cheese; legumes combined with rice.

I do take protein powder, but only when I haven't hit my protein target for the day, I don't want to cook, and there's nothing else available that can be eaten without cooking, as protein powder is the most expensive option (even more expensive than cheese) where I live (Dominican Republic). However, where my brother used to live, he did the math, and protein powder was cheaper than eggs or meat (he lived in Logan, Utah, USA). I don't use protein powders frequently, the last time I had a protein shake was like 3 weeks ago, about the 5th time in a year.

There's nothing unhealthy about eating protein powders, if you the powder ONLY contains protein, not those mixes more commonly sold (through some mixes, like mass gainers, have specific proper uses). Just go with the cheaper option."Shouldn't" is not the right term. It's okay if you're a bit rounded at first. Then overtime you aim to straighten out the back.Rule 1.Rule 3.Please review the sidebar on the right before posting.I browse this subreddit purely for my interest in Bodyweight fitness, I work out solely in the weights room. Regardless of that I would like to say FUCKING GOOD ON YOU for choosing to get motivated, the right way. 

Also read up on the old side bar, great source of info for well rounded progression. 

Final point, your current pics are somewhere I want to work towards. You have a great foundation to start from. Stay motivated. Stay hungry. GET FIT! 

Best to you mate.&gt; Since handstands are a primary goal for me, should I switch to HSPU progression instead of dips for strength work?

Nah. You can add more HS work (maybe on off days) though.

&gt; Is doing both Ido's shoulder stability and Emmet's ER strengthening too much?

Depends on the intensity.

&gt; Where is a good place for me to put them in, and how often?

End of your workout or in mobility sessions. Do a couple sets with a longer hold at the end (currently Emmet has me doing 3 sets of 10 with a 15-20s hold at the end). Slow tempo.  
I started out with 15 kg, and am still using 15 kg (it's been a couple weeks). Philosophy is to only increase weight if you're at a plateau.That's [Arevik Seyranyan](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=cStSBZPIY6k). She's a circus artist, third generation iirc. Wouldn't it be better for him to distribute the weight towards his knuckles too?Oh jeez, maybe one day. Glad that we cleared that up! Having dandasana posture with a flat back is called an "Advsnced L-sit" and is monstrously difficult. In an L-sit we are working on strengthening the shoulder depressors. It will make holding tolasana easy as pie! &gt;My goals are to lean up. Some extra strength would be nice, but primarily I need to trim the fat. I don't care how much I weigh, I just care about how I look and feel.

Eating less and doing the beginner routine is definitely the way to go. The routines you have been doing are too high rep for strength or mass. And yes make sure you get more than 1 day of rest (at least per muscle group). Traveling as well. Easier to pack a few servings of powder than carry eggs... Quark is quite common in Europe. It's similar to Greek Yoghurt. I buy mine non-fat. Costs about 70 cents for 500 grams of it, which will give you 45 grams of protein for about 250 calories.   
In terms of cost-effectiveness, this is almost the exact same price as 45 grams of a high-end protein powder would cost you, and additionally I fucking hate the taste of protein shakes, so I'd rather down this.you're so fking amazing jesus christ&gt;  For example, you get more protein from an egg than a powder

This is patently false.

Furthermore, eggs also contain more calories relative to the amount of protein contained within them, so they're not your best option if you need more protein but don't have a lot of calories to get them in.Rly great answers, thx.

I dont know yet if i will go full bodyweight or not, but pistols sounds nice. Do you have a link to the post u did talk about?

Nope i cant do a L-sit, so i guess i will do some normal pullups, and weighted.

EDIT: Found the video.. :)







i use it, but if i didnt...chicken, turkey, pork, fish, beans, milk with some steak on the weekends.  oh wait, i already do that.  id just need to eat even more without powder, and i get so full already....I have the trapeze rigging. It is awesome for everything except "above the bar" work. Even if you get the version with stability bar (highly recommended) and use sandbags for extra stability, it still may sway if you kip too hard or apply torque above the bar. I also have the same equipment issue, especially in the winter (rural New Englander living in a rental house). Muscle ups have to wait for summer at the moment. I just use a weighted vest to make progressions more difficult until I can get back outside to do workouts in the spring. Not ideal, but it's what I have to work with. Eggs, lots of eggs... Also cottage cheese, greek yoghurt and different kinds of meat. You know, the usual...That makes a lot of sense to me. I think the difference in postures at different levels just wasn't really clear to me in the beginner's guide for those of us with short arms and large behinds, though maybe I just needed to look even harder.Ahhhhhh that is totally where all of my confusion is coming from! Thanks! And totally didn't mean to insult your posture with that statement ;P. I do A LOT of yoga so I'm used to "expanding the rib cage." A pose that you're actively not supposed to do that in the beginning just was outside my understanding.Breakfast; Greek yogurt / eggs / sardines

Lunch; Chicken / eggs / tuna / sardines

Dinner; Chicken / salmon / eggs

If I'm consuming high carbohydrate I get additional protein from rice, beans, lentils, peas, whole grains etc etc and adjust main protein sources as necessary.  I occasionally drink milk but my dairy is usually cheese (with eggs) or greek yogurt.  I'll incude nuts with meals, string cheese, etc

Not even including trace protein sources from other food items, I've never had a problem actually hitting my protein targets (150g, give or take, depending on present goals.  I don't usually snack, so I pretty much split it up over the course of 3-4 meals and have never felt compelled to supplement with protein powders.  I can definitely see the convenience being a big factor, but I also enjoy eating real food which many will advocate over consuming protein supplements, at least 'excess' amounts.I try to get it in my meals (ie. meat, legumes, nuts, eggs). My standard protein supplement if I'm feeling short is plain non fat greek yogurt with some fruit,  seeds, some maple syrup or jam.A couple quick points:

1) I wouldn't recommend doing both squats and deadlift in the same workout. They're both fairly draining exercises that hit fairly similar muscle groups. I used to try to fit both in and quickly realized that it ruined my form on the second exercise. There are some dudes who double up, but they've often been lifting for years. In general, for a beginner, split em up.

2) I would reconsider the way you've ordered your exercises. For example, I'd put plank earlier in your workout, if not incorporate it into your warm up. I'd stick deadlifting last or almost last, because it wrecks your posterior chain. Again, order is something that you have to play with and find your own balance, but putting deadlifting near the end of the workout is generally a good idea.

3) Consider changing barbell rows for bodyweight rows. They're easy to do on a bench rack and a better exercise, IMO.

4) Find someone to teach you how to squat. Seriously. Barbell squats are *so* much easier to progressively load than bodyweight squats. You only need to learn the form once and you can squat forever. Also bodyweight squats are just as dangerous to your joints with bad form. Watch [Alan Thrall's squat video](http://youtu.be/bs_Ej32IYgo), find someone to spot you/critic form, and just start light.I vaguely recall some study showing that protein synthesis was affected most by alcohol consumed in the period from 24 to 48 hours after lifting (or some similar time frame).  It was not strongly affected by alcohol consumed only a few hours after lifting.  Drinking before lifting would also not really affect protein synthesis, but would also mean you are lifting drunk, which is probably not the smartest thing one could do.

Two things I also remember: 1) the reduction was on the order of 20% or so, so it wouldn't render the workout useless, it's just suboptimal, and 2) it was a pretty considerable amount of drinking, something like 10 or more drinks, so having a beer or two after a workout probably isn't a problem.Eggs; nuts; deli meats; canned fish; pre-cooked chicken, steak, ham, etc.Cool Hand Luke ate 50 eggsOh sorry, I meant the exercises not listed in the beginner program. I just assumed that I can't straight up jump into progressions for my goal exercises.For OAC you can try adding some auxiliary work and get extra volume that way.No down votes here, but the reality for me is that access to water and a cup and spoon is easier than preparing items ahead of time and eating.&gt; you get more protein from an egg than a powder

Well, one scoop of powder is about the volume 1 - 1.5 eggs and has 4 - 5 times the amount of protein.

&gt;for a comparable volume eggs are much cheaper

With regard to price, I haven't a clue as we keep chickens so I don't know what eggs cost.  That said, one serving of my powder has the protein of 5 eggs, and - if the internet is to be believed - eggs are about $.20/each, so $1/serving would be the equivalent price.  You can find supplements that are cheaper and supplements that are more expensive than that; but, overall you don't get more protein, and it's not "much" cheaper to eat eggs.

That's all irrelevant to the original point of discussion, I don't use protein powders because I don't like the flavors, but I have recently ordered an unflavored powder to try.  That being said, I do find eggs to be the simplest real-food way to supplement protein intake.  Edit to add: oh yeah, and greek yogurt - I'm one of those vitamix weirdos and use greek yogurt in my green smoothies.M, 26, 193 cm, 88 kg
I do a pyramid PT three times a week (at least two days of rest between each workout)
It is from a Stew Smith (former Navy SEAL) book.
Here's the full description

http://www.stewsmith.com/linkpages/ptpyramids.htm

At the end of the workout, you'll have done:
-100 pullups (wide, shoulder width, chinups, commando, neutral grip)
-200 pushups mixed with dips
-300 4count flutter kicks mixed with sit-ups or whatever ab exercise you love.
After some months this routine is still a real butt kicker. Chrono times vary from 28 to 34 minutes for this PT.
Would recommend.

For the legs I mainly run plus do bodyweight squats, charlie Chaplins raises and lunges.I do 10-15 minutes of foam rolling and then 20 minutes of static stretches with yoga elements, to work on my flexibility and mobility. This is after a weightlifting routine though, I've not done bw in a while but I imagine it'll be similar just shorter.If you're trying to get 200+ g of protein in a day then don't you think its rediculous to eat 20 eggs a day? It's definitely **not cheaper**, it's really inconvenient and really hard to eat THAT much eggs or chicken. A lot easier to just drink it. 

I use whey protein and this is my side of the argumentIs that a daily calorie limit? Yea. The constant no rest will make your sweat and build up your cardiovascular potentialWhat do you mean by non-basic exercises?I am working through the same progressions, and the recommended rep range for normal, full push ups in CC are 2x20 before moving on to close (diamond) pushups.  You need to cut the reps and move on.I am going by convict conditionings suggestions.100 pushups? I thought the general recommendation was to increase the difficulty after you can get more than 3x12 or so? Have you tried diamond or one handed pushups?

How about working the pistol squat progression?Your back shouldn't be straight in an L-sit. You should look like [this](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=IUZJoSP66HI). Point your toes. 

I keep most everything in my head, with the exception of some weight/rep progress when I start a new routine/cycle so I can know what I should be lifting the next session.But wouldn't you flex your spine during regular back squat?  

I've always had back/spine issues with deadlift, clean, and other overhead lifts but never single-legged squat.  Most I've done is 5 full reps with 80lbs on my back.Thanks. So less rest then.  Make it more cardiovascular then you will sweat. Those high reps break them up into sets of thirty for example and go from one exercise to the other after each rep. 

Rep pushups, then immediately rep squats then immediately abs, thrn then back to pushups etc.I'm new to this sub so may get down voted for this, but my doctor friend said you're much better off not using powders, even just thinking financially.
For example, you get more protein from an egg than a powder and for a comparable volume eggs are much cheaper, so why would you use a powder?
I'd be interested to hear both sides of the argument though.The old school method...eggs, cheese/milk and meat (mainly fish/beef/bison). The occasional beans and rice added in. Plenty of protein to go around....meat?The squat progression starts out very easy, but the recommendation is that once bodyweight squats are easy you will replace that portion of the workout with squats and deadlifts, as described in the section you quoted. If you really want to do pure bodyweight, though, you could look at some Pistol Squat progressions. /u/Antranik made a good video about these.

As for the L-sit pullups, can you do an L-sit? If you can't it's likely that you need to develop strength in your hip flexors by practicing L-sits before you can do an L-sit pullup. In the meantime you could work on weighted pullups, wide grip pullups, or just trying to do more pullups.

The L-sit is a beastly core exercise, and you're also getting core exercise by doing the bodyline drills, especially the hollow body hold. If you want more core work, you could integrate dragon flags or ab wheel rollouts, though.Any wooden rod/dowel should be strong enough. And then you could just slip over any weighted plates over it for a bar or adjustable dumbbell.Chicken, lentils, eggs, beans, nuts, greek yogurt, chickpeas.For some reason I still haven't found apps that I like using consistently. For fitness tracking I use a pen and paper notebook - each week takes up two pages so I can always just flip back a page to see what I lifted last week and make sure I'm working on incremental growth each week. Pen and paper feels like old-school work tracking which keeps me in the grounded mindset I need for lifts. 

I use GoogleSheets for food tracking. I will usually eat consistently for a month or two before I change my diet, Sheets makes it very easy to track macros and setup/mod new diet plans while not having to re-enter macro details. I think you're just worrying that your hands are not directly underneath your shoulders, but it's totally normal to place the hands ahead of the butt so the butt is behind the hands so the shoulder blades are protracted.  You don't have to lift the chest up proudly in an L-sit.  That's a very advanced version of the L-sit that you could tinker with after you get the regular L-sit, which you are calling "bad posture L-sit" which is totally the normal one.[Last week](https://www.reddit.com/r/bodyweightfitness/comments/2umgrk/training_tuesday_post_your_routine/co9p5x8)

**Stats:** Male, 25 years old, 165cm/5'5", 59kg/130lbs

**Goals:**

For 2015: One armed pull ups, front lever, slow and back conscious build up with climbing

**Strength ~ calisthenics** four times per week/two day split working AB-AB--

*Warmup* is typically a handful of push ups, and pull ups before general limbering and movement. Shoulder dislocations. Then I alternate these two workouts. 

**Workout A**

5 x 5 weighted pull ups (+12kg currently)

3 x swings (7kg) (very attentively at the moment, new movement for me so working on form)

3 x 12 push ups (my back still disagrees with more unilateral variations, I I will get some resistance bands for these as I really like the idea of adding resistance that way) 

**Workout B**

2-3-5-2-3-5 pyramid of one handed OHP on each side (11kg) (new movement for me so form focus) (building up to 2-3-5-2-3-5-2-3)

3 x 10 goblet squats (5kg) (still working on form a lot)

3 x suitcase carries around my apartment on each arm (15kg)

Tucked front lever work (not really bothered about hold times at the moment, I am getting back into doing the movement again)

*Note:* I dropped the weight on my swings and squats for now. 

**Rehab**

I am continuing with extension exercises and doing additional stretches depending on what feels tight that day. I am working on my squat form to eliminate any buttwink. 

**Grip accessory work**

I am working on crushing strength from the Adamantium guide posted on /r/GripTraining and will work on open hand and pinching strength once I have set things up on my pull-up bar to do them. I will do one day of each type a week at the end of my workouts. 

**Other stuff**

My finance is getting stronger. My resting heart rate is 70 which I will do something about over the coming months. Its pretty common in the US among free software advocates and junkies like myself.  Really a nerd/geek kind of thing, it was out of place, I apologize for the ambiguity.I use a folder full of plain text files, one for each workout. Every day before I exercise I copy the previous workout's file, and then I adjust the numbers as I exercise.Ton of whole milk and chicken. Beans, Nuts, Seeds, Legumes in generalMilk. Beans. Some cheese.I emailed the people at trapezerigging, they said the bar isn't suitable.  It's too light for what I'm hoping to do.  Nice to get a fast honest response, makes me wish it did meet my needs so I could buy from them.

Has anyone else had success on home equipment for pullovers?That's an advanced position, the end goal. You have to work up to that. It's not really "bad posture" as you are not loading your back with any weight, but as you get stronger you can work on bringing your butt forward. The main things to focus on at this stage are really pushing yourself off the ground with your shoulders, keeping your arms locked, and compressing your abdomen to bring the legs up. You'll find that after you get good enough at the other stuff, straightening your back is not so hard.a mixture of grip training, jump roping and ab wheelingwhat are the daily five?

edit: nevermind, [found it](http://kitlaughlin.com/forums/index.php?/topic/374-the-daily-five/).Yeah, generally, whatever feels comfortable is OK. You can always vid it and post it up for a check.The day after? I thought you shouldn't drink the day of lifting? Now I shouldnt drink the day after to?Male, 24, 5'8'', 150lbs

My goal is just to continue getting stronger and move along the progressions.

I have 2 workouts, an upper body and a lower body.

Upper Body Workout:
mobility
warm-up

3 sets of handstand practice using the wall as little as possible

3 sets of L-sit/compression work

3 sets of Ring support/ L-sit on rings

3 sets of weighted pullups - 25lbs x 7

3 sets of weighted dips - 15lbs x 8

3 sets of archer rows - x 5

3 sets of ring pushups x 8

A few sets of tuck planche progressions

Grip work

Stretching

Lower Body Workout:  (what it typically is, have a knee injury holding me back currently)


mobility

warmup

3 sets of dumbell squats x 12-15

Pistols

3 sets of weighted lunges

3 sets of hip thrusts

3 sets of shrimps

stretching


Starting to plateau a bit so ive been mixed up the routine a bit. For example, switching weighted pullups with archer pullups or L sit pullups. Hoping that will help me break through the plateaus.


It's just to speed up your workouts. Since you're alternating between push and pull, you're recruiting completely opposites of muscles allowing a greater rest time between use of each individual muscle.

Supersets cut your time in half.Yes. I'm eating at a caloric deficit and doing HIIT sprints 2 times a week. I already walk to and back from work 3 days a week (1 hr per day total).

I think i injured my shoulder doing straight bar dips. Too much strain for me.I think I'd be able to do that for HSPU, something like do 2 every minute for 20 minutes (probably do a set less of dips though) or just increase sets. But with OAC negatives I just feel way too fried to be able to do more than 3 sets with decent form. Plus I don't want to fuck up my elbow too much, so I don't really know how to increase progress with those other than light/heavy. Any ideas?Maybe keeping your muscles a bit fresher? Pull ups and rows have some muscle overlap, so doing them sequentially might hurt the intensity of whatever is second. Kinda like doing squats then deads after.I view static stretching as part of my routine and it happens at the end.  I do it for improved mobility not for a cooldown.  Glad to help!Google docs spreadsheets for each movement.  I don't track food.  Shouldn't you be doing more cardio, plyometrics or anaerobic exercises if your goal's to lose your belly? 

Those exercises you mentioned are strengthening your legs, not exactly burning enough though to lose a belly. (Sorry if you're doing those things too, but if this is your only routine you need to try to add in something else if you're trying to get lean) Good luck with the shoulder too. Shit's frustrating, I'm just getting back into the swing of things after an injury myself. Don't rush back into it!That's exactly what I was thinking of doing, but didn't know if people would suggest to get more rest time.  
I have been lifting for over a year now, 6 days a week, so I do pretty well without rest periods.Thanks. That makes me confident about spending the money.Well, squats for me will actually be the last thing I switch to a barbell for.  It's the reason I want to do this bodyweight stuff honestly.  I LOVE squats... but I can't go even CLOSE to 90 degrees without falling on my ass.  So I really want to be able to do that.London.Which is why I'd love to go. I've never had proper coaching.Where you based in the Uk?You can totally do it.

Squats and deadlifts are recommended to be done with barbells.

I'd suggest you to have something like  ABA/BAB weeks A bodyweight, b weightlifting. Just an idea, but you can totally do both!**From the beginner routine:**

Integrating Barbell Squats and Deadlifts

The basic process works as follows:

The first workout of the week, you replace the squat progression by squats, 3 sets of 5 repetitions.
The second workout of the week, you replace the squat progression by deadlifts, 3 set of 5 repetitions.
The third workout of the week, you replace the squat progression by squats, 3 sets of 5 repetitions.
So every week, you will be squatting twice and deadlifting once

Before you do your "work sets" it's a good idea to warm up with less weight for squats and deadlifts: first do a bunch of reps with just the bar, then add weight and do another (slightly smaller) bunch of reps, then add more weight and do another (smaller still) bunch of reps, etc. until you are at the weight you want to be squatting at.

As for actually selecting a weight: the first time, start with just the bar. Then add weights in increments you feel comfortable with. Try to add some weight every workout at first.

Btw deadlifts should be **1x5**I like pen(cil) and paper for the flexibility. A table with exercises along the top and a row for every day is how I do it, filling in my results in the boxes. I don't personally keep track of diet but you could add a column for calories.

I would advise this method for anyone who wants something quick and simple and doesn't feel the need to accurately plot progress over a long period.

Also, I get some motivation from the idea of an empty box that needs to be filled in. But that's different for everyone.Yeah, that's how I was trying to respond.  Elite personal training is awesome, and better than a ski week.  Every time I've had hands on training from a leader in the field (any field) I have felt it was worth it.**Stats:** Male, 23 yrs, 5'8"/174cm, 158lb/71kg

**Goals:** good-ass freestanding handstand, fix Anterior Pelvic Tilt, rehab knees so I can run, prevent further injury in general.

**Routine:** Mostly just the beginner routine with some tweaks. Knees hurt so my leg work is limited. I do full body strength work MWF and shoulder mobility ([Emmet's handstand post](https://emmetlouis.wordpress.com/2014/10/04/fixing-arched-back-in-handstand/)) / skill work TuThSa. Some things I do daily.


**Daily:**

Dedicated to rehabbing knee valgus (due to weak hips and VMO) and fixing APT via the recommendations in [this thread](http://www.reddit.com/r/Fitness/comments/1prg6b/update_to_the_anterior_pelvic_tilt_fixing_thread/).

* walk my dog 30 minutes

* handstand and crane pose skill work (always do wrist prep before)

* foam roll / myofascial release -- especially for lats, psoas, and thighs

* giving horse stance a shot for the month -- usually just a few minutes

* Phrakture's [molding mobility](http://phraktured.net/molding-mobility.html)

* APT and knee valgus fixer exercises: light psoas stretch, planks, dead bugs, [PPT glute bridge](http://bretcontreras.com/wp-content/uploads/Band-Bridge.jpg) and [bodyweight squats](http://bretcontreras.com/wp-content/uploads/Band-Squat.jpg) with band (like pictures except just below knees). Using the bands to strengthen my weak hips so my knees don't turn in so much, also doing clams and lying abduction for hips. Lastly for knees, doing light VMO strengthening exercises.

**Strength MWF:**

Warmup

* cat/cow
* body circles
* leg swings
* cossack squats
* lengthy shoulder limbering from Kit's Master Shoulder Flexibility
* wall slides
* dowel dislocates
* wrist prep
* bodyline drills 60sec each
* jump rope to get blood flowing

Skill

* ring support 2x40sec
* chest-to-wall handstand 3x30sec
* single leg L-Sit 2x20sec each leg (I know this is strength technically but I don't pair it with anything)

Progression pairs

* pullups / dips (close to 3x8 for both)
* feet-elevated rows / decline diamonds (at 3x10 for both, will change these soon)
* [back extension](http://www.bodybuilding.com/exercises/exerciseImages/sequences/47/Male/m/47_1.jpg) / abwheel rollout on knees (3x8 for both)
* leg work is tricky due to knee issues, so I usually just see how I'm feeling that day. Often this is careful split squats and lightweight goblet squats. I fucked up my knee from running hard and getting overzealous with pistol/shrimp squat work.
* dead hang for 3x60 at end of workout
* Phrakture's starting stretching after everything with a focus on lats/chest for handstand mobility

**Yoga / mobility TuThSa:**

This is mostly the daily work plus a few things.

* 30min vinyasa flow yoga
* light stretching if I feel like it
* external rotator strengthening using Emmet's recommendation: cuban rotations, trap 3 raises, and band pull aparts. all 4x10.
* [Ido's shoulder stabilization routine with light bands](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1YHIV4a81Os)

**Sunday:**

My heavy stretching day. A bunch of the stretches from Kit's Master Shoulder and Squat flexibility series.




**Questions:** 

* Since handstands are a primary goal for me, should I switch to HSPU progression instead of dips for strength work? The pike and box pushups didn't really appeal to me, but I would switch if it would make a big difference in handstand improvement

* Is doing both Ido's shoulder stability and Emmet's ER strengthening too much?  Doing both isn't too taxing but I wonder if it's unnecessary or too much volume.

* I really want to start implementing Jefferson curls into my routine and need advice. Where is a good place for me to put them in, and how often? What weight should I start with and what is a good (safe/conservative) way to progress? My hamstring flexibility sucks, and my pike with locked knees is somewhere between fingers and fist touching the floor. Should I wait until I have a little more ham flexibility?
Classic pen and paper workout log. Also, somewhat unique from others in my experience, I use a calendar-based log. I divide one full page of my notebook into 7 days ahead of time (each week), and my workouts go in their corresponding days. I used to do 2 weeks per page before my workouts got more extensive.

Programmed rest days are noted as "REST" and I list any stretching or skill work I do. This way, any missed workouts or rest days where I didn't do anything are left blank. If I fall off for a while, it's blatantly obvious as a string of blank days. I can't fool myself. This is a great visual indicator of my workout schedule and I highly recommend it if you have scheduling problems.I've just started working the OAHS. Do you usually use straddled leg position during your practice or closed/full position? That's awesome to hear, thanks for the advice! Do you know when and how I'll add in progressions for the non-basic exercises?There are always advantages to having someone work with you, especially if it's on more complicated movements. Even if you are filming yourself all the time, you can still miss some things that someone with more experience will notice. I was just trying to make a comparison as to what else can be brought for a similar price. I can afford the seminar, it's whether or not it'll feel like money well spent, after all it's a lot of money to spend on what is essentially a hobby (one I am passionate about though).I use myfitnesspal for food tracking, as they seem to have the best database of stuff if you want to scan (from EAN/UPC codes).  
For fitness tracking, I use fitnotes irregularly and it works well (After you add the exercises that you are doing).Thanks for that. Interestingly, he also wants to do track.op plsIf a week ski holiday is something you can/would afford, the seminar is worth it.  

If a week ski holiday is financially of reach/unjustifiable then the seminar probably is too.For outside context, we were allowed to do weight training in school in 7th or 8th grade.  Fit 7th graders were invited to the club, any 8th grader could take the class.

I was a wimpy asthmatic 12 year old.  Doing the weight training class gave me the confidence to do track and field the next year.  It didn't fix my asthma, but it helped me stop using the asthma as an excuse not to be active.Redwood 33 male, 175cm, 85.6 kg before the weekend, 88.8 after (!?)

[Previous Tuesday](http://www.reddit.com/r/bodyweightfitness/comments/2ttr9w/training_tuesday_post_your_routine/co2dl6k)

**Short Term Goals**

* weight down to 70kg
* freestanding handstand for &gt;30 seconds
* get my hamstring flexibility up to the point where I can touch the floor in pike

**Long term goals**

* Lower body fat until I have a visible six-pack
* Do a pull up with my wife hanging off me

**Routine**

* Beginner routine basic mobility warmup
* 10 squat-jumps
* Handstands, I'm up to 5 seconds freestanding

* Pull-ups: Just got an effective bar, I can do a couple full pull-ups and then have to switch to negatives for the rest of the set, so it's about 3x3 full + 5 negative. Trying to up the number of full pull-ups by one every day.
* Dips: I haven't yet found anything stable enough to do true parallel bar dips so I do a horizontal dip, basically like a backwards horizontal row, between two chairs. Got too strong to do this with my feet out so now I'm elevating them on a stool. 3x8
* Squats: Have been a huge problem, I put up a [thread](http://www.reddit.com/r/bodyweightfitness/comments/2ut6pf/squats/) about it. Currently doing 3x10-15 cossack squats and 3x10 sandbag squats.
* L-sits: I hate these things. I'm on one-legged L-sits for 3x20 seconds now though.
* Pushups: Trying to get the hang of pseudo-planche pushups as diamond isn't cutting it for me anymore. I find the pose really awkward though. At 3x6 of them.
* Rows: I don't have anywhere to do anything but horizontal, so I am starting to up my reps of horizontal to 3x10.
* Cooldown: Using the stretch set on /r/flexibility, thirty seconds per stretch, except pike stands which I do 2x60 seconds.

**Diet**

I went on a weekend work retreat and relaxed my calorie counting to about 100-200 below my TDEE instead of 750-1000 below, and seem to have gained a ton of weight. I think it's mostly from eating salty shit and not drinking much water though. We'll see what happens over the next few days.

**Other**

I'm moving in a few weeks and in my new house I'll have space to put up some real equipment. Hurray!I'll have to give it another read.

I've never had a personal trainer or been to a class, for the most part, working out doesn't cost me a thing. I suppose I'm trying to find a way to justify the price.Let me add that creatine and glutamine are very good in gaining strength/size.  I would recommend those in a protein shake most days.Like an ash or mahogany?I have read some good replies.  Let me add this:

Eat everything for your goal weight, not your current weight.  And, while some sources say that 1-2g per lb is necessary for protein, it has only ever been proven for about 1g per kg for protein (minimum).  I personally always find results with calories and protein monitoring, with a daily multi-vitamin (pretty much what the first response posted says).  So, if you want to be 220lb, use 100g of protein (minimum) as a reference.  And, use a BMR calculator, along with all activities done (literally everything), and remember that 3500 calories consumed is +1lb, and 3500 calories burned is -1lb.The smokable kind &gt;One of the most important functions of the post-exercise cool down is to prevent dizziness. Strenuous exercise causes the blood vessels in your legs to expand, bringing more blood into the legs and feet. When you stop exercising suddenly without taking time to cool down, your heart rate slows abruptly and that blood can pool in your lower body, causing dizziness and even fainting. 

Holy shit. Thanks for this share. I got dizzy and felt light-headed for a few moments last night, driving home from my martial arts class. Thankfully, while stopped at a light. I didn't cool down afterwards, I just left. I thought it was an electrolyte depletion--felt just like it--but I'd been solid on my sodium and potassium all day and throughout class. Today, I Learned. I asked Sommer how important they were in his AMA. You can probably figure out what he replied :pSo long as the center of gravity isn't past the mid point between the bar and the end of the legs, it shouldn't fall. Just a note, additional leg work may not have been included because it adds weight in the legs.I am at around 1.5-1.7 g/kg at the moment, no protein supplements of any kind.

Pretty happy with that.  My date last night told me I had a hot as fuck body and I am barely even getting started, so :)That's exactly what I'm looking at. My best guess, with trains, accommodation and food, is it will cost around 500 for the two days. 

I'm just hesitant as for the same price I could have a whole week ski holiday, 50 climbing sessions, Movement 1/2/3, Stretch 1/2/3, etc etc.

If it made a tremendous difference to my GST I'd think it worth while but I'm having a hard time imagining just how much difference 2 days training will make.  Hi guys i have learned already so much. There are flaws in my routine i believe. For rest i usually rest only around 15-30 seconds since i believed that it would work your muscles unless you fatigue them. I will implement more rest so i can do pull ups. 
I have also looked into pike push ups. They are mainly a shoulder exercise? Is there any more pushing exercises that you feel i should incorporate in my workout? Im excited for my next workout!!

Btw in case youre wondering my height is around 5 ft 5/6. 19 years old and im skinny like when bruce lee before he got so ripped

EDIT: Also i am reading the reccomended routine. I want strength and aethetic gains. if i pair pull ups with dips do i need to rest since its a pulling and pushing? resting kills the moment!About keeping a full grip on the stick... I can't keep a single finger over the stick when I try to bring it down behind my back; no matter how wide I go (The stick I'm using is taller than I am). I don't get any stretch worth mentioning in the wrist or forearms either since it's the grip I cannot maintain.

I can get comparatively narrow width throughout the motion using a resistance band. Should I just resign myself to using a band or is there something else I can do to help with the required forearm/wrist mobility?What kind? &gt; There's cool down for weightlifting programs 

There is?Joshua Naterman said that the earlier you can go, the better it is since it will fix any stuff you might be doing incorrectly and therefore set you up better for future work.

I was going to go to the UK one this summer but it falls on the only weekend in July that I know I won't be able to make it. So I will have to wait until 2016.

Just an FYI, if you own F1+H1 and manage to get the super early bird special on their seminar, you can almost half the price of the seminar.You can also buy or make [parallettes](http://www.endofthreefitness.com/wp-content/uploads/2011/10/parallettes.jpg) for that sort of thing.You are meant to be 'hollow', which means your back is curved somewhat and your shoulders press down. Unless you have a serious birth deformity there's no way your arms are too short in the correct position. When you stand up, do your fingers reach below your belly button? 

My wife had major problems starting out because her shoulders were not strong enough and she wound up raising them, which lowered her butt. I had problems starting out because my core was weak and I couldn't compress my belly high enough. Both of these make it seem like the problem is arm length, but you'd have to look like a t-rex for arm length to actually be a problem. Take a look at proper posture and see the position of your back. The butt is going to be behind the shoulders.[Last week](http://www.reddit.com/r/bodyweightfitness/comments/2umgrk/training_tuesday_post_your_routine/co9t1d0)

**Stats:** Male, 22 y/o, 5' 10", 171 lbs.

**Goals:** Freestanding HSPU, 2x squat, control my weight and avoid stretch marks. Long term: planche and cool shit.

**Routine:** The only major change to my programing was adding a four set of pull-ups, and negatives at the end. My pull up work now looks like 4/4/4/2 + 10 of the slowest negatives I can manage. Hopefully the extra volume will help me push through this pull-up plateau I'm stuck at.

Also I'm pushing my squat up too quickly. I'm gonna slow down and hold myself at 2.5 plates for two weeks or so to get my form rock solid and let my abs catch up. I still have a bad tendency to rock onto the balls of my feet at the very bottom of the motion and it sucks for my back.

My biggest problem right now is my weight's been fluctuating all over the place. When I weighed myself last week, I was a pretty steady 175-176.5 all week. Around Tuesday I started actively counting my calories and eating at a deficit to prevent the kind of absurd mass gain I've been experiencing these last couple months. This was motivated in part because of a small stretch mark I found on my left pec.

So far, I've averaged about -20% of my calculated TDEE over the last 7 days. Yesterday when I weighted  myself, I was down to 172 lbs. That seems like a rather excessive drop over a single week.

I weigh myself daily immediately after working out (~5:30 pm) to stay consistent. This rules out confounding factors like an inconsistent schedule, large meals immediately before, etc. Although 3.5 lbs could definitely just be water weight, I wasn't feeling dehydrated yesterday, and 3.5 is a lot of water to lose without noticing. Will update with today's weight to see where we stand.

**TL;DR:** Lost a bunch of weight, tryna figure out why.Here's a good resource on power training for athletes: http://www.sport-fitness-advisor.com/power-training.html

Basically what people do wrong is doing something that falls into the conditioning category(high reps, low rest) and thinking they are somehow improving their explosiveness. I did watch that which is why I was wondering if bad posture l-sits are ok. Everything but that video seems to indicate to do them with a straight back, butt under shoulders. I'm going to try blocks under my hands. Ok blocks sound like a great suggestion, I'll see what makeshift hard things I have around the house. Thanks. yes, they're strict pull-upsDid you watch Antranik's tutorial? Did you see his L-sit? It's quite hunched.I've always wanted to implement GTG, but it's not compatible with my work schedule 

thanks!
I don't know of any in particular.  I know the calculator at IIFYM has an "athlete's formula" and a "lean body mass formula", where the latter allows you to put in your bf%; I think that calculator is recommended for people with higher bf%, and the former is presumably for people with lower bf%.  I would guess that bf% would have the greater impact than strength numbers, since it is muscle mass and not strength that would increase BMR.Yup, you'll have trouble with L-sits. You can try using blocks of wood or something to put your hands on, with your butt between them, essentially manufacture extra room for your butt. The beginner routine recommends 3 minutes and that's what I recommended. I know people who go up to 5 minutes since that suits them better and that's why I included the part in parentheses.I really did read everything, look at every diagram, and educated myself before starting this. Another user asked me to sit in a chair with my arms down and report back to him where my wrist falls. It's about a cm above my bottom bum. I really want to do L-sits (starting with the supported ones of course) but it seems like my only option for that is hunched over. Everyone told me this was a supportive community but goodness am I not seeing that in these comments. I'm in the same boat..I'm definitely starting with the supported L-sit. When I sit in a chair, my wrist comes to about a centimeter above the bottom of my bum :(. I agree with you on all of this advice except the rest period. 3 minutes is more than enough to recover. If you wait too long to recover, the next set won't be more difficult than the one before it, which should be the goal.

It's not that you shouldn't be able to complete the set, but it should require more effort. This should get harder until the last rep of the last set is failure.I'm really flexible, I'm not worried about that. I'm trying supported L-sits, so I'm not going straight to the hard version, but when sitting on a chair with my arms down, my wrists stop about a cm above the bottom of my bum. (User above me just asked me to check that)I make sure I'm not sitting anywhere idly regardless of how tired I am, just keep moving around doing stuff or take a bath, but not sitting: that's my cool down right now.My wrists are about a centimeter above the bottom of my bum. How long are you resting between those pull ups? You should rest such that you can give it maximal effort again, up to like 3 minutes (if not more). If even with a long rest, you can not do 10 again, do fewer reps and shoot for similar amount of reps for 3-5 sets. So, try to shoot for 3x8 or 5x5 pull ups with 1-3 minute rest between each set.

Sounds like you're ready for one arm but just need some balance and core strength to keep stable while doing it.

So basically for pull ups I can do 1 set of 10 reps then I get tired and I cannot do the same amount. Any tips?

I will try pseudo plan he push ups!! For diamond I can do around 25. Am I ready for one arm? When I do one arm I feel very awkward one side falling off (balance) is this normal? I also don't feel it in my arms muchWow this looks so silly and fun I love it. Here is a pretty good article on cooling down: http://www.livestrong.com/article/414362-why-does-the-body-have-to-cool-down-after-exercise/

The first paragraph sums up why I like to cool down. So, the pike -&gt; handstand push-up progression is different than just fooling around with handstands. [This](http://www.nerdfitness.com/blog/2013/10/24/how-to-handstand-better-than-luke-skywalker/) is a fairly comprehensive guide to practicing handstands. Good luck and have fun -- and thanks for the gold!Thanks. Could you elaborate slightly on how people do explosive training wrong?Nobody's saying other routines give you size or strength, its just that people post "do beginner routine" on threads where that comment is not even applicable. It's like idgaf about the thread/ i didn't even read it but just do beginner routine.Yo!

http://www.reddit.com/r/P90X/comments/2usmog/serious_i_found_that_furiously_masturbating/I have never done a cooldown when training. I just do the heavy exercises like squats and deads first and finish with assistance/isolation workUPDATE: it is actually possible imitating a dual anchorpoint setup - mine looks like this now: http://imgur.com/lRBFuxd

You just have to roll up each of the TRX handles in opposite direction around the bar.Weight plus the bar.

Post to /r/weightroom, then link it in your TT or something.&gt; What are your thoughts on implementing light/heavy instead of adding more volume or doing something like rest pause or some density protocol?

For HSPU and OAC I'd try volume first and then intensify, and otherwise switch to light/heavy.

&gt; would weighted Bulgarian split squats or lunges (or even weighted pistols/shrimps) be a solid alternative for the traditional high bar back squat?

Definitely.I think TRX and rings are pretty different from each other, since the TRX work is usually done with feet or hands on the floor. Also that TRX is a great help for stability, e.g. when getting into pistol squat, plus I love the exercises with feet in the TRX, like atomic pike or [this exercise](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=cj8VQZCJjHs&amp;t=4m47s) (which is something I have never seen with rings - correct me if I'm wrong)

Was looking for a way to advance into a floating training system wit hmy current setup, since I am not able [don't have room] to go for a ring setup (yet!). You could do rear leg elevated split squats(also called bulgarian squats) for further strength development, or use less weight and do them explosively. Sommer says to be careful with these, so procede with caution. 

Another exercise is killers(IIRC): jumping lunges with weight; I assume these will be in one of the Movement courses.

 There are really many choices, I think one or two heavy leg exercises and one-two explosive ones will be enough. Make sure to read how explosive training is done - for some reason most people do it all wrong.**M/40/5' 7"/150**

**Goal: OAHS**

**Routine:**

I have changed things up quite a bit over the past few weeks after having decided that twice a week was not nearly enough to make progress in OAHS. 



4 days a week:

3 x 1 minute sets of belly to wall - I spend 15 seconds on one arm then shift to the other.

2 sets of 1 minute wall walks.

12-16   30 second sets of OAHS  / 15 seconds per arm

5 straddle planche press handstand

5 pike press handstand

5 straddle press handstand

3x10 dragon flags

3x10 HSPU

3x10 Pullups

I alternate pullups with rows on alternating days.
Same with dragon flags - I alternate between tuck/straddle/pike or HLLyes, gonna try and adjust the TRX setup so it is closer to having two separate anchor points, I think this can work alright! Thx for vid.

Will also get more into the dips and HSPU with leg into TRX. 
Was just under the impression that the advanced front/back lever is done in the rings, and I hoped some of the introductory exercises could translate to the TRX (probably only with two anchor points).yes, and I do L-sit on the floor already. Was looking to advancing that onto rings/TRX, which can be done and is alright. But it is not really optimal (since the straps is going under your arms, or outside shoulders). Gonna try and adjust the TRX setup so it is closer to having two separate anchor points to see if this works.I see, well you should incorporate both and start cleans early, even if with just the bar. It's a lot more technical than just a front squat, and doing front squats won't help you learn much past racking the bar. They also stress different muscles - front squats will work your quads and 'core' musculature and not so much your posterior chain. The "pull" in the clean is pretty much all posterior chain and upper back. [Last week](http://www.reddit.com/r/bodyweightfitness/comments/2umgrk/training_tuesday_post_your_routine/co9qjo0)

**Male, 26, 183cm/6'0, 83kg/182.6lbs**

**Goals:** Get stronger, add muscle mass, better L-sit, get better at deadlifts

**Routine**

Warm-up

* 50s hollow hold
* Leg swings (10 each side)
* 5 x wall slides
* 60s side plank (right side)
* 10 x spidermans
* 10 x cat-camel stretch
* 60s side plank (left side)
* 10 x band dislocates
* External shoulder rotation (8-10 each side)

Main Routine

* 3x5-6 Deadlifts @ 90kg

* 3x6 Chin-ups *paired with*
* Side split holds (between sets)

* 3x6 PPPU *paired with*
* Front split holds/hip flexor stretch (between sets)

PLUS EITHER

* 3x1 L-sits *paired with*
* Pike stretch holds (between sets)

OR

* 3x6 Pistol squats @ 7kg counterweight *paired with*
* Ankle dorsiflexion mobility stretches (between sets)


**Routine Commentary**

I'm thinking of making pistol squats part of the "core routine" (ie doing them every workout) but I don't really want to drop L-sits. My L-sits at the moment aren't feeling as good simply because I'm doing them at the end of the workout and I'm already fatigued (I used to do them at the start and they felt great). I will think about this and see what happens. Ultimately, as long as I keep doing the DLs, chin-ups and PPPUs I'll be satisfied and I'll feel free to experiment with other exercises.  

I experimented with support hold and dips today as I had a bit more time up my sleeve. I was able to get a 60s support hold on my first try which was pleasing (although, to be honest, I expected as much).

I forget to count my exact number of deadlifts each set but it's always either 5 or 6.

Yesterday I was a bit pressed for time so I dropped a set of deadlifts and the stretches and paired chin-ups with PPPU. Doing this I managed to get the entire routine (including the 10 minute warm-up) done in about 40 minutes which I was quite happy with.


**Diet/Mood/Energy/Anything else relevant to your training**

Diet is pretty much the same as last week. I've set a meal template for weekdays and I stick to that fairly well. Dinner is variable but I'm getting 190-200g of protein even without taking dinner into account so I'm fairly happy with it. I loosely tracked my calories yesterday and came in at around 3100 and this is without dinner (I didn't have dinner last night).

My sleep has improved a bit as I caught up on some sleep on the weekend, it could still improve it a bit more though. I noticed today that I was fatiguing a little easier due to undersleeping by a touch the past two nights.

I'm really enjoying my new routine so far which is great as it will help me adhere to it for longer.

Still haven't tracked my weight consistently or started taking progress pictures. Hopefully I will start soon.


**Questions**

When you quote a weight that you are lifting do you quote just the plated weight or the plated weight plus the bar? Because right now I have 70kg just in plates for my deadlift.

I would like to post a form check for my deadlifts. Should I post here in this sub or in /r/weightroom?


Edited post to reflect total weight of bar and plates used on deadlifts.
I've been doing phrakture's Molding Mobility ([link](http://phraktured.net/molding-mobility.html)) before working out, and Start Stretching after.  

Static stretching is a nice way to cool down and relax if you have the available time. It's even recommended, though I don't have any sources right now to reinforce my claim.Thanks. To be clear, I meant start by only training F squats until I get good and comfortable before swapping them for cleans, not the order in a single workout.There's actually a slackline at my gym and I've been throwing in some SLSs on it. Perhaps I should do more of that.(M, 18, 178/5'10, Weight 70kg/155lbs)

 Goal: 5s straddle planche by the summer, hollowback press, FL, OAC, get fucking bigger legs

Routine: 
Since I've been stalling on OAC and HSPU, I've decided to implement some kind of light/heavy alternation for those exercises. I do double progression for the barbell exercises instead of adding incremental weights (because I don't have them and because I like the bigger hypetrophy of the higher rep ranges in those exercises):

* Planche lean 5x10s

* 1 leg FL 2x5x6s

* HeSPU 5x3/3x5 alternating with OHP 3x6-10 

* OAC negatives 2x3x5-6s alternating with weighted chinups or some kind of assisted chinup 3x6-10

* RTO plus leaning Dips 3x5-10

* Barbell rows (couldn't think of a bodyweight exercise to do instead of this) 3x5-10

* Some kind of squat/lunge/pistol/split squat


Diet/Mood/Energy/Anything else relevant to your training: Planche leans are the bomb.

Questions: What are your thoughts on implementing light/heavy instead of adding more volume or doing something like rest pause or some density protocol? Also since I'm limited to squatting the weight I can clean (around 50kg) would weighted Bulgarian split squats or lunges (or even weighted pistols/shrimps) be a solid alternative for the traditional high bar back squat?
**(Gender, Age, Height, Weight)**: male, 22, 183cm/6', 74kg/163lbs


**Goals:** Front Lever, decent HeSPU, get a good straddle, bulk up.

**Routine:**

*Mobility*

 - 10r Wall extensions
 - 10r Band Dislocates
 - [Yuri band mobility sequence](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=zdwEWchSjrI)
 - 2x15r Rear delt pull apart
 - 2x15r Trap-3 raise
 - 2x15r Cuban press
 - T spine mobilisation/Butcher's Block
 - 10r Cat/Camel
 - 10r full body circles
 - 10r front leg swings
 - 10r side leg swings
 - wrist prep
 - bodyline drills

*Strength work (rest 90 seconds between sets)*

 - Pair:
  - 3x6 L-sit Pullup
  - 3x3 HeSPU negatives on a count to 15
 - Pair:
  - 6x10s Advanced Tuck FL
  - 3x8 RTO Pushup
 - 3x1-5min Horse Stance
 - 5x10 Cossack Squat
 - 2x15 Ring Curls

*Stretching*

 - Lat stretch
 - Pec stretch
 - Pigeon Pose
 - Bent leg hamstring stretch
 - Foam rolling upper back + piriformis

**Additional comments:**

First Full ROM HeSPU got done last week, but not consistent enough yet to move away from negatives completely.

This Steady State Cycle on FL work will come to an end, have to test my new max on friday.

Will work on building up volume on Cossack Squats as per advice of Emmet, who had awesome progress in depth with doing sets of 50.

Recently included Ring Curls as additional bicep tendon prep, don't know if it's doing any good yet.

Diet has been inconsistent the past two weeks, so weightgain has been minor. This week it's back on track though. Woo.

**Questions:** -[Last week](http://www.reddit.com/r/bodyweightfitness/comments/2umgrk/training_tuesday_post_your_routine/co9qv64)

**Stats:** Male, 21 years old, 183cm/6'0", 83kg/182lbs  
**Goals:** Solid handstand, build work capacity, git gud

**Routine**  
Work capacity has much improved. The short rests aren't quite as bad now, except for maybe unilateral work, which has double the sets with the same rest, basically. Quite happy with my progress here.  
I had some knee issues with cossack squats where I couldn't fully lock out the right knee, but that's doing better now. Still can't get it everytime, but it's much improved and should be good in a couple weeks.  
Shoulders are doing okay, I guess. I need to find a good massage therapist because shit is tight.

**Diet/mood/energy**  
Overate a lot over the weekend, so weighed in at 84kg today and yesterday, but for the most part my weight has been around 83 kg, whereas it was hovering just under 82.5 kg last week. Quite rapid, so it's a good idea to be a bit more strict about tracking and stuff. Should be easy because I have not many social events coming up.  
Feeling fine overall, but I'm tired a lot. My new schedule forces me to get up early 3 days a week, and I've never been good with that.  
Extremely high rep training has a place in the training of the musculo-skeletal _system_.  We are talking about a system here, after all, consisting of muscles that provide force that acts upon bones which ultimately produce movement.

The minute we introduce bones into our thinking, we need to talk about points of articulation, where bones meet a.k.a joints, and means of attaching muscle to bone, a.k.a tendons and ligaments.  This is made painfully, very painfully in fact, obvious when we start talking about RSIs, or repetitive strain injury, which is not a muscular injury, but rather mostly damage to ligaments.

If you're into bodyweight fitness, then you must have come across joint prep exercises.  Nobody that does joint prep expects those exercises to produce muscular hypertrophy.  If you do, then you should probably spend some more time considering your training approach.

All of this is to say that if you are doing extremely high volumes of low intensity work, then you are categorically not doing hypertrophy work.  The research literature on this is unequivocal.  What you are doing, however, is pumping synovial fluid through your joints, and this is crucial to joint health ( up to a point, as always ).

Ultimately, then, such accumulation training is much more likely to produce adaptations in joint / ligament structures which are much less visible to the eye.  It is hard to see a strong stable joint, although, boy oh boy will you know it when the opposite is the case.

So if /u/travelsnake's friend is mindlessly performing these accumulation sets expecting hypertrophy, then he is bound to be disappointed.  If he is diligently attempting to improve his joints, tendons, and ligaments, then he may have a point, although there may be better ways to go about it.  I would assume that you are like me, everything you eat goes thru without leaving a "mark". 
I started to work out a year ago, im 30,177cm and start weight was 65kg....
I suggest to first get sack of "gainer" (high carb/ semi prot) and take it after workout. You will gain ~20kg fast, but that will mostly come from muscle gains.
Do not count anything for love of god, just look what you eat and eat!
I didnt eat breakfest before and well my luches were crap. Now i est healthy breakfest and also i try my best to eat healthy on lunch and so on.
(Oh and i weight kow 82kg with bodyfat on around 22%)

In short, just eat a lot and healthy and hit the gym!I'm just practicing legs because of shoulder pain :(


28, male, 176cm, 71kg


Skinnyfat trying to lose my belly and get lean.


**Pistol squats:** 1/2/1/1/2


**Calf raises:** 40/50


**Lying leg raises:** 8/8/12/12



Until my shoulder heals this is what i'm doing.If you can do 50 push ups in one set, they're too easy for you. Move onto a more difficult progression such as diamond push ups or even PPPUs. This is all the in sidebar.I don't have time to cool down. I shower, have a shake, and leave for work. Yes thats it! So basically i can do around 50 push ups at once if i wanted to. Would there be any point in doing normal push ups 3 sets x 10 reps? I dont think id get much tired from doing 10 reps.Get used to working out! You really have to like it or you will end up doing half assed excercises.

If you want to start, /r/loseit will help
and as usual go for the beginner routine.

and dont forget to work legs!Please repost without starting your title with "training tuesday"Have you looked into a suspension trainer? Have a look at a few youtube videos, you can do bodyweight stuff with them.Depends, if you're already able to do pull-ups I'm not sure this will help you progress.I'm not flexible enough to do pike pushups but I'm extremely interested in doing hand stands. Are there any other alternative progressions you can recommend for getting into being able to becoming a handstanding badass?Stretches and maybe some foam rolling. Definitely need the rest! Try doing running or yoga or messing around with skill work like hand stands / crow stands / elbow levers or whatever on your off days.Alright I will be subbing Pushups with OHP. I definately enjoy benching more than push-ups since I feel like I'm in more control of my progression with that. Thank you for your advice! Also I do have one more question if you are able to answer it: If I do not feel sore, is it safe to do this work out daily? Would it speed up my strength progression or hinder it? Right now I'm doing it every other day and I feel as though I can definately do all this daily.One thing I forgot to mention in the other thread is that you also don't have any vertical pushing; you could swap out either push-ups or bench for a dip progression/pike progression/over-head press.Thank you for answering.Yes.Well yeah, focusing on diet is very important and takes a lot of time, at first.

Once you figured out and are able to handly a clean(er) diet without much stress and have time start working out.

But if you have the time and mind it, the beginner routine is there for you to add to all your efforts. 

Make sure you have good form and don't get hurt by pushing too hard too soon.I dunno maybe.  I just kinda... stop." but just his ability to clear waste products" 

Thanks for your comment, please could you provide more information/links on this aspect? I'm just starting bodyweight fitness and I'm complementing it with 30-40 minutes of rope jumping 3 times a week. My weight and strength gain goals are secondary to generally feeling fitter and cleaner but I'm struggling to find information that isn't centred on the hypertrophy/strength side of things. Thanks :)Aren't we? There's cool down for weightlifting programs so I thought BWF would require it too. Static stretching or something else?Need to update or flesh out the Press Handstand Technique Thursday.These are shiiiiiiiit.Hi Xatim, please see the update. It went well. Lousy routines.I moved my squats from floor to rail/fit ball as a progression. In a way it is similar to moving your pushups/dips to rings. But maybe it was covered already in foundation, I don't know.It can definitely work. While you listed five gymnastics goals, in reality you'll have to work only on three. By the time you learn planche you'll have a rock solid tuck front lever as well as a dragon flag. If I were you I'd start a 6-day marathon training program and add in 3 days of bodyweight training. That should be enough to advance on both fronts without overly stressing your body. My 2 cents: Working on front squats and cleans seems like a sound idea to me, but you need to work cleans first - they take way more skill and you will have to be fresh to learn the technique. Weightlifters usually finish off with squats. 

If you're only doing two leg days, then keep them the same (cleans and squats on both days). Ask /r/weightlifting about programming and technique. They will be far more knowledgeable on the matter than most people here.Thanks a lot for all the info! Will be sure to add them in after each session. 

Also, if you ever plan on doing one of these articles again... a planche one would be very appreciated :)Trees180See if you can get some rings.  At your weight, you need every advantage you can get, and rings are infinitely adjustable.

You may well have to scale back a lot of progressions to things people don't generally consider.  You fit into the category of people tha might actually benefit from things like bird dogs.  I don't mean to be insulting, just making you aware that if you can't do something, further research will probably yield a version you CAN do.

Never be afraid to ask us questions! We're here to help.  We're also creative people, so if you're genuinely stuck for ideas, we might be able to offer a different perspective. Vi know I wish I asked more questions when I started.

Basic workouts break down into push, pull, legs and core.  If you can't squat, put your hands on something.  If you can't do pushups, raise your hands or even use a wall.  Bodyweight rows can be made easier by just bending you legs, but try to reduce this over time.  Core work should probably be scaled versions of planks for now.

If you want some sick nasty conditioning, try just lying down and standing up for time.  Shit, gasses me out if I do it long enough.Oh I'm sorry I didn't realize this was a repost. So the consensus is to ignore and keep doing the straight handstand work? Sandwiches obviously. You can also add carbs to tuna by adding saltiness crackers. Canned fruit is also very high carb.At this level, I would say pick a plan that you feel you can work with.  Any plan.  There is no "best or perfect" one for you right now.  As you progress, you will get a better understanding what works for you, but right now, don't paralyse yourself with over information.  Good Luck!This is a dumb question but where can I get a stick like the one he has in this video? Also is it safe to weight something like that with plates?Food and a shower.the hardest part for me was getting time set for a workout, it was too easy to say "i dont have time". my solution was to fit minor reps when i could. cooking by the counter? do some leg lifts. waiting for my tea water to boil? plank on my elbows for a few minutes. my favorite is still to do the tip toe raises while brushing teeth. i got to the point of no longer feeling the burn even after 2 minutes, before i had to do a break. 

not to say you should not start on a routine, but even a beginners routine can be hard when you are just starting out. don't give up. just remember, every leg lift, every push-up, no mater how small moves you closer to your goal. :) good luck!JESUS CHRIST. Get the fuck out of here with Herschel Walker. I am so fucking sick of hearing him mentioned as a justification for ineffective or harmful training methods. The guy, for whatever reason is LYING a shit ton about everything he does to stay fit. 

["Herschels diet is also a bit on the unorthodox. He does not eat breakfast or lunch. The only meal he eats is dinner which consists of  soup, salad and bread. He does not eat red meat but will have chicken on occasion."](http://theathleticbuild.com/herschel-walker-bio-workout-and-diet-plan/)

He is an AMAZING athlete and has AMAZING genetics. No one disputes that. But the laws of thermodynamics still apply to him. Yet he claims to eat something that barely amounts to generally recommended amount of protein. He obviously eats different. It's impossible to be his size with this type of diet alone.

So I somehow don't buy his bullshit sounding training routine either.

My theory is he's trying to sell a persona in his interviews. But that doesn't even matter to me. Also what works for one genetically exceptional person is no valid basis for the average human. That should be clear just if it wasn't so blatantly obvious that he's bullshiting us.

 I apologize if I am emotional about this but I heard that as a justification at least 40 times since last year. It gets really old and surprisingly it's always Herschel, he's literally the only one who claims such asinine nonsense.

"Free as in beer" is pretty common in the US. I rarely ever hear anyone say "Free as in speech".  

Kind of along the same vein is the phrase "[Freedom isn't free](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Freedom_isn%27t_free)", which people fucking _looooove_ here.Anything where you are above the handles will be a problem, as you have noticed.  Can you not L sit on the floor?It was posted to the sub and got torn to shreds it the comments.Two hands, just like the first five times. My arms were simply tired.More pullup bars = more gainz, right?A fat ass complicates things, but your arms are not too short. This question is answered on the specific exercise page.Have you worked out yet?If you never plan on doing advanced hand balancing, go for it.  But you'll be shooting yourself in the foot if you ever change your mind.